!
We use cookies to ensure you get the best possible experience on Software MacKiev's websites and to improve the services we provide. By continuing to use this website, you agree to our use of cookies as described in our
Cookies Policy
.
To learn how to change your cookie settings at any time, go to
support.mackiev.com
and enter "cookies" in the search field.
SOFTWARE MACKIEV PRIVACY POLICY
Last updated: May 2023
BY USING SOFTWARE MACKIEV'S WEBSITES AND/OR SUBMITTING PERSONAL INFORMATION TO OUR WEBSITES AND/OR THROUGH OUR SOFTWARE TITLES, YOU ARE ACCEPTING AND CONSENTING TO THE COLLECTION,
                            PROCESSING, STORING AND USE OF INFORMATION AS DESCRIBED IN THIS PRIVACY POLICY.
We at Software MacKiev take the privacy of your data very seriously. We have prepared this Privacy Policy to describe how we collect and use your personal
                            information through our websites (
www.mackiev.com
,
www.kidpix.com
,
www.hyperstudio.com
,
www.familytreemaker.com
,
www.albumwalk.com
,
www.treevault.com
, and
www.ftm.support
) and through the Software MacKiev software titles. We will collect and use your personal information only as described in this Privacy Policy.
                            Any personal information provided to or gathered by Software MacKiev’s websites or software titles is controlled by The Software MacKiev Company, a United States company.
Our privacy practices are guided by the United States' Children's Online Privacy Protection Act,
                            as well as data privacy laws in the United States and other applicable countries, including the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) in the European Union.
If you have any questions, concerns, or requests about this Privacy Policy, or any questions or
                            requests related to your personal information, please contact our Privacy Office at
privacy@mackiev.com
.
SUMMARY
This is a brief summary of our Privacy Policy for your convenience. Please read the full Privacy Policy on this page for more details.
We collect two types of information from you: (1) information that you actively give to us during registration,
                                when filling out technical support or feedback forms, or when making purchases;
                                and (2) information collected automatically about your computer or device (such as cookie IDs or other unique device identifiers,
                                and your browser and operating system) so that we can improve your website or product experience. You can review our
Cookies Policy here
.
We ask you to indicate your choices about how we can use your information (for example, to post your feedback on our website, or to send you emails about product updates, upgrades,
                                special offers, etc.) on the pages where you provide that information.
To the extent your information is collected or processed on the basis of consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time.
                                Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal,
                                nor will it affect processing of your information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
If you decide not to receive any product news or direct
                                marketing emails with offers or promotions from us, just reply to any email from us and put 'unsubscribe' in the subject line.
In accordance with and as required under applicable data protection law,
                                you may request access to your information, or request that we update, correct, erase or stop processing
                                the personal data we’ve already collected from you by contacting us at
privacy@mackiev.com
.
                                We will promptly change or delete your information as requested, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data or we cannot verify your identity.
Individuals in the EEA can object to processing of their information, ask to restrict processing of their information or request portability.
                                You can exercise these rights by contacting us at
privacy@mackiev.com
.
Individuals in the EEA also have the right to complain to a data protection authority about the collection and use of their personal information.
                                For more information, please contact your local data protection authority. The contact details for such DPAs can be found
here
.
Many of our software applications are intended for use by children under the age of 16,
                                but we do not knowingly ask for personal data from, or directly market to, children under the age of 16.
We do not knowingly collect, use, or distribute information from children under the age of 16.
                                If you believe we have inadvertently collected such information, please contact us immediately so we can remove the information or obtain parental consent.
We do not provide any direct links to websites that are unsuitable for children or teens.
We do not use or collect your precise geographic location.
No advertising companies collect data through our websites or applications.
Information you provide will never, ever be used for any other purpose than to send you the information you have requested or consented to (
e.g.
, newsletters and direct marketing materials).
We are committed to keeping your personal information secure. We undertake physical, technical and administrative security measures to provide reasonable protection of your data
                                from unauthorized access and disclosure. We are constantly working on strengthening security guidelines and measures to protect your data.
We will never, ever provide your information to other parties for marketing, advertising, or other similar uses. The only third parties with whom we may share your personal information
                                are certain trusted service providers who assist us in processing your transactions, fulfilling your orders, or providing the technical or customer support you specifically request.
We may also share information about you with other third parties if we are required to do so by law or to protect our own or others’ rights, property, or safety.
INFORMATION WE COLLECT
In general, we collect two types of information:
Information that you actively give to us during registration or when making purchases or filling out feedback forms or technical support requests — like your first name,
                                last name, country, email address, and other details. We use this data only to provide you with information and promotions on our products or to contact you to respond to your question or request.
Information we automatically collect about your computer or device (such as your IP address, cookie ID, types of web browsers, the time you visited one of our sites,
                                which pages you visited, and other data that is anonymous and does not identify you as an individual).
                                We use this anonymous data only to conduct statistical analysis of traffic patterns, to administer our site, and to improve our products and services.
HOW WE USE YOUR INFORMATION
In general, the information we collect may be used for the following purposes: to respond to your requests; to provide you with technical support;
                            to send you information about product updates and upgrades; to send you newsletters; to enable you to take advantage of our products’ features and
                            services; to send you information about special offers and promotions on Software MacKiev products and services or those of our business partners
                            which might be of interest to you; to conduct statistical analysis; to manage and improve the services available on our websites; or to help
                            us improve our software products using your feedback. You may also choose to receive other types of email messages and notifications from us, beyond
                            those noted above. We will store your personal information only for as long as necessary to provide you with the services or information you require.
We also use the information we collect from you (like your computer details, or information collected by cookies or similar technologies)
                            to provide you with a more effective user experience — for example, to remember what you enter in forms on our website or in applications so you can have fields auto-filled in future.
                            To learn more about our Cookies Policy, click
here
.
LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL INFORMATION (EEA PERSONS ONLY)
If you are from the European Economic Area, our legal bases for collecting and using the information described above are as follows:
Legitimate Interests:
We will collect and process personal information
                            where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden
                            by your data-protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. Legitimate interests include improving, maintaining, providing, securing, and enhancing your website and software experience. It also includes direct marketing activities.
Performance of a Contract:
We will collect and process personal
                            information to perform a contract with you, such as when you purchase a software product from us.
Legal Obligation:
We will collect and process personal information, in
                            certain limited cases, in order to comply with legal obligations.
Consent:
Where required by law, we will collect and process personal
                            information only where we have your consent to do so.
YOUR CONTROL OVER YOUR INFORMATION
We ask you to indicate your choices about how we can use your information (for example, to post your feedback on our website,
                            or to send you emails about product updates, upgrades, special offers, etc.) on the pages where you provide that information.
In accordance with and as required under applicable data protection law, you may request access to your information, or request that we update, correct, erase or stop processing the personal data we’ve already collected from you by contacting us at
privacy@mackiev.com
.
                            We will promptly change or delete your information as requested, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data or we cannot verify your identity.
To the extent your information is collected or processed on the basis of consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time.
                            Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of
                            your information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent. You can withdraw your consent by emailing us at
privacy@mackiev.com
or, as applicable,  by following the unsubscribe instructions that are
                            located at the bottom of the email messages you receive. Please note that it may take some time, consistent with applicable law, for us to process your request.
If you have registered using several email addresses or names, you will need to express your privacy choices for each of them separately using the applicable procedures above.
Please note that even if you choose not to receive future direct marketing emails with offers or promotions, we may continue to send you service notifications about the related products and services,
                            or answer your questions about a product or service,
                            and such notifications or replies may still include offers or promotions for products or services.
You may choose NOT to provide us with any personal information — for example, by not registering —
                            although we will still need your contact information to provide you with free trial versions of products, product update information, or technical support should you require them.
Before collecting and storing any personal information we get through the use of cookies, we first notify you and obtain your consent. Most desktop and mobile device web browsers are set to automatically accept cookies by default.
                            However you can choose to disable or selectively turn off our cookies in your browser settings. Click
here
to learn more.
HOW WE STORE YOUR INFORMATION
We take reasonable administrative, technical, and physical security precautions to protect your personal information from unauthorized access or disclosure.
                            Personal user data can be accessed only by a limited number of authorized employees of our company, and only through our secure internal network, which is
                            not accessible from external networks.
Despite such precautions, there always remains a chance, however slight, that someone may gain unauthorized access to your information.
                            If you think an unauthorized third party has accessed your information, please contact us immediately at
privacy@mackiev.com
.
If any data security breach occurs, we will react immediately. If we discover that your personal information may have been compromised,
                            we will inform you promptly via a general notice on our website or directly by email, or
                            otherwise as required under applicable law.
International Transfers
Software MacKiev's head office is located in Boston, MA, United States.
                            We store and process your personal information on our computers in the United States and Europe, and we also use service providers that may be located in various countries.
We operate internationally and sell our products worldwide. That means that your personal information may need to be processed in countries where data protection and
                            privacy laws and regulations may differ from those in your home country. Some of our partners (digital payment platforms, fulfillment houses, authorized resellers, help desk platform) may
                            be located outside the country where you accessed this website or where you have registered your product. We require all our authorized partners to take appropriate measures to keep your information confidential,
                            safe and secure in accordance with applicable data protection laws. You may review the list of those partners and their policies in the THIRD PARTY PRIVACY POLICIES section of this Privacy Policy.
The server this website is stored on may be located outside your home country. The hosting service provider of this website is bound by
                            a contract that ensures your data is managed in accordance with data privacy laws of the United States and other applicable countries,
                            including EU Data Protection laws, and that the provider implements all technical measures necessary to keep your personal data secure.
INFORMATION WE SHARE WITH THIRD PARTIES
We will never, ever provide your information to other parties for marketing, advertising, or other similar uses.
                            The only third parties with whom we may share your personal information are certain trusted service providers who assist us in processing your transactions,
                            fulfilling your orders, or providing the technical or customer support you specifically request. You may review the list of those partners and their policies in the
                            THIRD PARTY PRIVACY POLICIES section of this Privacy Policy.
We do not participate in any advertising networks, or provide your data to anyone to serve targeted advertisements.
We use third-party analytics only to analyze the performance of our websites so we can improve them. We do not share the information gathered in this process with anyone, including our business partners.
We may also share information about you with other third parties if we are permitted or required to do so by law or to protect our own or others’ rights, property, or safety.
THIRD PARTY PRIVACY POLICIES
If you access or use one of our partners’ services and submit your personal information to them, the privacy policy or statement of our partners will apply to any such information provided to those partners.
Digital payment partners
When you purchase one of our products, your transaction details, including payment information, are processed by one or more of the partners listed below.
Software MacKiev's Orders and Downloads services are provided by FastSpring®, a digital commerce platform.
                            When you place orders for our products, including the download of updates and upgrades, you will be redirected to the FastSpring website.
                            You can read about
purchasing through FastSpring here
, and review their
Privacy Statement here
.
Some Software MacKiev orders are processed directly through PayPal, a digital payments platform.
                            You will be redirected to the corresponding website to place such orders.
                            You can review the
Legal Agreements for their services here
, and their
Privacy Policy here
.
At some live events such as conferences or expos we may use Square, Inc.'s Point of Sale solution for processing orders. You can read their
Privacy Notice here
.
Trusted resellers
School purchase orders may be processed by Learning Services, an educational technology products reseller.
                            You can review their
Privacy Policy here
.
Order fulfillment partners
Software MacKiev's shipping partners are:
Acutrack, Inc., a US-based publishing and fulfillment house. You can review their
Privacy Policy here
.
Sprocket Express™, an eCommerce fulfillment service. You can review their
Privacy Policy here
.
PSI Inc., a US-based 3PL service. You can review their
Privacy Policy here
.
Technical and Customer Support service partners
Our Technical Support and Customer Support services are provided and processed through the LiveAgent® Help Desk software (
www.ladesk.com
).
                            If you contact us through a live chat, or by submitting a technical support request, or request any technical or customer assistance by any other means,
                            the information you provide with your requests will be processed by LiveAgent. You may read the LiveAgent
Security and Privacy Policy here
and learn about LiveAgent's
GDPR Compliance here
.
In some cases we work together and share information with
Ancestry
(to the degree that it is necessary to solve issues you report to us)
                            to provide Family Tree Maker technical and customer support. You can review Ancestry's
Privacy Policy here
.
The Sync Error Reporting system in Family Tree Maker uses
Amazon Web Services (AWS)
to store data submitted while sending Sync Error Reports. In particular, we use Amazon S3 object storage, which is built to store and retrieve data.
                            We use the AWS data center in Oregon, USA. You can review their
Privacy Policy here
.
CHILDREN'S PRIVACY
In compliance with COPPA (the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act) and the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), we have adopted the following policies to keep children safe:
We will NOT knowingly collect, use, or distribute personally identifiable information from children under the age of 16.
We do NOT have any automatic sharing services or technologies integrated in our products that could allow children to publicly post or otherwise distribute personally identifiable information.
We will NOT knowingly keep any personally identifiable information that is mistakenly included in a child's email submission, technical support inquiry, or other one-time request, if we know that the child is under the age of 16.
                                Information will be removed immediately after the issue has been resolved.
We will NOT knowingly post any personally identifiable information that is inadvertently included in a child's submission to a general audience contribution area (if we ever provide any on our website)
                                if we know that the child is under the age of 16. These submissions will be deleted and handled anonymously thereafter.
We will NOT knowingly provide any direct link to websites that are unsuitable for children or teens.
We will advise children under the age of 16 that they MUST obtain permission from their parent or guardian before sharing ANY personal information.
Upon request, we will immediately provide a parent or guardian with a description of the information that may have been provided about their child during a
                                registration process or support request made through any of our products or web pages.
Many of our software products are created for children under the age of 16, but we do not knowingly ask for data from, or market directly to children under the age of 16.
                            Our websites are not targeted at children under the age of 16. The aim of our websites and web pages for children’s software products is to provide information about our software
                            products to and collect data from parents and teachers only.
If we find out that we mistakenly obtained any personal information from a child under the age of 16, we will delete that information from our systems immediately.
All school registrations are to be created by a teacher and are attached to the teacher's or the school's account.
UPDATES AND CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
Software MacKiev reserves the right to add to, change, update or modify this Privacy Policy at any time by posting revisions,
                            updates or modification on the
www.mackiev.com
website. Any such changes will be effective immediately upon posting,
                            and Software MacKiev will notify you via email in the event any changes to the Privacy
                            Policy materially change the way we collect and process your
                            information. The most recent version of the Privacy Policy is reflected by the version
                            date located at the top of this Privacy Policy.
                            We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy often to stay informed of changes that may
                            affect you.
CONTACT US
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, or about the personal data we collect, please contact our Privacy Office at
privacy@mackiev.com
.
Software MacKiev
P.O. Box 130410
Boston, MA 02113-0008
USA
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://fastspring.com/privacy/:
Get more than a payment gateway, right out of the gate. Go farther faster with FastSpring.
Schedule Demo
or
Try Now
FastSpring® Privacy Statement
Please note:
This is the FastSpring Privacy Policy. There is also a separate privacy policy for FastSpring Interactive Quotes (formerly SalesRight) which
you can access here
.
California residents and individuals located in the European Economic Area (EEA), the United Kingdom (UK) and Switzerland can exercise their privacy rights, including the right to request access to or deletion of their personal information, subject to the exceptions under applicable law, by clicking
here
and then completing the form to submit their request.
You may find a copy of this Privacy Policy in PDF format
here
.  For individuals with disabilities, alternative methods of viewing or receiving this Privacy Policy can be found
here
.
BY USING THIS WEBSITE OR ANY FASTSPRING OPERATED ECOMMERCE SOLUTION OR SUBMITTING PERSONAL INFORMATION TO FASTSPRING THROUGH THIS WEBSITE OR ANY FASTSPRING POWERED ECOMMERCE SOLUTION, YOU ARE CONSENTING TO THE COLLECTION, USE, TRANSFER, AND DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION AS DESCRIBED IN THIS PRIVACY STATEMENT. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO ABIDE BY THIS PRIVACY STATEMENT, DO NOT USE THIS WEBSITE. YOUR CONTINUED USE OF THE WEBSITE FOLLOWING THE POSTING OF ANY CHANGES TO THIS STATEMENT CONSTITUTES ACCEPTANCE OF SUCH CHANGES.
1. Scope and Purpose of This Privacy Statement.
Introduction.
This Bright Market, LLC d/b/a FastSpring (“
FastSpring
”, “
we
”, “
our
” or “
us
”) Privacy Statement (“
Privacy Statement
”) applies to each ecommerce solution, which may be but is not limited to, a website, portion of a website or a software application branded with the look and feel of a software publisher or entity operated by FastSpring for the purpose of buying or selling such software publisher’s products and/or services (“
Ecommerce Engine
” or “
Website
”) where this Privacy Statement can be accessed from a hyperlink on, or otherwise appears on, that Ecommerce Engine.  If you are purchasing products through a software Seller (“
Vendor
”), a FastSpring subsidiary and not FastSpring directly, please note that this Ecommerce Engine is hosted and/or operated by FastSpring under an agreement with the Vendor or subsidiary of FastSpring who is listed as the seller of products in the terms of sale on this Ecommerce Engine.
Controller Responsible for Your Information.
Depending upon your relationship to us, FastSpring operates as either a joint controller or processor of the Personal Information we maintain about you.  For additional information on the distinction between the two roles, please see our
Data Processing Agreement
.  Any Personal Information collected by visiting this Website is controlled by Bright Market, LLC d/b/a FastSpring, 801 Garden Street, #201, Santa Barbara, CA 93101, United States of America.
Purpose.
FastSpring respects the privacy of its customers, partners and suppliers of products or services. The purpose of this Privacy Statement is to provide you with information concerning how FastSpring collects, uses, maintains, and shares your Personal Information in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
2. Information We Collect and Process.
FastSpring collects the Personal Information of our purchasers, Vendors, and other individuals who visit our Website for specified, explicit purposes only and will not process this Personal Information in a manner that is incompatible with those purposes.  Personal Information will be processed only if such processing is based on any of the legal grounds listed in section 6(1) of the General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR) (unless an exemption applies) as outlined below:
Performance of a Contract with You
. We will process your Personal Information if it is necessary in order to enter into or perform a contract with you. For example, we will process your payment information in order to complete your purchase/sales transaction.
Legitimate Interest
.  We will process your Personal Information if it is necessary for the purposes of FastSpring’s legitimate interests, except where FastSpring’s interests are overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms that require protection of your Personal Information. FastSpring’s legitimate interests in processing your Personal Information include:  FastSpring’s prevention of fraud or misuse of services, IT and network security, marketing and advertising of products sold by FastSpring, enforcement of legal claims including debt collection via out-of-court procedures, processing for marketing research purposes.
Consent
. If you are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, by using this Ecommerce Engine you consent by ticking the specific consent box to the processing of your Personal Information FastSpring’s servers in the United States and the storage of your Personal Information in the United States for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Statement, and acknowledge that your Personal Information may be transmitted by us to other FastSpring companies for the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement and for company group administration purposes. You may withdraw your consent at any time with effect for the future, but you will then not be able to use our services and in particular order products on our Websites. Where consent to the collection of Personal Information is revoked, we will stop processing that Personal Information. For further information or if you wish to withdraw your consent, please email us at
privacy@fastspring.com
.
Legal Obligation
. We will process your Personal Information where we are under a legal obligation to do so, including tax compliance obligations.
When you visit, buy, or sell via our Website, we may capture the following information about you:
Categories of Personal Information Collected
Identifiers
Specific Personal Information
Name (First/Last), Signature/E-Signature, Mailing Address, Email Address, Telephone Number(s), IP Address, Driver’s License Number/Other Government Number (GST/VAT), Tax Exemption Status, Bank Account Numbers, Debit/Credit Card Number & Information, Customer Identification.
Source of Personal Information
Purchase/Sale Information, Account/Mailing List Registration, Cookie, Web Beacon, Other Technologies, Transaction Details You Provide to Our Customer Service Teams, Information We Receive from Vendors.
Purpose of Collection
Complete Purchase/Sales Transactions, Customer Service Issues, Marketing, Legal and Regulatory Obligations
Legal Grounds for Collection
Consent, Necessary for Performance of Contract, Compliance with Legal Obligation, Legitimate Interest.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
Internet or Other Similar Network Activity
Specific Personal Information
Browsing History, Search History, Other Information Related to Our Consumer’s Interactions with Our Website, Application, and/or Advertisements, including (1) Buyer Usage Activities (adding/removing products from checkout; currency used for purchase) and Analytics, (2) Vendor Platform Usage Activities (submissions, clicks on navigation links, video usage and duration, page views, search requests, time spent on page, cursor movement, clicks on any “get support” or “sign up” buttons) and Analytics.
Source of Personal Information
Purchase/Sale Information, Cookie, Web Beacon, Other Technologies, Third Party Sources.
Purpose of Collection
Complete Purchase/Sale Transactions, Marketing, Understand Our Customers, Improve Our Products/Usage and Data Analytics.
Legal Grounds for Collection
Consent, Necessary for Performance of Contract, Compliance with Legal Obligation, Legitimate Interest.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
Commercial Information
Specific Personal Information
Records of Products or Services Purchased, Obtained, or Considered.
Source of Personal Information
Purchase/Sale Information.
Purpose of Collection
Complete Purchase/Sale Transactions.
Legal Grounds for Collection
Consent, Necessary for Performance of Contract, Compliance with Legal Obligation, Legitimate Interest.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
Geolocation Data
Specific Personal Information
Location of the Individual and Device Used to Access Our Website.
Source of Personal Information
Purchase/Sale Information, Account/Mailing List Registration, Cookie, Web Beacon, Other Technologies.
Purpose of Collection
Complete Purchase/Sale Transactions, Marketing, Legal and Regulatory Obligations.
Legal Grounds for Collection
Consent, Necessary for Performance of Contract, Compliance with Legal Obligation, Legitimate Interest.
Marketing Communications
.  We may send you email marketing communication about FastSpring products and services, invite you to participate in our events or surveys, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, provided that we do so in accordance with the consent requirements that are imposed by applicable law. You may opt out of receiving marketing communication at any time.
Our Use of Anonymous Information.
We may use anonymous information (i.e. information that does not allow direct or indirect identification of the individual to whom such information relates) collected by us:
to personalize and support your use of this Ecommerce Engine, our services, and/or the services of our partners;
to improve this Ecommerce Engine, the customer experience, our advertising systems, and our products and services;
for fraud prevention purposes, such as device fingerprinting;
to identify actions or transactions as originating through an affiliate marketing or referral program;
to deliver targeted advertisements on this Ecommerce Engine and other Websites and/or ecommerce solutions;
to provide reporting to our current and prospective partners and service providers; and
for statistical or research and analysis purposes.
In addition, we may anonymize Personal Information by removing any information that identifies you specifically, and use the rest for the purposes set forth above.
3. Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies.
A cookie is a commonly used automated data collection tool. Cookies are small text files that are placed on your computer or device by websites that you visit or HTML-formatted emails you open, in order to make websites work, or to work more efficiently. We may use cookies, web beacons, pixel tags or other similar technologies on our Websites or emails to, among other things:
Tailor information presented to you based on your browsing preferences, such as language and geographical region;
Collect statistics regarding your Website usage;
Provide us with information to support technical functionality of service, improve the Website experience and measure marketing effectiveness; and
In some cases, to enable a third party to deliver future advertising for our products and services to you when you visit certain Websites owned by such third parties.
There are several different kinds of cookies, and should we be deploying cookies we (or a third party provider be deploying them in connection with our ecommerce activities) would be using one of the following common types of cookies, which may be persistent cookies or session cookies:
Essential cookies
are necessary to provide you with services and features available through our Websites. Without these cookies, services you may need, such as shopping carts or e-billing, cannot be provided.
Analytics or customization cookies
collect information that is either used in aggregate form to help us understand how the Website is being used or how effective our marketing campaigns are, or to help us customize the Website for you.
Advertising cookies and tracking scripts
are used to make advertising messages more relevant to you. They perform functions like preventing the same ad from continuously reappearing, ensuring that ads are properly delivered and, in some cases, featuring ads based on your interests.
If the Website includes a cookie management tool, you will typically find a hover button at the bottom of your screen. If in the future you do not wish to receive cookies, you may be able to refuse them by adjusting your browser settings to reject cookies. If you do so, we may be unable to offer you some of our functionalities, services or support. If you have previously visited our Websites, you may also have to delete any existing cookies from your browser.
Do-Not-Track.
There are different ways you can prevent tracking of your online activity. One of them is setting a preference in your browser that alerts websites you visit that you do not want them to collect certain information about you. This is referred to as a Do-Not-Track (“DNT”) signal. Please note that our Websites may not recognize or take action in response to DNT signals from web browsers. At this time, there is no universally accepted standard for what a company should do when a DNT signal is detected. In the event a final standard is established, we will assess how to appropriately respond to these signals. For more detailed information about cookies, Do-Not-Track and other tracking technologies, please visit
http://www.youronlinechoices.com
.
Third Party Data Collection.
This may also include cookies placed by third parties, to deliver tailored information and content which may be of interest to you, such as promotions or offerings, when you visit third party websites after you have left our Websites. We do not permit these third parties to collect Personal Information about you (such as email address) on our Website, nor do we share with them any Personal Information about you.
Social Media Features and Widgets
.  Our Websites may include social media features, such as Facebook’s “Like” button, and widgets, such as the “Share This” button. These features are usually recognizable by their third-party brand or logo and may collect your IP address, which page you are visiting on our Website, and set a cookie to enable the feature to work properly. Social media features and widgets are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our Website.
Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing it.
Currently, we use the features and widgets (“
Plugins
”) of Facebook, Google, Twitter, and LinkedIn offered by the companies Facebook Inc., Google Inc., Twitter Inc. and LinkedIn Corporation (“
Providers
”).
Facebook is operated by Facebook Inc., 1601 S. California Ave, Palo Alto, CA 94304, USA (“
Facebook
”). You will find an overview on Facebook’s Plugins and what they look like here:
https://developers.facebook.com/docs/plugins
Google+ is operated by Google Inc., 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA (“
Google
”). You will find an overview on Google’s Plugins and what they look like here:
https://developers.google.com/+/web/
Twitter is operated by Twitter Inc., 1355 Market St, Suite 900, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA (“
Twitter
”). You will find an overview on Twitter’s Plugins and what they look like here:
https://twitter.com/about/resources/buttons
LinkedIn is operated by LinkedIn Corporation, 1000 West Maude Avenue, Sunnyvale CA 94085, USA (“
LinkedIn
”). You will find an overview on LinkedIn’s Plugin and what they look like here:
https://developer.linkedin.com/plugins
When you access one of our Websites, which contains a Plugin, your browser establishes a direct connection with the servers of Facebook, Google, Twitter, and LinkedIn. The content of the Plugin is transferred by the respective Provider directly to your browser, which then integrates it into the Website. Integration of the Plugin allows the Provider to receive the information that you have accessed the respective Website even if you do not maintain a profile with that Provider or if you are not logged in at the moment. This information (including your IP address) will be transferred by your browser directly to the Provider in the U.S. and stored there. If you are logged in with one of the Providers’ services, they will be able to assign your visit on our Website to your profile with the respective Provider. If you interact with any of the Plugins, e.g. by pressing the ‟Like” or the ‟+1” button, this information will also be sent directly to the server of the Provider and stored there. The information will also be published in the social network on your respective account, e.g. Twitter, and displayed to your contacts there.
For more information on the purpose and extent of the data acquisition and how data are processed and used by the respective Provider as well as regarding your rights and optional settings to protect your privacy, please refer to the privacy policies of the respective Provider:
Privacy Policy of Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy
Privacy Policy of Google:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Privacy Policy of Twitter:
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Privacy Policy of LinkedIn:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
If you do not want Google, Facebook, Twitter or LinkedIn to allocate data collected on our Websites to your profile in their service, you must log out of the respective service before visiting our Website. You can prevent the loading of the Plugins completely by using Add-Ons for your browser, e.g. the script-blocker ‟NoScript” (
http://noscript.net/
).
If you accept a session or persistent cookie, you can delete it at any time through your web browser (e.g., as soon as you leave our Ecommerce Engine).  If you do not wish to receive cookies or wish to manage when you accept cookies in general, you may set your browser to reject cookies or to alert you when a cookie is placed on your computer. Although you are not required to accept our cookies, if you set your browser to reject cookies, you may not be able to use all of the features and functionality of this Ecommerce Engine.
We and our partners use third party service providers in connection with this Ecommerce Engine and our business to gather user metrics and usage data. These service providers may collect anonymous information about your visits to our Ecommerce Engine or to a Website, your interaction with our Ecommerce Engine or that Website, and the products and services offered by us, our partners and our suppliers through the use of cookies, pixel tags, JavaScript code or other web technologies. This information may be transferred to servers in the U.S. and stored there. We and our partners may use this anonymous information to provide targeted advertisements to you for goods and services, for marketing analysis, and for quality improvement purposes. Currently, we use the following web tracking services:
Google Analytics
: Google Analytics is a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc. (“Google”). Google Analytics uses “cookies”, which are text files placed on your computer, to help the Website analyze how users use the site. The information generated by the cookie about your use of the Website will normally be transmitted to and stored by Google on servers in the United States. In case of activation of the IP anonymization, Google will shorten the IP address in EU Member States or other countries of the European Economic Area. Only in exceptional cases, the full IP address is sent to a Google server in the US and shortened there. On behalf of the Website provider Google will use this information for the purpose of evaluating your use of the Website, compiling reports on Website activity for Website operators and providing other services relating to Website activity and internet usage to the Website provider. Google will not associate the IP address transmitted by your browser with any other data stored by Google.
You may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate settings on your browser. However, please note that if you do so, you may not be able to use the full functionality of this Website. Furthermore, you can prevent the acquisition of data collected by cookies and relating to your use of the Website (including your IP address) by downloading and installing the browser plug-in available under
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
. Please note that on this Website, Google Analytics code is supplemented by “anonymizeIp”. This allows to process IP addresses in a shortened form to exclude direct reference to a specific person. For more information provided by Google:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245?hl=en
.
In any case, if you want to manage, deactivate or authorize the cookies, you can use the below links:
Internet Explorer :
https://support.microsoft.com/en-us/help/17442/windows-internet-explorer-delete-manage-cookies
Chrome :
https://support.google.com/accounts/answer/61416?hl=en
Safari :
https://support.apple.com/en-us/HT201265
Mozilla :
https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/enable-and-disable-cookies-website-preferences
Opera :
http://help.opera.com/Windows/10.20/en/cookies.html
4. Sharing Your Personal Information.
We may share your Personal Information in a limited number of circumstances, including with:
Our Partners.
When we make products available for sale through an Ecommerce Engine, we are doing so as an independent ecommerce reSeller of, or service provider for, the partner whose name and/or logo appears as part of the particular Ecommerce Engine. In connection with your purchase of a product or service through an online store we operate that is co-branded with our partner’s branding, we will provide certain of the Personal Information and/or anonymous information you provide in connection with your purchase to that partner for reporting purposes, to allow our partner or its service provider to register your purchase, to enable your access to products or services provided by our partner or its suppliers, to facilitate warranty, technical support or after-sales service, to allow our partner or its subcontractor to send communications to you if you have previously consented to receive them, to allow our partner or its service provider to provide services in connection with this Ecommerce Engine such as customer support or single sign-on functionality on this Ecommerce Engine and our partner’s Website, or for similar purposes in order to fulfill obligations to you. We may also provide certain of the Personal Information you provide in connection with your purchase to the publisher or manufacturer of a product you purchase, or operator of a service for which you purchase a service use right from us, if different than the partner whose name and/or logo appears on this Ecommerce Engine.  The privacy policy of our partner, and of the publisher, manufacturer or operator of the product or service you purchase, will govern how that party uses and protects any of your Personal Information that we provide to them.
Our Service Providers
. We use other companies, which may include but are not limited to present or future corporate affiliates, to provide joint services or certain services to us or on our behalf and help us to operate our business. We may share your information with our service providers in connection with their provision of services to us. We may also allow these companies to use anonymous information, and to use aggregated Personal Information on an anonymous basis (i.e., where the aggregated data cannot identify you personally), for their business purposes.  We will not share your Personal Information with our affiliates or unrelated third parties to use for their own marketing purposes without your consent. We select our partners and service providers on the basis of their security and confidentiality commitments and their compliance with data protection laws.
To Comply With Legal Requirements, Cooperate With Law Enforcement, Prevent Fraud and Other Crimes, and Protect Legal Rights, Ecommerce Engine, You and Others
. To the extent not expressly prohibited by applicable law, we may disclose Personal Information we collect on this Ecommerce Engine without notifying you when we, in good faith, believe disclosure is appropriate: (a)  to comply with the law or a regulatory requirement; (b) to comply with governmental, administrative or judicial process, requirement or order, such as a subpoena or court order; (c) to cooperate with law enforcement or other governmental investigations (without necessarily requiring the law enforcement or government agency requesting the information to formally serve us with a subpoena); (d) to prevent or investigate a possible crime, such as fraud or identity theft; (e) to enforce a contract; to protect the legal rights, property or safety of FastSpring, its corporate affiliates, and their respective employees, clients and partners and agents, other users or the public in general; or (f) to protect your vital interests if determined necessary by us. In addition, we may review our server logs for security purposes, such as detecting intrusions into our network. If we suspect criminal activity, we may share our server logs – which contain visitors’ IP addresses – with the appropriate investigative authorities who may use that information to trace and identify individuals. We also reserve the right to report to appropriate law enforcement or government agencies any activities that we, in good faith, believe are or may be in violation of applicable laws, rules or regulations without providing notice to you. We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC). We may be required to disclose Personal Information that we handle under the Privacy Shield in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
In Connection With Corporate Events/Transitions
. If one of our corporate affiliates or a third party has acquired our business, specific assets or the business of one of our operating divisions through which you have provided information to us, for example, as the result of a sale, merger, reorganization, insolvency, dissolution or liquidation, your Personal Information may become owned by that company in compliance with applicable data protection laws. In that event, the acquiring company’s use of your Personal Information will still be subject to this Privacy Statement, any applicable Supplemental Privacy Notices, and the privacy preferences you have expressed to us.
We do not sell your Personal Information.
5. Security of Your Personal Information
We are committed to keeping your Personal Information secure. We have implemented physical, technical and administrative safeguards reasonably designed to protect your Personal Information from unauthorized access and disclosure. When we collect or transmit sensitive information such as a financial account number, we use industry standard methods to protect that information. We encrypt Personal Information whenever possible and otherwise restrict access to Personal Information to those employees and individuals with a need to know that information.  It is important that you understand, however, that no Ecommerce Engine, Website, database or system is completely secure or “hacker proof.” You are also responsible for taking reasonable steps to protect your Personal Information against unauthorized disclosure or misuse, for example, by protecting your password. Different countries have different privacy laws and requirements. Please know, however, that no matter where your Personal Information is collected, used, transferred or stored, if it was collected through this Ecommerce Engine, it will be protected by us in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Statement, any Supplemental Privacy Notices that apply to you, and applicable data protection laws.
Cross-Border Transfers of Your Data.
As we operate internationally, and provide you with relevant services through our resources and servers around the globe, sharing your Personal Information across borders is essential. Your Personal Information will be processed on the computer servers (currently Amazon Web Services) in the United States of America on which our Ecommerce Engine is hosted.  In some cases, we may transmit your Personal Information to (i) third party data processors or (ii) product manufacturers, licensors and/or suppliers for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Statement. To the extent required by applicable data protection laws, we have executed standard contractual clauses to effect the lawful cross-border transfer of personal information.
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) Compliance.
FastSpring complies with the EU-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. FastSpring has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. DPF program Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the DPF program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, FastSpring commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your Personal Information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact FastSpring at
privacy@fastspring.com
.
FastSpring has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See
https://dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2
.
As explained here we sometimes provide Personal Information to third parties to perform services on our behalf. If we transfer Personal Information received under the EU-U.S. DPF to a third party, the third party’s access, use, and disclosure of the Personal Information must also be in compliance with our EU-U.S. DPF obligations. Therefore, third parties that use our products explicitly agree to abide by the EU-U.S. DPF or otherwise agree to execute the Standard Contractual Clauses issued by the European Commission for the purposes of transferring Personal Information from the EU to non-adequate countries outside the EU.
Where the EU-U.S. DPF is not applicable, including when there are transfers from the United Kingdom (UK) or Switzerland, FastSpring executes the Standard Contractual Clauses for the purposes of lawful transfer of personal data as set out in European Commission Decision (EU) 2021/914 of 4 June 2021, as well as the UK International Data Transfer Addendum to the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as issued by the UK Information Commissioner under S119A(1) Data Protection Act 2018 (as applicable to any transfers from the UK to non-adequate third countries).
Data Retention Policies
.
We will retain your Personal Information only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which we have collected it. To determine the appropriate retention period, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of your Personal Information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Information, the purposes for which we process your Personal Information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means and the applicable legal requirements. We will also retain and use your Personal Information to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes and enforce our policies. If you stop using our services or if you delete your account with us, we will delete your information in accordance with applicable laws.
6. Your Rights & Choices with Respect to Your Personal Information
Your Rights.
Based upon where you reside, certain choices and rights with regards to your Personal Information may be available to you or your authorized agent under applicable data protection laws, such as the GDPR or California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”).
Access Request Rights
You have the right to request that we provide to you the following information about our collection and use of your personal information :
1. The categories of Personal Information we have collected about you.
2. The categories of sources for the Personal Information we have collected about you (e.g., use of cookies, third party, etc.).
3. Our business or commercial purpose for collecting that Personal Information.
4. The categories of third parties with whom we share or have shared that Personal Information.
5. The specific pieces of Personal Information we collected about you (also called a data portability request), and
6. Information regarding any disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the Personal Information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Deletion, Rectification and Restriction Request Rights
You have the right to request that we delete, restrict or, if you believe that our processing of your Personal Information is incorrect or inaccurate, change any of the Personal Information collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions.  Once your verifiable consumer request is confirmed, we will delete, restrict or change, as the case may be, and direct our service providers to delete, restrict or change your Personal Information.  Your request to delete the Personal Information collected may be denied if it is necessary for us to retain your information under one or more of the exceptions listed in the GDPR or CCPA.
Data Portability Rights
In some cases, you may receive your Personal Information provided by yourself in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format.
Right to Object
Where we process your Personal Information based on a "legitimate interest", you may have the legal right to object to the processing of your Personal Information.
Right to Revoke Consent
Where we process Personal Information based on your consent, you have the right to revoke such consent at any given time.
Post-mortem Right to Privacy
If you are located in EEA, you have the right to set instructions regarding the storage, deletion or communication of your Personal Information after your death.
Right to Complain
You have the legal right to lodge a complaint with the competent authority.
If you contact us we may, for your protection, ask you for additional information to verify your identity. In most cases, we will provide the access you request, correct or delete any inaccurate Personal Information you discover, cease the processing of your Personal Information and implement your guidelines. We reserve the right, however, to limit or deny your request to the extent permitted by applicable law if the disclosure may lead to a breach of applicable law and regulation, e.g. in case of any legal obligation to retain certain data, or if you have failed to provide sufficient evidence to verify your identity.
Your Choices.
FastSpring respects your right to make choices about the ways we collect, use and disclose information about you. We generally ask you to indicate your choices at the time, and on the page, where you provide your Personal Information. When you provide Personal Information, we may offer you a choice as to whether you would like to receive further communications from us and/or from our partners via a box to tick for example, such as communications related to updates, upgrades, special offers and pricing. You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. If you decide you no longer want to receive promotional messages from us, you may let us know by e-mailing us at
remove@fastspring.com
or by following any unsubscribe link in our e-mails; please specify which consent you are revoking in your e-mail to us. Please note, however, if you give us permission to add your contact information to our partner’s mailing list and later withdraw your permission, you will have to contact our partner (or use the “opt-out” provided in the e-mails our partner sends you) to have your name removed from our partner’s mailing lists.
7. Links to Third Party Websites
FastSpring’s Website provides links to third-party web sites, which are not under the control of FastSpring. FastSpring makes no representations about third-party web sites. When you access a non-FastSpring website, you do so at your own risk. FastSpring is not responsible for the reliability of any data, opinions, advice, or statements made on third-party sites. FastSpring provides these links merely as a convenience. The inclusion of such links does not imply that FastSpring endorses, recommends, or accepts any responsibility for the content of such sites.
8. Children’s Privacy
This Ecommerce Engine and our services are not directed at nor targeted to children under the age of 13. If you have not reached the age of majority or are not able to enter into legally binding agreements in your country, you may not use this Ecommerce Engine unless supervised by an adult.  Our goal is to comply with applicable laws and regulations relating to collection and use of information from children as such term is defined by applicable laws. If you believe that we have received information from a child or other person protected under such laws, please notify us immediately by postal mail addressed to FastSpring’s Privacy Department, 801 Garden Street #201, Santa Barbara, CA 93101, United States of America or by e-mail at
privacy@fastspring.com
, and we will take reasonable steps to remove that information from our databases.
9. Changes to This Privacy Statement
We may occasionally update this Privacy Statement.  These updates may reflect, among other things, changes in applicable laws, rules or regulations, changes in our data collection practices, and/or changes to our business or services.  If revisions to the Privacy Statement materially affect how we may use Personal Information collected from you prior to the date of the revised statement, then we will request that you opt-in to the revised Privacy Statement via a checkbox for each new order/purchase. We will post an updated version of this Privacy Statement on the Ecommerce Engine with a revised effective date, to let you know that we updated the Privacy Statement.
10. How to Contact Us.
If you have any questions, comments, or concerns regarding this Privacy Statement or our privacy practices, have privacy-related questions not answered online, or if you would like to exercise any of your rights outlined in this Privacy Statement you may contact us by any of the following means:
Online Requests:
You may contact us via our online form located
here
.
By Mail:
You may contact us by postal mail addressed to Bright Market, LLC d/b/a FastSpring, ATTN: Privacy Department, 801 Garden Street, #201, Santa Barbara, CA 93101, United States of America.
By Email:
You may contact us by e-mail at
privacy@fastspring.com
.  Please specify “Global Privacy Question” in the subject line to help us to expedite our review of your e-mail.
You may write to us in your own language.
Have any questions about FastSpring? We’re here to help!
I'd like to talk to sales.
I need to contact support.
I have a question about a charge.
Hi there! 👋 Have any questions about FastSpring? We’re here to help!
1
Loading video...
Cookie Policy
This website uses cookies to enhance user experience and to analyze performance and traffic on our website. You may click "Allow & Continue", or modify your cookie preferences by clicking "Settings" below. Please read our policies regarding
Privacy
and
Cookies
GDPR
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Functional Cookies
Media Partners
Performance & Analytics
Settings
Save Choices
Allow & Continue
Our Use of Cookies
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Functional Cookies
Media Partners
Performance & Analytics
Our Use of Cookies
When you visit our website, we store cookies on your browser to collect information. The information collected might relate to you, your preferences or your device, and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to and to provide a more personalized web experience. However, you can choose not to allow certain types of cookies, which may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings according to your preference. You cannot opt-out of our Strictly Necessary Cookies as they are deployed in order to ensure the proper functioning of our website (such as prompting the cookie banner and remembering your settings, to log into your account, to redirect you when you log out, secure our website from bots, ensure balanced server loads, etc.). For more information about the First and Third Party Cookies used please refer to our
Privacy
and
Cookies
policies.
Always Active
Strictly necessary cookies are required for our website to function properly and to provide users with a functional and elegant experience. As a result, you may not opt-out of this category of cookie. Information about how to block all cookies from loading in your browser can be found here:
https://www.cookiesandyou.com/disable-cookies/
, however this is not recommended as it will break many web experiences.
For a full list of the Strictly Necessary cookies we use, visit
our Cookie Policy
.
Functional Cookies
Functional cookies support the features and user interface that you, the user, experience while browsing our website. For example, these cookies may be used when displaying our online chat feature, or anonymously analyzing site usage with metrics such as what pages get the most visits or which navigation links are clicked on most frequently. Depending on your geographic region you may be able to opt out of Functional Cookies, but some elements of our website may not function properly.
For a full list of the Functional cookies we use, visit
our Cookie Policy
.
Media Partners
These cookies are used to track the performance of FastSpring’s advertising efforts, and to improve the accuracy of ads that we place on external websites. For example, if you visit fastspring.com and then leave, a cookie may be used to show you an ad promoting FastSpring’s services on external websites. You may opt-out of these cookies by disabling the Media Partner cookie category with the toggle switch in the Cookie Preference center.
For a full list of the Media Partner cookies we use, visit
our Cookie Policy
Performance & Analytics
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 1
https://www.paypal.com/us/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full:
Back To Home Page
PayPal Privacy Statement
Overview
Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
Categories of Personal Information We Collect
How is Personal Information used?
Do We Disclose Personal Information, and why?
How long does PayPal store your Personal Information?
How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
Your Data Protection Rights
How Do We Protect Your Personal Information?
Can Children Use Our Services?
Definitions
Our Contact Information
CCPA California Notice at Collection
US Consumer Privacy Notice
Download Printable PDF
PayPal Privacy Statement
Last updated on February 13, 2025
Overview
PayPal, Inc. (“we,” “our,” “us,” “PayPal”) provides this Privacy Statement to describe our use of your Personal Information when you use your PayPal account, Xoom account, visit our websites, or apply for, or use our Services, like Braintree and Zettle. This Privacy Statement does not apply to Excluded Services, such as Venmo and Hyperwallet.
We encourage you to read this Privacy Statement and to use it to help you make informed decisions.
Certain capitalized terms that are not otherwise defined in the Statement are explained in the
Definitions
section below.
We revise this Privacy Statement from time to time to reflect changes to our business, Services, or applicable laws. If the revised version requires notice in accordance with applicable law, we will provide you with 30 days prior notice by posting notice of the change on the "
Policy Updates
" or "
Privacy Statement
" page of our website, otherwise the revised Privacy Statement will be effective as of the published effective date. If you are a new User or are receiving this Privacy Statement for the first time and there is an upcoming change described on the
Policy Updates
or Privacy Statement page at the time you receive this Privacy Statement, such upcoming change will apply to you on the indicated effective date.
For most of our Services, we act as a “data controller” or “business”, however there are some products and features where PayPal may also act as a “data processor” or “service provider” when providing services to our Partners and Merchants.  The “data controller” or “business” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that has the control over the purposes and means by which the data processing is performed.  The “data processor” or “service provider” (each as defined under applicable data protection laws) is the entity that processes the Personal Information for the data controller, for the data controller’s specific purposes, and as otherwise permitted under applicable data protection laws.
Non-Account Holders and Fastlane Profile Users
Our Services may be accessed by individuals without a PayPal or Xoom account. We will collect Personal Information from you even if you are a non-account holder when you use our Services, such as when you use our Pay Without a PayPal account, use Unbranded Payment Services (e.g., Braintree and Zettle), use a Fastlane profile, or when a non-accountholder receives a payment through the Visa+ service from a PayPal account holder (“Recipient”). If you Pay Without a PayPal account, we may link your transaction information with your PayPal account, if you have one at the time you use the Service without logging in, or if you create a PayPal account later.
With a Fastlane profile, individuals can store their payment methods and other Personal Information with PayPal so that they can complete the checkout process faster,  create a store or loyalty account, or facilitate other transactions at participating Partners and Merchants with payment card, contact information, shipping data or other data they save in their Fastlane profile as relevant to the specific interaction, participating Partner or Merchant, all without having to manually input payment method details and other Personal Information each time they checkout ("Fastlane").
When you create a Fastlane profile, you are agreeing to let PayPal store your Personal Information, including your name, email, phone number, address information, billing information and payment method details, and other data that may be relevant to specific Partner or Merchant interactions, and pre-populate that information in the checkout flows or other interactive features of participating Partners and Merchants so that you can  enjoy a faster Partner and Merchant experience by not having to manually input  your payment or other information. We will also collect transaction and other Partner or Merchant data related to your purchases and other Partner or Merchant interactions when you use Fastlane. If you have a Fastlane profile, we may recognize you as a Fastlane user when you shop on the participating Partners’ and Merchants’ sites, and we may prompt you to engage in participating Partner or Merchant interactions, such as registering for a store or loyalty account using your Fastlane profile information. If you choose to interact with participating Partners or Merchants through Fastlane, you agree to let PayPal disclose your Fastlane profile information to the Participating Partners and Merchants and their service providers, and to facilitate your transaction and shopping experience on the participating Partners and Merchants sites.
The Visa+ Service enables eligible customers with a PayPal account to send and receive money to and from Venmo and third-party Visa+-enabled digital wallets (“Visa+”).
When you shop on Partner and Merchant sites, the Partner or Merchant may disclose Personal Information with PayPal that we will use in accordance with this Privacy Statement and the relevant PayPal user agreement.
Categories of Personal Information We Collect
Categories of Personal Information collected
from you
, including from your interactions with us and use of the Services:
Personal Identifiers
: Such as Name, Business Name, Address, Phone Number, Email, IP address, Device Information, Information collected from cookies or other tracking technologies, other information necessary to establish an account or profile.
Records and Financial Information
: Such as, bank account and routing numbers, credit and debit card information, amount you send or request, other financial information.
Transaction and Experience Information
: Such as online shopping cart information, shopping activity and goods or services considered on Partners and Merchants sites, shipping options and associated costs when you check out, purchase history, and order tracking and product information.
Geolocation
: We may collect IP-based geolocation data and Global Positioning System (GPS) with your consent during your user experience or based on your mobile application settings.
Internet or network activity
: interactions with our Services, Information about response time for web pages, download errors, date and time when you used the service, Location Information, such as your IP address, statistics regarding how pages are loaded or viewed, the websites you visited before coming to the Sites and other usage and browsing information collected through Cookies (“
Technical Usage Data
”).
Biometric
: When you consent in the user experience, we collect voice identification, photo identification, or face scans to verify your identity and authenticate you for certain actions related to your account, including, for example, verify your identity and authenticate you to meet regulatory requirements or before you access accounts and Services, recover passwords, update profile info, manage payments and payment methods, lift account limitations, and initiate cryptocurrency transfers.
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information
: Call recordings when you talk to customer service.
Professional or employment information:
including business information, job title, contact emails, phone numbers and taxpayer ID numbers.
Imported Contact Information:
including name, address, phone number, images, email address or usernames associated with the contacts.
PayPal Account Profile Information:
username, profile picture, gender, or personal description which you add that may include sensitive personal information. You can set your profile to “Private” at any time.
Information you provide when you contact us:
Your response to surveys, recorded conversations, chat conversations with us, email correspondence with us, account or profile status, repayment history, voice identification, Information about others if you choose to share it with us.
Inferred data:
We may infer information about you such as your preferences and shopping behavior, based on your transactions and interactions with our Services or with our Partners and Merchants.
Characteristics of Protected Classifications:
including age or date of birth, national origin, disability, citizenship, military status.
Sensitive Personal Information:
Social Security number, government-issued identification, bank account and routing numbers, credit and debit card information, voice identification and Photo IDs or Precise Geolocation.
Information from your device:
including, language settings, browser ID, cookie preferences, time zone, operating system, platform, screen resolution and similar information about your device settings, data collected from cookies or other tracking technologies.
We may also obtain the above categories of Personal Information from the following
categories of sources
:
Excluded Services including Venmo and PayPal Honey.
Third parties: Service Providers, Partners and Merchants, Payment Partners, such as card networks and payment processors, Credit Reporting Agencies, Government Entities, Data Brokers, and Financial Institutions.
Linked Accounts: Non-financial or financial accounts you agree to link to PayPal, such as social network accounts, mail accounts or for open banking. You may change your mind about use of this feature and unlink your linked accounts at any time. If you choose to link these accounts or share such information with us, we will periodically collect and process it until you unlink the account.
Third Party Applications: Applications that you choose to use for example, the Apple App Store, Google Play Store, or social networking sites.
How is Personal Information used?
We may process your Personal Information for a variety of reasons, including to provide our Services, for security and fraud prevention and to comply with law. We may also use personal data to participate in certain features, that while not necessary for use of the Services, may be of interest to you, such as syncing your contact list to your account, personalize content and offers, targeted advertising, or connecting to a third-party platform. Some of these features may be offered with an opt-out, or require your consent to enable.
We may collect Personal Information to:
Provide our Services
: such as to help you send, receive or request money, initiate a payment, add monetary value to an account, pay a bill, administer your purchases, display shipping options and associated costs when you check out, show you your Fastlane profile, account and payment information, send and receive Visa+ transactions, to assess your creditworthiness in connection with our Services, confirm your identity and your contact information, to authenticate your access to your account or Fastlane profile and to confirm your account or profile and financial information is accurate and up to date. For Visa+, we will receive the recipient's name and payment information from Visa and third-party Visa+ participating digital wallets for the purpose of processing and matching Visa+ payment transactions between participating digital wallets and PayPal. If you are using Fastlane, we will also use your Personal Information and payment method details to determine whether the payment you are making with a participating Partner or Merchant is authorized by you and likely to be successfully authorized by the payment method you choose to use when you make a purchase using details from your Fastlane profile.
Provide receipts in connection with Zettle services
: For buyers using our Zettle services (including Venmo Tap to Pay), you may choose to provide us your contact details so that we can send you digital receipts. If you provide your e-mail address or mobile number to a Partner or Merchant who uses Zettle, we may remember your details for the next time you buy something from a Merchant who uses Zettle in its physical store, if you use the same payment card. This is regardless of whether if you have previously bought something from this Merchant or not. This means that your e-mail address or mobile number will be pre-filled in the receipt view for your convenience the next time you buy something from a Merchant who uses Zettle in its physical store.
Manage and improve our Services:
for example, to develop new products and features, for customer analysis, to administer our Services, and for internal operations, for example troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, research, and statistical purposes.
Manage fraud and risk
: We conduct risk analysis, fraud prevention and risk management to protect our customers and business, including fraud that involves our Partners and Merchants and strategic ventures.
Associate information about you:
if you use our Services without a PayPal account (e.g., Pay Without a PayPal account), we may associate such transactions with your PayPal account if you have one or later establish an account.
If you use one of the following Services: Fastlane, Venmo, and PayPal Honey; we may associate information about your transactions and experiences using these Services to personalize content and offers and improve your use of the PayPal services.
Market our Services
: We may use Personal Information to market our Services including where we partner with others to offer similar services to market about our Partners and Merchants. We use Personal Information,
including when we associate information about you,
to better understand and cater to your interests.
Communicate with you
: We may contact you when you need us, such as answering a question you sent to our customer service team.
Comply with Laws:
to comply with applicable laws and rules and enforce our agreements with you and other people who use our Services.
Process information about your contacts:
to make it easy for you to find and connect them, improve payment accuracy and suggest connections with people you may know.
By providing us with information about your contacts you certify that you have permission to provide that information to PayPal for the purposes described in this Privacy Statement.
Create an account connection between your account and a third-party account or platform
: such as with a social media account or a financial institution in connection with your participation in Open Banking.
Send you locally relevant options
: If you agree to let us track your precise location, we can customize our Services by using the right language and personalizing content such as providing location-based options, functionality or offers, ads and search results.
Even if you don’t allow us to track your location, we may still use your address to send you location-based options recommended by businesses that are near to your address.
Develop product recommendations
: We may use insights from purchases and other behaviors on our and our Partner or Merchant websites or apps to develop product recommendations about products, brands, sizes, preferences and styles that we provide to our Partners and Merchants so that they can recommend relevant products to you.
Remember your preferences
: We may remember your preferences for the next time you use the Services, such as whether you choose to receive digital receipts via email or text when you checkout.
Personalize your experience
: When you use Services, as well as other third-party sites and services, we might use tracking technologies like cookies. See our
Cookie Statement
for more details.
Do We Disclose Personal Information, and why?
We do not sell Personal Information to third parties for money or share your Personal Information for cross context behavioral advertising, including any sensitive personal information.
However, we may disclose customer insights, product recommendations, sizes, and preferences to Partners and Merchants to help them and us improve your shopping experience to make it more convenient and personalized for you.
If you choose to interact with participating Partners and Merchants through Fastlane, we will disclose your Fastlane profile information with the participating Partners and Merchants and their service providers, and facilitate your transaction, shopping experience or other interaction on participating Partners and Merchants sites.
We will also disclose your Personal Information with third parties to help us provide Services, protect our customers from risk and fraud, market our products, and comply with legal obligations.
We may disclose your sensitive personal information as appropriate to carry out legitimate business activities allowed by law.
Read more about our sharing practices below.
In addition, we may disclose Personal Information with the following categories of third parties:
Excluded Services
, including Venmo to provide you with the Services, personalize your use of the Services, to manage our business; or with PayPal Honey to manage our Rewards program.
Authorities
, if compelled to do so by a subpoena, court order, or similar legal procedure; when it is necessary to do so to comply with law; or where the disclosure of Personal Information is reasonably necessary to prevent physical harm or financial loss, to report suspected illegal activity, or to investigate violations of the relevant agreement, or as otherwise required by law that requires PayPal or Excluded Services to respond. Such authorities include courts, governments, law enforcement, and regulators. We may also be required to provide other third parties information about your use of our Services, for example to comply with card association rules, to investigate or enforce violations of our user agreement or to prevent physical harm or illegal activity.
Other financial institutions
, to jointly offer a product, such as PayPal Credit, PayPal Savings, PayPal Cashback Mastercard and PayPal Extra Mastercard.
Card networks and payment processors,
to facilitate payment processing or to add cards to your electronic wallet. For payment transactions with Fastlane, your Personal Information will be shared with the provider of the payment services for the participating Partner and Merchant to enable the processing of the payment transaction. The payment provider for the Partner and Merchant may be PayPal or a third party payment provider.
Fraud prevention and identity verification agencies
, for example to assist us in detecting activities suggestive of fraud.
Credit reporting and debt collection agencies,
for example to collect unpaid overdue debts through a third party such as a debt collection agency.
Service providers
that operate at our direction and on our behalf to perform services we outsource to them, such as processing payments, marketing, research, compliance, audits, corporate governance, communications, IT development, maintenance, hosting and support and customer service operations.
Other PayPal Account Holders to complete a transaction
. Some Personal Information is disclosed to other PayPal account holders as required to complete a payment transaction. This includes your username, profile photo, first and last name, email, and phone number.
Other Users in accordance with your account settings
. In accordance with your
account settings
or PayPal.Me preferences, your Personal Information can be seen by other account holders and non-account holders (“Users”) to help facilitate a transaction. For example, as part of the send money feature, a User may search for your account to initiate a payment. Based on your account settings, the information shown to other Users may include your username, profile photo, first and last name, email, phone number, city and state, month and year of PayPal account creation, and any additional information you include in the details or “about you” section of your account.
Other Users if you have a business profile
.  If you have a business profile, we will display a payment link and disclose certain information about you to other Users, including your name or business name, profile picture or logo, and the city associated with your PayPal account, as well as total time selling with us, total number of followers, and total number of unique Users that have paid you in the past year.
If you have a business profile, you can choose to display other information to other Users, such as your street address, phone number, email and website, in accordance with your business profile settings.
Linked accounts
, for example any social media accounts you asked us to link or when you link an account with another bank or
financial institutions,
card account, or aggregator
in connection with your participation in Open Banking
, so we can check if you have sufficient funds or confirm your ownership of the account.
Partners and Merchants, their service providers and others involved in a transaction
, for example when you use the Services to initiate online purchases, save your payment information with Fastlane, pay other Users using the Services, pay Recipients using Visa+, or return goods we may disclose information about you and your account or Fastlane profile with the other parties (or their service providers) involved in processing your transactions. We may also disclose Personal Information to Partners and Merchants to enable their use of our Services to facilitate your transactions.  For example, when you visit a participating Partner or Merchant site or app, the Partner or Merchant can check whether you are a user of PayPal services and present a recommended payment method to you to simplify your checkout process.
For our PayPal customers
, we may disclose your Personal Information to Partners and Merchants that you and we interact with, to help ourselves and Partners and Merchants personalize services and offers so you can have a better and more relevant experience.  Personal Information we disclose includes, for example, products, sizes, preferences, and styles we think you’ll like.
Unless we are required by law to obtain your consent, we disclose Personal Information collected you after November 27, 2024 (or from earlier if you consent) for personalized shopping experiences.
To opt-out of disclosures or Personal Information to Partners and Merchants for personalized shopping experiences, log into your PayPal account and edit your preferences in the Data and Privacy setting.
If you opt-out, we will continue to disclose your Personal Information as necessary to complete transactions you initiate, but will not disclose Personal Information to Partners and Merchant for personalized shopping experiences.
Please note
that Personal Information disclosed to Partners and Merchants (or their
service providers) involved in a transaction is subject to the Partners' and Merchants' own privacy policies and
procedures. We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of Partners and Merchants.
Other third parties
, for example we disclose Personal Information to advertising platforms at your direction, or security service providers to help prevent unauthorized access to our Services.
Please be aware that these parties’ privacy notice applies to the Personal Information that you share directly with them
. For example, we use Google’s reCAPTCHA to prevent misuse of our Services, when you access our mobile application. We may also use Google Address Autofill to ensure accuracy of your address. Google’s
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
apply to the Personal Information you share with them.
Buyers or in connection with business transfer
,
for example if we are involved in a merger, a purchase or sale of all or part of our business or assets, including receivables and debts, we may disclose, under appropriate data protection terms, your Personal Information to an interested or actual buyer of those business or assets. If PayPal or a significant portion of PayPal’s assets are acquired by a third party, Personal Information may also be disclosed.
How long does PayPal store your Personal Information?
We retain Personal Information for as long as needed or is permitted in context of the purpose for which it was collected and consistent with applicable law.
The criteria used to determine our retention period is as follows:
Personal Information used for the ongoing relationship between you and PayPal is stored for the duration of the relationship plus a period of 10 years, unless we need to keep it longer, such as:
a legal obligation or compliance with laws to which we are subject is retained consistent with the applicable law, such as under applicable bankruptcy laws and AML obligations
litigation, investigations, audit and compliance practices, or to protect against legal claims.
We retain biometric data for as long as needed or permitted given the purpose for which it was collected and no more than 3 years after your account closes, unless otherwise required by applicable law.
How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When you interact with our Services, open email we send you, or visit a third-party website for which we provide Services, we and our partners use cookies and other tracking technologies such as pixel tags, web beacons, and widgets (collectively, “Cookies”) to recognize you as a user, customize your online experiences and online content, including to serve you interest-based advertising, perform analytics; mitigate risk and prevent potential fraud, and promote trust and safety across our Services.
We use Cookies to collect your device information, internet activity information, and generate inferences as described above.
You can disable or decline some Cookies for our Services. But, since some parts of our service rely on Cookies to work, those services could become difficult or impossible to use.
Some web browsers have an optional setting called “Do Not Track” (DNT) that lets you opt-out of being tracked by advertisers and some third parties. Because many of our services won’t function without tracking data, we do not respond to DNT settings.
If you want to know more about how we use cookies, please review our
Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies
. To learn how to opt-out of this kind of tracking technology, visit
About Ads
.
Your Data Protection Rights
Your rights to access, correction, deletion, and restriction to use or share your Personal Information.
Under applicable data protection law, depending upon the jurisdiction in which you reside and subject to applicable exceptions and definitional differences among various state laws, you may have certain rights about how your Personal Information is collected, stored, used and shared.
We recognize the importance of your ability to control the use of your Personal Information and provide several ways for you to exercise your rights to access (right to know your information), right to know third-parties to which we have disclosed Personal Information, correction, deletion (erasure), and to restrict certain information (right to opt-out of sharing and right to limit use and disclosure of sensitive personal information).
Certain state laws also provide residents of those states with the right to opt out of the “sale” (disclosing Personal Information in exchange for money or other consideration) or “sharing” (disclosing Personal Information for cross-context behavioral advertising) of your Personal Information or use of your Personal Information for certain types of targeted advertising.  Global Privacy Control settings is a browser setting that notifies website owners of users' privacy preferences regarding selling or sharing their Personal Information for cross-context behavioral advertising. PayPal does not respond to the Global Privacy Control signal because we do not sell or share your data.
We will not deny you services, charge you different prices, or provide you with a different level of service solely for exercising your privacy rights; although, certain personalized services for PayPal customers may not provide the same level of personalization with limited data sharing. If you are a California resident, learn more about how we handle your
Privacy Rights
.
How do you exercise your rights?
If you, or an authorized agent where permitted, want to exercise any of your rights relating to your Personal Information,
contact us
or submit your request from your account settings. If you have a PayPal account, you can exercise your privacy rights by accessing “Data and Privacy” from account settings in the PayPal app.
If you, or an authorized agent where permitted, want to exercise any of your rights relating to your Personal Information in your Fastlane profile,
contact us
or submit your request from your Fastlane profile management portal.
Even if you do not have a PayPal account (for example, where you use Pay without a PayPal account), you can submit a request for access, correction, or deletion of your Personal Information by contacting us at the number provided in our
Contact Information
section.
We’ll first need to verify who you are before we can respond to your request. We may ask you to provide us with information necessary to reasonably verify your identity before responding to your request. We will compare the information you submit against our internal business records to verify your identity. If we can’t verify your identity, we will not be able to fulfill your request. If we deny your request in whole or in part, you may have the right to appeal the decision. In such circumstances, we will provide you with information regarding the appeals process.
Your
right to request a copy of the Personal Information
. If you want to request the data we’ve collected about you in the past 12 months, you have choices:
Log in to your PayPal or Xoom account, or Fastlane profile management portal, and submit a request
Call or contact us
and request that we provide you with the data we’ve collected.
Your right
to correct your Personal Information:
Log in to your PayPal or Xoom account, or Fastlane profile management portal, and correct any information that you've previously added. For example, you can edit your addresses in your settings
Call or contact us
and request that we correct specific information
Your right
to delete your Personal Information:
Log in to your PayPal or Xoom account, or Fastlane profile management portal, and delete any information that you've previously added. For example, you may delete your non-primary addresses in your settings
Call us or contact us
and request that we delete specific information
Close your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile
If you close your PayPal or Xoom account, or Fastlane profile, or request that we delete Personal Information, we still need to keep some Personal Information as explained in
How long does PayPal store your Personal Information
section so we can:
Complete a transaction, provide goods or services you requested, or comply with our promises to you in the user agreement or other contract you have with us
Detect and prevent malicious, fraudulent, or illegal activity
Protect your (or another person’s) legal rights, including the right to free speech
Manage our internal business processes that are reasonably related to your expectations when using our Services
Comply with laws and other legal or governmental processes
California also offers a right to opt out of “Selling” and “Sharing” Personal Information. The Global Privacy Control setting is a browser setting that notifies website owners of users' privacy preferences regarding selling or sharing their personal information. PayPal does not respond to these settings because we do not sell or share data. Some personal information collected, processed, or disclosed by a financial institution are subject to federal laws, such as the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act. Consumers may read our
Consumer Privacy Notice
for more information about their rights under US federal law.
Understanding your choices
You can control how Personal Information is collected or disclosed, as well as how we communicate with you. Here are some of the ways you can customize your choices.
Choose how we collect Personal Information
You may choose to limit the Personal Information you provide when our apps or Services request it. To help make choices that are right for you, it’s important to understand that Personal Information helps us provide a richer, more personalized experience for you. Also, some Personal Information is required for our Services to function.
For example, sharing your contacts helps make it easier for you to find the people you want to send money to. If you choose not to share your contacts with us, you can still use our mobile apps, but some actions may not be as fast or easy as it would be if you shared your contacts. Another example is creating an account or Fastlane profile with us. If you choose not to provide information that is required for an account or Fastlane profile to function, like your name and email address, we will not be able to create an account or Fastlane profile for you.
Choose how linked accounts collect and use Personal Information
If you link your account to a third-party service, you may be able to manage how your Personal Information is collected, used, and shared by them. Read the third parties’ privacy policies to see the choices they offer you.
You can control which third-party services you link to your account and what Personal Information they can collect about you. For example, to manage the permissions, go to the Security settings in your PayPal account.
Choose what we disclose with other Users
Some Personal Information may be seen by other Users. You may be able to adjust or turn off this setting in the Data and Privacy section in your account settings.
Choose what we share with Partners and Merchants for Personalized Shopping
Unless we are required by law to obtain your consent, we share Personal Information collected after November 27, 2024 (or from earlier if you consent) for personalized shopping experiences. Personal Information we disclose includes, for example, products, preferences, sizes, and styles we think you’ll like. To opt-out of Personal Information sharing with Partners and Merchants for personalized shopping experiences, log into your PayPal account and edit your preferences in the Data and Privacy setting. If you opt-out, we will continue to disclose your Personal Information as necessary to complete transactions you initiate but will not disclose Personal Information to Partners and Merchants for personalized shopping experiences.
Choose how we communicate with you
Your choices about how we communicate with you differ depending on the purpose of the message and how it is delivered. Some messages are considered optional, and some are necessary for you to manage your accounts or Fastlane profile with us. We use email, text messages, push notifications on your mobile device, and even phone calls or paper mail depending on the situation and your preferences.
You can click the unsubscribe link in a PayPal or Fastlane marketing email, opt-out of a text message by replying “STOP,” or turn off notifications on your device. You can also change your account’s notification settings or the notification preferences on your device.
You won’t be able to opt-out of messages that are considered necessary for the Services, such as digital receipts and emails that alert you to changes in your account or Fastlane profile's status. You may be able to decide how we send those messages, such as by email, phone, text message, or a notification on your mobile device.
How Do We Protect Your Personal Information?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for your Personal Information against loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration. The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centers, and information access authorization controls. While we are dedicated to securing our systems and Services, you are responsible for securing and maintaining the privacy of your password(s) and account/Fastlane profile registration information and verifying that the Personal Information we maintain about you is accurate and current. We are not responsible for protecting any Personal Information that we share with a third-party based on a linked account connection that you have authorized.
Can Children Use Our Services?
We do not knowingly collect information, including Personal Information, from children under the age of 13 or other individuals who are not legally allowed to use our Services. If we obtain actual knowledge that we have collected Personal Information from someone not allowed to use our Services, we will promptly delete it, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data.
Please
contact us
if you believe that we have mistakenly or unintentionally collected information from someone not allowed to use our Services.
We do not sell to third parties for money, or share Personal Information of anyone under 16 years of age, for the purpose of cross-context behavioral advertising.
Definitions
Device Information means data that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device IP address; information about your device’s web browser and internet connection you use to access the Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device.
Excluded Services means companies or separate brands, affiliates, or subsidiaries of PayPal, who process Personal Information in accordance with their own terms of service and separate privacy statements. Examples include Venmo, Honey Science LLC, Chargehound LLC, Hyperwallet, Simility, Swift Financial LLC, and Bill Me Later, Inc
Geolocation Information means information that identifies, with precise specificity, your location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through your GPS, or your device settings.
Location Information means information that identifies, with reasonable specificity, your approximate location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through GPS or Wi-Fi or cell site triangulation.
Partners and Merchants means our partners and the merchants, partners or businesses that our Users transact with for the purpose of obtaining goods or services.
Pay Without a PayPal account means our Services may be accessed by individuals without using a PayPal account, a Fastlane profile, or the Unbranded Payment Services. Pay Without a PayPal account does not include Venmo, which is subject to its own terms of service and separate privacy statement.
PayPal means PayPal, Inc. which offers PayPal, Xoom, Unbranded Payment Services, and Fastlane profile services.
Personal Information in this Privacy Statement means information about you, including your identity, finances and online behavior.
Sell under California law is defined as the disclosure of Personal Information to third parties in exchange for monetary or other valuable consideration.
Services means any PayPal, Unbranded Payment Services, Pay Without a PayPal account, Fastlane, Xoom, Zettle (including Tap to Pay), bill pay, Rewards, sending or receiving money, credit products and services, including those offered with our Partners and Merchants, content, features, technologies, or functions, and all related websites, applications and services offered to you by PayPal, with the exception of the Excluded Services. Your use of the Services includes use of our Sites.
Sharing under California law is defined as the targeting of advertising to a consumer based on that consumer’s Personal Information obtained from the consumer’s activity across websites.
Sites means the websites, mobile apps, official social media platforms, or other online properties through which PayPal offers the Services and which has posted or linked to this Privacy Statement.
Unbranded Payment Services means when you are interacting with and making payments to Partners and Merchants using our card processing and/or ACH origination services that do not carry the PayPal brand or when you use our Braintree or Zettle services.
Our Contact Information
If you have questions about this Privacy Statement or your Personal Information, contact us so we can help.
To talk about your PayPal account or Unbranded Payment Services:
Call PayPal Customer Service at 1-888-221-1161
or
visit our Customer Service web portal
To talk about your Fastlane profile:
Call PayPal Customer Service at 1-844-705-3555
Or visit your
Fastlane profile management portal
To talk about your Xoom account:
Call Xoom Customer Service at 1-877-815-1531
or
visit our Help Center web portal
CCPA California Notice at Collection
Most of the Personal Information we collect is subject to federal and state privacy laws that apply to financial institutions. To the extent the Personal Information is not subject to these federal and state financial privacy laws and to the extent it is collected in California about California residents, the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) may apply. The following section pertains only to Personal Information that is subject to the CCPA (“CCPA personal information”) and makes statements that reference unique definitions and requirements of law.
This CCPA California Notice at Collection describes: (1) the purpose for which we use each category of “CCPA personal information” we collect; and (2) the categories of third parties to which we (a) disclose CCPA personal information for a business purpose, and/or (b) “share” CCPA personal information for “cross-context behavioral advertising” and/or (c) “sell” such CCPA personal information, as applicable.
Under California law, “sharing” is defined as the sharing or disclosure of CCPA personal information by a business to a third party, for the targeting of advertising to a consumer, based on that consumer’s personal information obtained from the consumer’s CCPA activity across businesses, websites, applications, or services, other than those with which a consumer uses or directs a business to internally disclose CCPA personal information or intentionally interact with one or more third parties. “Selling” is defined as the disclosure of CCPA personal information to third parties in exchange for monetary or other valuable consideration, but does not apply to such disclosures when a consumer uses or directs a business to intentionally disclose CCPA personal information or interact with one or more third parties.
We do not sell or share your CCPA personal information, including any Sensitive CCPA personal information, outside the exceptions.
We also do not sell or share, and have no actual knowledge that we have sold or shared any CCPA personal information of anyone under 16 years of age.
For more information about each category, purpose of use, and the third parties to which we disclose CCPA personal information, please see the “Categories of Personal Information We Collect”, “How is Personal Information used,” and “Do We Disclose Personal Information” sections.
Categories of Personal Information
Purpose of Collection
Categories of 3
rd
Parties to which PayPal discloses this Personal Information for Business Purpose
Identifiers
Provide Services
Communicate with you
Link an account
Manage and improve our Services
Manage fraud and risk
Market our Services
Comply with laws
Process information about your contacts
Communicate with you
Provide receipts in connection with Zettle services
Remember your preferences
Associate information about you
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Card Networks and Payment Processors
Fraud prevention and identity verification agencies
Credit Reporting Agencies
Service providers
Other Users in accordance with account settings
Linked Accounts
Partners and Merchants
Other third parties
Buyers in connection with a business transfer
Records and Financial Information
Provide Services
Communicate with you
Link an account
Keep your account and Fastlane profile and financial information up to date
Manage and improve our Services
Manage fraud and risk
Market our Services Personalize your experience
Provide personalized Services
Comply with Laws
Process information about your contacts
Communicate with you
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Card Networks and Payment Processors
Fraud prevention and identity verification agencies
Credit Reporting Agencies
Service Providers, other
Other Users in accordance with account settings
Linked Accounts
Partners and Merchants
Other third parties for business purposes
Buyers in connection with a business transfer
Commercial information
Provide Services
Communicate with you
Manage and improve our Services
Manage fraud and risk
Market our Services
Comply with Laws
Remember your preferences
Associate information about you
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Partners and Merchants
Other third parties
Buyers or in connection with business transfer
Other Users if you have a business profile
Geolocation Data
Send you location-based options
Manage fraud and risk
Authorities
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Partners and Merchants
Internet or network activity
Operate and provide Services,
Communicate with you
Manage and improve Services
Market our Services
Send you locally relevant options
Comply with law
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Partners and Merchants
Authorities
Biometric
Authenticate you for certain actions related to your account, including to:
meet regulatory requirements or before you access accounts and services
recover passwords
update profile info
manage payments and payment methods
lift account limitations
initiate third-party crypto currency transfers
Service Providers
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information
Provide Services
Authenticate your access to an account or Fastlane profile
Manage and improve Services
Manage fraud and risk
Service Providers
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Professional or employment information
Provide Services
Manage fraud and risk
Service Providers
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Information about your imported contacts
Provide Services
Service Providers
Information in your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile
Provide Services
Service Providers
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Other financial institutions
Information you provide when you contact us
Provide Services
Authenticate your access to an account or Fastlane profile
Manage and improve Services
Manage fraud and risk
Service Providers
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Inferred data
Provide Services
Manage fraud and risk
Market our Services
Display content based on your interest
Better respond to your requests or inquiries or for similar customer service issues
Verify your identity
Conduct risk assessment
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Sensitive Personal Information
Provide Services
Manage fraud and risk
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
Buyers or in connection with business transfer
Characteristics of Protected Classifications
Provide our Services
Manage risk
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Authorities
Information from your device
Provide Services
Manage and improve our Services
Manage fraud and risk
Communicate with you
Link an account
Market our Services
Personalize your experience
Comply with laws
PayPal and PayPal Companies
Service Providers
Other financial institutions
Merchants and Partners
Authorities
US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and uses PayPal Services for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
This Consumer Privacy Notice does not apply to Unbranded Payment Services.
Rev. November 2024
FACTS
WHAT DOES PAYPAL DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information. Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing. Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information. Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
Social Security number and account balances
Payment history or transaction history
Credit history or credit scores
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers’ personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers’ personal information; the reasons PayPal chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does PayPal share?
Can you limit this sharing?
For our everyday business purposes –
such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes –
to offer our products and services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates’ everyday business purposes –
information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates’ everyday business purposes –
information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you
Yes for PayPal accounts Only
No for all other GLBA covered products and services (including Fastlane)
Yes for PayPal accounts Only. We don’t share for all other GLBA covered products and services (including Fastlane)
Questions?
Call our customer service at 1-888-221-1161or visit us at
/smarthelp/contact-us/privacy
.
To limit our sharing
To limit our sharing
You may limit our sharing by logging into you PayPal account and editing your preferences in the Data and Privacy setting.
Please note:
If you are an existing PayPal customer who had a PayPal account before November 27, 2024, we only share personal information collected after November 27, 2024, unless you opt-out. We may share information from earlier in your account, which allows for even better personalization, if you affirmatively consent by editing your preferences in your Data and Privacy settings.
If you are a customer who opened a PayPal account after November 27, 2024, we can begin sharing information associated with your account. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
Who we are
Who is providing this Privacy
Statement
?
This privacy notice is provided by PayPal, Inc. and is applicable to your personal U.S. PayPal and Xoom accounts, and Fastlane profile.
What we do
How does PayPal protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access and use, we use security measures that comply with federal law. These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.
How does PayPal collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
open an account or provide account information
use your credit or debit card or give us your contact information
use your PayPal and/or Xoom account to send or receive funds
We also collect your personal information from others, such as credit bureaus, affiliates, or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
affiliates from using your information to market to you
sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See below for more information on your rights under state law.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
Our affiliates include Bill Me Later, Inc.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between nonaffiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
Our joint marketing partners include financial companies and banks.
Other important information
We may transfer Personal Information to other countries, for example, for customer service or to process transactions.
California:
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (CCPA) permits consumers who are California residents to ask businesses covered under the CCPA about Personal Information it has collected about the consumer, submit an access or deletion request, and opt-out of the sale of Personal Information, if applicable. These provisions do not apply to personal information collected, processed, shared, or disclosed by financial institutions pursuant to federal law such as the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act. Please see our
California, North Dakota, and Vermont Supplemental Financial Privacy Notice
for more information. Contact us if you have questions about our privacy statement, this consumer notice, or your Personal Information. If your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile has a California mailing address, we will not share Personal Information we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.
To talk about your PayPal account, call PayPal Customer Service at 1-888-221-1161 or visit our
Customer Service web portal
. To talk about your Xoom account, call Xoom Customer Service at 1-877-815-1531 or visit our
Help Center web portal
. To talk about your Fastlane profile, call PayPal Customer Service at 1-844-705-3555 or visit your
Fastlane profile management portal
.
Vermont
: If your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile has a Vermont mailing address, We will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures. Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found at
Customer Service web portal
or call 1-888-221-1161
Nevada
: If your PayPal or Xoom account or Fastlane profile has a Nevada mailing address, we are providing this notice pursuant to Nevada law. If you prefer not to receive marketing calls from PayPal, you may be placed on our internal Do Not Call List by calling 1-888-221-1161 or going to
/smarthelp/home
. For more information, you can contact PayPal at 12312 Port Grace Blvd, La Vista, NE 68128 or you can contact the Bureau of Consumer Protection, Office of the Nevada Attorney General, 555 E. Washington St., Suite 3900, Las Vegas, NV 89101; telephone number: 1-702-486-3132; email: Aginfo@ag.nv.gov
Sub-policy 2
https://squareup.com/legal/privacy:
JavaScript is required for full functionality of this site.
Learn how to enable JavaScript in your web browser
General
Privacy Notice for Square Sellers and Website Visitors
Effective Date: July 1, 2024
This Privacy Notice describes how your Square entity as indicated below (“Square,” “we” and “us”) collects, uses, discloses, transfers, stores, retains or otherwise processes your information when you (whether you are a person acting as a sole proprietor or on behalf of another business entity) visit our website
(www.squareup.com)
or apply or sign up for a Square account (collectively, “Services”).
If you are a consumer shopping at a business that uses Square, please refer instead to the Privacy Notice available
here
. If you are a consumer shopping at a business that uses Square and you provide information to Square in order to receive a digital receipt and email marketing messages, and/or you have signed up to use Square Pay, please refer to the Privacy Notice available
here
.
If your Country of Residence is the United States, your Square entity is Block, Inc., 1955 Broadway, Suite 600, Oakland, CA 94612, United States.
If your Country of Residence is Canada, your Square entity is Square Canada, Inc. or Square Technologies, Inc.
If your Country of Residence is Japan, your Square entity is Square KK.
If your Country of Residence is Australia, your Square entity is Square AU PTY, Ltd.
If your Country of Residence is within the European Union, your Square entity is Squareup International Ltd.
If your Country of Residence is the United Kingdom, your Square entity is Squareup Europe Ltd.
The full contact details for each of these entities are available at the end of this Privacy Notice.
Our Privacy Notice explains:
INFORMATION WE COLLECT ABOUT YOU
INFORMATION WE COLLECT ABOUT YOUR CUSTOMERS
WHEN AND WITH WHOM WE SHARE YOUR INFORMATION
SECURITY
COOKIES & OTHER SIMILAR TECHNOLOGIES
HOW LONG WE RETAIN YOUR INFORMATION
YOUR CHOICES
CHILDREN’S PERSONAL INFORMATION
ADDITIONAL COUNTRY DISCLOSURES
-
EU/UK
-
AUSTRALIA
-
JAPAN
-
UNITED STATES
CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY NOTICE
HOW TO CONTACT US
INFORMATION WE COLLECT ABOUT YOU
We collect information about you in three ways: (i) when you provide it to us directly; (ii) when we gather information while you are using the Services; and (iii) when we collect information from other sources. We explain below what types of data are involved in each case, how and why we process (use) it and the lawful basis that applies to our use of the relevant information.
Information You Provide (“Square Account Data”)
Below is a description of the types of information that we may receive directly from you which we refer to as “
Square Account Data
”:
Types of Information
("Square Account Data")
Examples
Financial Information
Bank account information and payment card numbers
Tax Information
Withholding allowances and tax filing status
Identity Information
Name, email address, postal address, signature, and phone number;
Passport number, driver's license number, Social Security number, Taxpayer Identification number, or other government-issued identification number;
Where additional verification is required and where you choose to share such information, photo identification, such as your passport or driver’s license in combination with a photograph facial scan and biometrics extracted from such image or other documents proving your identity or place of residence, including financial account statements, phone or utility bills.
Contacts Information
When you use any of our Services, such as Square Invoices, to send or receive payments, we may ask you to provide the contact details, such as the address, email address, or phone number of the intended recipient. You can do this by manually entering this information into the Services.
When you interact with the Services through your mobile phone, you can choose to let us access and upload your phone contacts information. You can update your settings to stop sharing your phone contacts with us at any time, although we may still need a recipient’s phone or email address to submit or receive payments as requested by you.
Any other data you give us
Information that you voluntarily provide to us, including your survey responses; participation in contests, promotions, or other prospective seller marketing forms or devices; suggestions for improvements; information disclosed to the chatbots that operate on our Services; referrals; or any other actions you perform on the Services.
Here is an explanation of what we do with the Square Account Data described above, i.e. how we use it and for what purposes, along with an explanation of the lawful basis that supports this use.
How we use Square Account Data
Why we process Square Account Data
Legal Justification
When you make a request to receive information about Square or our products we collect Identity Information that you provide to us.
To respond to your request, including determining whether the Services are available in your country.
Pre-contract performance
We use your Identification Information and your Financial Information to go through our identity or account verification process and to enable you to authenticate into your account once it is created.
We share your Identification Information with identity verification vendors, including credit reporting agencies, wireless carriers, and others, to verify information that we collect. Our vendors cross-check the identity and financial data you give us. Your information is also screened against relevant sanctions watchlists.
To determine whether the Services are available in your country and to create your account with us and to meet our AML, "know your customer", background checking (see further below) and other compliance requirements.
Legal obligation. For example, "Know your Customer" and AML compliance requirements are governed by, among other laws, the Bank Secrecy Act (1970) (USA), the USA Patriot Act (2001) (USA), the Proceeds of Crime (Money Laundering) and Terrorist Financing Act and associated regulations (S.C. 2000, Canada), EU Directive 2015/849 (AMLD IV) on anti-money laundering and terrorist financing, EU Directive 2018/843 (AMLD V) on anti-money laundering and terrorist financing and EU Member State implementing legislation such as the Criminal Justice (Money Laundering and Terrorist Financing) Act 2010 (as amended) (Ireland).
We use your Identification Information to deliver the information and support you request, including to deliver
      technical notices, security alerts, and support and administrative messages to you. We also use it to resolve
      disputes, collect payments or fees, and provide assistance for problems with our Services or your Square account.
To communicate with you to fulfill our obligations under the
Terms of Service
.
Contractual performance
When you apply or sign up for a Square account or other Services, we collect all of the Square Account Data necessary to create your account and enable you to start fulfilling transactions.
To create and support your account with us, including displaying your transaction history including monthly account statements.
Contractual performance
When you use the Services to send or receive payments, we may require Contacts Information, such as the sender or recipient’s email address or phone number to fulfill the transaction.
To process the payments that you send or receive and to prevent the risk that payments may be misdirected.
Contractual performance
If you choose to let us access and upload Contacts Information directly from your mobile phone, we may use this information to make it easier for you to find the people you want to send payments to, for account and identity verification and fraud prevention purposes, to reduce the risk you will send payments to the wrong person, or to provide other personalized services.
To improve your customer experience, to protect the integrity of our Services, to prevent misdirected payments, and to help personalize the Services to you.
Consent
We use your Identification Information to send you surveys and get your feedback about our Services.
To understand if the Services are helpful to you and to evaluate the effectiveness of any updates we provide.
Legitimate interest
We use your Identification Information to promote our products and Services to you.
To promote our products and services.
Legitimate interest or consent (where legally required for direct marketing contact).
When you provide feedback to us or answer our surveys.
To improve our services and to develop new products and services.
Legitimate interest
We use your Identification Information to personalise your use of our Services, for example, when you sign up for a Square account, we can associate certain information with your new account, such as information about other Square accounts you have had or currently have, and prior transactions you have made using our Services.
To improve your customer experience.
Legitimate interest and/or contractual performance.
Information We Collect From Your Use of the Services
We also get data from the devices you use when you interact with our systems, like your location or information about the device you’re using. We refer to this as Usage Data.
Types of Informaton
("Usage Data")
Examples
Commercial Information
Information about the products and services you sell e.g., inventory, pricing and other data.
Information about your payment transactions e.g., when and where the transactions occur, a description of  the transactions, the payment or transfer amounts, billing and shipping information, and payment methods used to complete the transactions.
Location data, which includes the location of your device, and may in some circumstances include precise geolocation data
For more information and to learn how to disable collection of location information from your mobile device, please see below.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Web browser and device characteristics.
Information about how you use and interact with our Services.
This includes your access time, "log-in" and "log-out" information, browser type and language, the domain name of your internet service provider, other attributes about your browser, any specific page you visit on our platform, content you view, features you use, the date and time of your use of the Services, your search terms, and the website you visited before you visited or used the Services.
Online identifiers
Information you use to log in to your account.
Internet Protocol ("IP") address, and unique personal identifiers (including device identifier; cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers and similar technology; customer number; unique alias, and other identifiers).
Professional or employment-related information
Information you provide about your business (e.g., appointments, staffing availability, and contact data) and your employees (e.g., job titles, payroll information, and hours worked and other timecard data).
Profile information - Inferences drawn from any of the information above to create a profile about you
These may reflect your preferences, characteristics, and behavior. For example, if you use a product or service after receiving a marketing communication about it.
We need this Usage Data to do things like provide services to you that you have requested, fulfill our legal obligations (such as checking if payments are being made or received by you and that they are legally compliant), and help protect your account from hackers and prevent fraud. We also need this Usage Data to make our products and services better for you and others, as well as to develop new products and services. For example, if more transactions are occurring on a specific hardware device we will build out more product and service availability on that device.
How we use Usage Data
Why we process Usage Data
Legal Justification
We collect your Commercial Information from the devices you use when you interact with our systems and from the information that is associated with the transaction as captured on our databases.
This enables us to provide services to you that you have requested including inventory, eCommerce and payments processing.
This also enables us to protect the integrity of our Services and systems, and your, our, our customers', or your customers' rights or property.
This also enables us to do internal research, measure, track, and analyze trends and usage, to improve our products and services, and, in the United States, to provide our products and services when instructed by your customers.
Contract performance
Legitimate
      Interests
Legitimate Interests
We use your Commercial Information when you interact with our systems and when it is associated with a transaction. We combine this information with Identification Information as well as with risk signals.
This enables us to debug, fix service errors, investigate, detect, prevent, report or recover from fraud, misrepresentations, security breaches or incidents, other potentially  prohibited, malicious, or illegal activities; or to otherwise help protect your account, including to dispute chargebacks on your behalf.
Contract performance (support and maintenance)
Legal obligation (fraud or incident reporting)
Legitimate interest (protect your account)
We may use your Commercial Information in connection with artificial intelligence technologies to generate personalized features for your business.
This enables us to provide the Services that you have requested that utilize these technologies.
Contract Performance
We collect your Internet or other electronic network activity information while you are using the Services using our website, web apps, and hardware and we combine this with your Profile Information.
This enables us to provide Services to you in compliance with regulatory obligations.
This enables us to provide Services to identify any unusual activity on your account so as to detect and prevent fraud, and to debug and fix errors that impair how our Services function.
Legal obligation (fraud or incident reporting)
Contract performance
Legitimate interest
We store your Professional or employment-related information in our databases.
This enables us to deliver aspects of the Services (e.g., Team Management, Crew App and Payroll) that require this level of information to function.
Contract performance
We generate your Profile Information using our databases. We use your Profile Information to verify your identity, and to enhance our Services.
This enables us to engage in profiling and automated processing to verify your identity both directly and through the use of third party identification verification services (so we can confirm you appear to be who you say you are), improve our products and Services and develop new products and Services.
Our legitimate interests in verifying your identity and reducing the risk of fraud, as well as, where permissible, offering new and improved services to our customers that are likely to be relevant to their business in light of their Seller activity and the systems and processes they use.
We use your Geolocation data to determine whether we can provide you with Services and to customise our Services to your location.
This enables us to determine whether we can provide Services to you, and in what language, enables us to comply with applicable payment processor requirements, and other regulatory requirements, and also to combat fraud.
Contract performance (for Services in territories where we are authorised to conduct our business)
Legal obligation (to comply with territorial restrictions)
Information We Collect from Other Sources
We also need to check that you are eligible for the services you want to use, are using our services legally, and to protect your data and our services from potential fraudulent activity  which may put you and your money at risk. To do this, we may collect data about you from companies that help us verify your identity, do a credit check, prevent fraud or assess risk.
Types of Information
("External Data)"
Examples
Background Check Information
Credit report information.
Identity verification information.
Information about any person or corporation with whom you have had, currently have, or may have a financial
          relationship.
Credit, Compliance and Fraud Information
Account or credit-related information with any credit reporting agency or credit bureau, where lawful, and any person or corporation with whom you have had, currently have, or may have a financial relationship, including without limitation past, present, and future places of employment, financial institutions, wireless carriers, and personal reporting agencies.
How we use External Data
Why we process External Data
Legal Justification
We collect Background Check Information about you from background check vendors and we process this information using our anti-fraud and risk management systems.
This helps us verify your identity, do a credit check, prevent fraud and assess risk.
Legal obligation Legitimate interest
We receive and exchange Credit, Compliance and Fraud Information using our credit management systems and processes.
As required under applicable laws, as part of any credit investigation, credit eligibility, identity or account verification process, fraud or risk detection process, or collection procedure.
Legal obligation Legitimate interest
INFORMATION WE COLLECT ABOUT YOUR CUSTOMERS
We also obtain information about your customers on your behalf as your service provider when they transact with you or otherwise when you request that we do so. We call this information Your Customers’ Data. We collect Your Customers’ Data when they interact with you through your use of Square’s products, for instance when they make a payment at your establishment, or schedule an appointment, or receive an invoice from you. The particular Customer Data we collect will vary depending on your location, which products and services you use and how you use them. Your Customers’ Data may include:
Types of Information
("Your Customers' Data")
Examples
Customer Device Information
Information about your customer's device, including hardware model, operating system and version, device name, unique device identifier, mobile network information, and information about the device's interaction with our Services.
Customer Financial Information
Bank account and payment card numbers.
Customer Identification Information
Your customers' name; email address; mailing address; phone number; government-issued identification; or other historical, contact, and demographic information, and signature.
Customer Location Information
The location of your customer's device if they pay with Apple or Android Pay, or give their consent.
Customer Transaction Information
When your customers use Square to make or record payments to you, we collect information about when and where the transactions occur, the names of the transacting parties, a description of the transactions which may include item-level data, the payment or transfer amounts, billing and shipping information, and the devices and payment methods used to complete the transactions.
Customer Use Information
Information about how your customers interact with you using our Services, including access time, "log-in" and "log-out" information, browser type, history and language, country and language setting on your device, IP address, the domain name of your customer's Internet service provider, other attributes about your customer's browser, mobile device and operating system, features your customer uses, and the date and time of use of the Services.
Other Information You or Your Customers Provide
Information that your customers voluntarily provide you, or that you input into Square's systems about your customers
For example, survey responses; participation in contests, promotions, or other prospective seller marketing forms or devices; suggestions for improvements; notes you take about your customers, or any other actions performed when they interact with you using Square
We use Your Customers’ Data as part of our contractual obligation to provide the Services you request to you and, in the United States, as disclosed in the
Privacy Notice for Users Who Do Not Apply or Sign Up for a Square Account or Other Services
, or as instructed by your customers.
It is your responsibility to obtain any necessary permission for us to use Your Customers’ Data in the manner envisaged in this Privacy Notice so that we can provide you with the Services requested by you.
WHEN AND WITH WHOM WE SHARE YOUR INFORMATION
We may share the personal information described in the
“Information We Collect About You”
section with the following categories of service providers and third parties:
Category of third parties with whom we share your personal information in order
      for you to receive the Services
Description of the services in question
Service support partners
We work with the following types of third party service providers who help us provide, maintain and improve the
      Services:
Technology providers or potential partners to store information, provide software, or programs to help us provide the Services;
Marketing or event providers that help us run our advertising campaigns, contests, special offers, or other events or activities;
Identity verification providers to help us with fraud prevention and to assist us in meeting our AML, "know your customer", background checking and other compliance requirements;
Fee collection service providers to help us enforce our legal rights;
Financial partners, like financial institutions, payment networks, payment card associations, and credit bureaus that help us provide the Services.
Third Party Analytics Services
Our analytics partners help us with our online services, such as Google Analytics,
      Facebook, BugSnag and Crashlytics. The analytics providers that administer these services use technologies such as
      cookies, web beacons, and web server logs to help us analyze how you use our online services. We may disclose your
site-use information
(including IP address) to these analytics providers, and other service providers who use the information to help us figure out how you and others use our online services.
To learn more about Google Analytics and how to opt out, please visit
          https://marketingplatform.google.com/about/ or https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/181881?hl=e
To learn more about how Facebook uses your data please visit https://www.facebook.com/help/325807937506242/ or log on to your Facebook account and access your settings. To understand more about Facebook advertising please see here https://www.facebook.com/about/ads.
To learn more about BugSnag, please visit https://docs.bugsnag.com/legal/privacy-policy/.
To learn more about Crashlytics, please visit https://fabric.io/terms.
Online Tracking and Interest-Based Advertising
While we do not sell personal information as that term is commonly understood, we have, “sold or shared” over the last 12 months Usage Data for the purpose of interest-based advertising (or “targeted advertising”) as described below. You can exercise your right to opt-out of targeted advertising by clicking the “Do Not Share My Personal Information” link in the footer of any page on our browser site, or by enabling the Global Privacy Control or a similar opt-out preference setting within the browser you use to access our website.
Consistent with local law, we and our advertising partners may collect information about  your activities on our website. We use this information to advertise to you and to tailor our products and services to your interests. You may see certain ads on other websites because we use third-party services to advertise our services to you. We use these services to target our ads to you and others based on your demographics, interests, and context. These third party ad services track your online activities over time and across multiple websites by collecting your information through automated technologies, including third-party cookies, web server logs, and web beacons. The ad services use this information to show you Square ads that may be tailored to your individual interests. The information our ad services may collect on our behalf includes data about your visits to websites that serve Square ads, such as the pages or ads you view and the actions you take on those websites. This data collection takes place both on our online services, and on third-party websites that serve our ads to you. This process also helps us figure out if our ads to you are effective.
To learn about how to opt out of interest-based advertising (sometimes referred to as "targeted advertising") in the U.S., see "Cookies And Other Similar Technologies" and the "United States" sections below.
To adjust your preferences on interest based advertising in the EU, click on the link on our website to the Cookies Policy which will allow you to adjust your settings preferences.
Certain web browsers allow you to instruct your browser to respond to Do Not Track ("DNT") signals to website you visit, informing those sites that you do not want your online activities to be tracked. At this time, our websites are not designed to respond to DNT signals or similar mechanisms from browsers.
Partners
We may share minimal personal information (such as your business name) with potential partners who may be able to provide a complementary or related service for your business.  We may also share personal information with partners if we believe the disclosure is reasonably necessary to protect us, users of our Services or the public from harm, fraud, or potentially prohibited or illegal activities.
We work with partners who may receive compensation for helping us to identify prospective Sellers interested in Square. If you were referred to Square by one of our referral partners, we may share limited commercial information related to your use of Square, such as the date you activated your account and the volume of transactions you process through Square, to provide reporting on the referral fees earned by the partner that referred you.
Our Affiliates and Group Companies
With other business units (Cash App, Afterpay/Clearpay, and TIDAL) and between wholly-owned subsidiaries of Block, Inc. For example, we may share your information internally to understand how you engage with our company products to help make our Services better for you and for everyone, to help us build Services tailored to your preferences, and to help protect our services and maintain a trusted environment.
Other third parties who will receive your personal information
Why we share data with these parties
Other users of our Services with whom you interact through your own use of our Services.
To enable you to make or accept a payment, appointment, or money transfer using our Services.
Law enforcement and other public and private agencies
If we believe that disclosure is reasonably necessary (i) to comply with any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request (e.g., from creditors, tax authorities, law enforcement agencies, in response to a garnishment, levy, or lien notice, etc.); (ii) to establish, exercise or defend our legal rights; (iii) to enforce or comply with our [General Terms](https://squareup.com/ie/en/legal/general/ua) or other applicable agreements or policies; (iv) to protect our or our customers' rights or property, or the security or integrity of our Services;  (v) for an investigation of suspected or actual illegal activity; or (vi) to protect us, users of our Services or the public from harm, fraud, or potentially prohibited or illegal activities.
To a subsequent owner, co-owner, or operator of one or more of the Services
To enable them to continue to run the Services after the change of owner or operator.
If we do or try to do a corporate merger, consolidation, or restructuring (including during due diligence and negotiation of these); the sale of substantially all of our stock and/or assets; the financing, acquisition, divestiture, or dissolution of all or a portion of our business; or other corporate change.
To enable the completion of the relevant merger, restructuring, financing, acquisition, divestiture, dissolution or other corporate change.
To others, at your direction
To carry out certain requests you make for us to share data.
SECURITY
We do a lot to keep your data safe. While we think we have strong defenses in place, no one can ever guarantee that hackers won’t be able to break into our sites or steal your data while it is stored or flowing from you to us or vice versa.
We take reasonable measures, including administrative, technical, and physical safeguards, to protect your information from loss, theft, and misuse, and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction. Nevertheless, the internet is not a 100% secure environment, and we cannot guarantee absolute security of the transmission or storage of your information. We hold information about you both at our own premises and with the assistance of third-party service providers. Your personal information will be accessible by our employees, contractors and service providers who require access for the purposes described in this Privacy Notice.
For more information about our security practices, please visit
https://squareup.com/ie/en/security
.
COOKIES, OTHER SIMILAR TECHNOLOGIES, AND ADVERTISING
If you are reading this Privacy Notice in a country where we have a separate Cookies Policy, you will see the Cookie Banner that applies to you each time you visit the site.
The following additional information applies across all of our websites and apps.
Digital cookies and similar technologies help us make our services better to use by doing things like recognizing when you’ve signed in, analyzing how you use our services so we can make them more useful to you, giving you a more personalized experience.
When you interact with our online services, or open emails we send you, we obtain certain information using automated technologies, such as cookies, web server logs, web beacons and other technologies. A “cookie” is a text file that websites send to a visitor’s computer or other internet-connected device to uniquely identify the visitor’s browser or to store information or settings in the browser. A “web beacon,” also known as an internet tag, pixel tag, or clear GIF, is a tiny graphic image that may be used in our websites or emails.
We use these automated technologies to collect your device information, internet activity information, and inferences as described above. These technologies help us to:
Remember your information so you do not have to re-enter it;
Track and understand how you use and interact with our online services and emails;
Tailor our online services to your preferences;
Measure how useful and effective our services and communications are to you; and
Otherwise manage and enhance our products and services.
We set some of these automated technologies ourselves, but others are set by third parties who deliver services on our behalf. For example, we may use other companies’ web analytics services (described in the
“Third-Party Analytics Services”
section above), which use automated technologies to help us evaluate how customers use our websites.  Some of these technologies may also be set by third parties that help us advertise our products and services to you as informed by your interests, based on information collected from your activity on the web, including but not limited to, browsing or purchasing products on or through our websites or on third party websites or your activity on mobile sites and applications. This advertising approach is called interest-based advertising or “targeted advertising.”
Your browser can alert you when cookies are placed on your device, and how you can stop or disable them via your browser settings. More information on how to manage these settings on common browsers and devices are below.
Manage cookie settings in
Chrome
and
Chrome Android
and
Chrome iOS
Manage cookie settings in
Firefox
Manage cookie settings in
Internet Explorer
Manage cookie settings in
Microsoft Edge
Manage cookie settings in
Safari
and
Safari iOS
Please note, however, that without cookies all of the features of our online services may not work properly. If you use a mobile device, you can manage how your device and browser share certain device data by changing the privacy and security settings on your mobile device.
Within mobile applications, you may also go to your device settings and select “Limit Ad Tracking” (for iOS devices), or “Opt out of Interest-Based Ads” (for Android devices), which will allow you to limit our use of information collected from or about your mobile device (such as precise location data) for the purposes of serving online behavioral advertising to you.
You can also opt out of receiving interest-based ads from third party advertisers who are members of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) or who follow the Digital Advertising Alliance’s (DAA) Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising by visiting the opt out pages on the
NAI website
and
DAA website
.
Please also see the “Your Choices” section for other ways to opt-out of interest-based or targeted advertising.
HOW LONG WE RETAIN YOUR INFORMATION
We store your information for as long as is necessary for the purposes identified in this Privacy Notice, including to provide our Services, to comply with legal obligations, to enforce and prevent violations of our Terms, to protect against  fraudulent activity, and to defend our legal rights, property and users.
The retention periods for your information are determined on a case-by-case basis that depends on the following factors:
The nature of the information and why it is collected and processed.
The length of time we will keep your information will generally be determined by how long we need that information to provide you with our Services, including any optional features you use and to provide customer support. For example:
- As set out in this Privacy Notice, we require Square Account Data to deliver our Services. We need to keep it for the duration your Square account exists so that we can maintain your account.
- Similarly, we will also keep your Usage Data for the lifetime of your account.
Legal reasons.
In certain cases, we are obliged to keep your information for legal reasons, which may include after your account has been deactivated. We will keep your information where it necessary for us:
- To respond to a legal request or to comply with applicable law. We must keep your information where we have a legal obligation to do so, for example, if we receive a valid legal request, such as a preservation order or search warrant, related to your account, we preserve your information after you delete your account.
- To deal with and resolve requests, disputes or complaints.
- For litigation or regulatory matters. For example, we preserve your information related to a legal claim or complaint, such as where we are subject to a regulatory investigation or we need to defend ourselves in legal proceedings about a claim related to your information or respond to a regulator in relation to a legal or regulatory complaint made by you or someone else.
- Issues relating to the safety, security and integrity of our Services and to protect rights, property and users. For example, we keep information where it is necessary to investigate misuse of our Services, such as fraud.
YOUR CHOICES
As described further below, you may be entitled to certain rights with respect to your personal information. You can also
see, change or fix information
you gave us, ask us to
deactivate
your account, control your
location information
, or
opt out of receiving promotional messages from us
.
Your Personal Information Rights
Depending on the jurisdiction in which you reside, you may be entitled under applicable law to request:
Access to your personal information in a portable format, including: (1) the categories of personal information described above that we have collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such personal information; (2) the business or commercial purposes for collecting or sharing such personal information; (3) the categories of personal information about you that we have disclosed to third parties for a business purpose; (4) the categories of third parties to whom we have disclosed such personal information; and (5) the specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you.
Deletion of the personal information we have collected from you;
Correction of the personal information we have collected about you;
To opt-out of the sharing of your personal information for purposes of targeted advertising.
You may submit an access, deletion, or correction request through our dedicated online portal at
privacy.block.xyz
(for Sellers: click the Square logo and then select “Business owner” on the “What type of data are you looking to manage?” page; for Buyers: click the Square logo and then select “Customer”) or by calling us at 1.844.213.7377. Once we receive your request, we will verify it by requesting that you confirm certain personal information associated with your account. You may also be entitled to submit a request through an authorized agent. You may also message us through
privacy.block.xyz
(click on the Square logo and then select “Other” on the “What type of data are you looking to manage?” page) to appeal our denial of any of your access, deletion, or correction requests.
You can exercise your right to opt-out of targeted advertising by clicking the “Opt Out of Interest-Based Advertising” link in the footer of any page on our browser site.
Although some of the information we collect and process about you may be considered sensitive personal information, we only process such information for purposes authorized by law, such as to provide services you request from us or to verify your information.
Deactivating Your Account
If you wish to deactivate your account, you can do so by logging into your Square account or by emailing us using the contact details
provided below
.
Location Information
In order to provide certain Services, we may request access to location information, including precise geolocation information collected from your device. If you do not consent to the collection of this information, certain Services will not function properly and you will not be able to use those Services. You can stop our collection of location information at any time by changing the preferences on your mobile device. If you do so, some of our mobile applications will no longer function. You also may stop our collection of location information via mobile application by following the standard uninstall process to remove all Square mobile applications from your device.
Promotional Communications
You can opt out of receiving promotional messages from Square by following the instructions in those messages, by informing the caller that you would not like to receive future promotional calls, or by changing your notification settings by logging into your Square account. You may only opt out of text messages from Square by replying STOP. Opting out of receiving communications may impact your use of the Services. If you decide to opt out, we will still send you non-promotional communications which are required for the running of your account, such as digital receipts and messages about your account or our ongoing business relations.
CHILDREN’S PERSONAL INFORMATION
Our Services are general audience services not directed at children under the age of 18. We do not knowingly collect, share, or sell any information from children under the age of 18. If we learn that any information we collect has been provided by a child under the age of 18, we will promptly delete that information.
ADDITIONAL JURISDICTIONAL DISCLOSURES
EU/UK
Personal Information
If you reside in the EU or the UK, you have the right under certain circumstances:
to be provided with access to your personal data held by us;
to request the rectification or erasure of your personal data held by us;
to request that we cease processing your data;
to request that we restrict the processing of your personal data (while we verify or investigate your concerns with this information, for example);
to object to profiling activities based on our own legitimate interests;
to object to solely automated processing producing legal or similar effects;
to request that your data be transferred to a third party (data portability);
to withdraw your consent to our processing of your data (where such processing is based on consent); and
to lodge a complaint with the data protection authority in your jurisdiction.
In order to exercise any of these rights (including the right to withdraw your consent), please email privacy-eu@squareup.com. We may need to verify your identity before granting access or otherwise changing or correcting your information.
International Data Transfers
We operate in many countries, and we (or our service providers) may move your data and process it outside the country where you live. We use third-party service providers to process and store your information in the United States, Japan, the EU, and other countries. When we transfer your personal data to our affiliates outside the EU, we make use of standard contractual clauses (which have been approved by the European Commission) to help ensure your information is afforded a high standard of protection, and that your privacy rights can be vindicated. For a list of the countries in which we operate, please see https://squareup.com/gb/about.
If you wish to obtain further details regarding the contractual arrangements we enter into  to protect your personal data when it is transferred outside the EU, you may do so by emailing us via privacy-eu@squareup.com. You can also access the standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission at: https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection/standard-contractual-clauses-scc_en.
AUSTRALIA
Square complies with the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth)(
Privacy Act
) and with the 13 Australian Privacy Principles (
APPs
) in the Privacy Act, as well as with this Privacy Policy.
We may share your information with Cuscal Limited, an Authorised Deposit-Taking Institution (ADI) supervised by the Australian Prudential Regulation Authority (APRA). Cuscal supports our provision of the Services through its banking and payments services and may not be able to provide its services without information about you. Cuscal’s privacy policy is available via www.cuscal.com.au/privacy-policy and sets out details about Cuscal’s collection, use and disclosure of information about you, as well as information about your rights to access your personal information.
JAPAN
We may share your information with a third party outside of Japan, including, but not limited to, the United States, Canada, the EU, and in other countries. We may use some cloud service providers located in the United States and Japan. We are unable to specify all possible jurisdictions Personal Data of users of Square services in Japan would be transferred or stored, as service providers use multiple servers located in multiple jurisdictions and do not disclose all of these locations for security reasons.
You may contact our privacy team with any requests of disclosure, correction, or deletion of your personal information. You may also request suspension of use or suspension of sharing of your personal information with certain third parties. Please contact our privacy team at the address listed below under “Contact.” We may request to verify your identity before processing your request.
UNITED STATES
California
Privacy laws that apply in certain places, like California, treat “businesses” and “service providers” differently. Under those laws, a business is the company that decides why and how to process personal information. A service provider processes personal information on behalf of a business in order to provide services. When Square processes Your Customers’ Data, we generally act as your service provider. In select cases, however, we may act as a business when we process Your Customers’ Data. For example, we act as a business when we use Your Customers’ Data to send your customers digital receipts directly from Square, or when we allow you to use Customer Directory or Square Marketing to contact your buyer using a masked email address (for example, j*****@gmail.com) that gets routed to them via Square. Your customers can visit the
Privacy Notice for Square Buyer Features
for more information on how Square processes their data when it is acting as a business.
Even though you use our services while acting as an employee, owner, director, officer, or contractor of a company, partnership, sole proprietor of a business, nonprofit, or government agency, if you live in California, California law gives you the right to ask if we disclose your personal information to third parties for their direct marketing purposes (we do not disclose your personal information for others’ direct marketing purposes).
Please see
CCPA Privacy Requests Metrics
for details on the number of Access, Deletion, and Do Not Share My Information requests that we received and processed in the last year.
CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY NOTICE
We reserve the right to change this Privacy Notice from time to time, as may be required.  We will provide you with reasonable prior notice of any material changes in how we use your information, including by email if you have provided one. If you disagree with these changes, you may cancel your account at any time. Any amendments will be published by posting a revised version of the Privacy Notice and updating the “Effective Date” above. The revised version will be effective on the “Effective Date” listed.
CONTACT
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Notice, please reach out to us by contacting your country specific privacy contact below:
United States
Block, Inc.
1955 Broadway, Suite 600, Oakland, CA 94612,
      U.S.A
privacy.block.xyz
European Union & the United Kingdom
FAO: Data Protection Officer
Squareup International Ltd.
Fumbally Square
Fumbally
      Lane
Dublin 8, Ireland
privacy-eu@squareup.com
If your request or concern is not satisfactorily resolved by us, you can contact your local data protection authority (see http://ec.europa.eu/justice/dataprotection/bodies/authorities/index_en.html).
Canada
Square Canada, Inc.
Square Technologies, Inc.
5000 Yonge Street,
Toronto, ON M2N 7E9,
      Canada
privacy.block.xyz
If you are dissatisfied with the results of our investigation or any resulting corrective measures, you may be entitled to make a written submission to the Privacy Commissioner in your jurisdiction or to the Office of the Privacy Commissioner of Canada at the address below:
Office of the Privacy Commissioner of Canada
30 Victoria Street Gatineau, Quebec
K1A 1H3
https://www.priv.gc.ca/en
Japan
Square, K.K.
Tri-Seven Roppongi 10F,
7-7, Roppongi, Minato-ku,
Tokyo, 106-0032,
      Japan
Representative Director: Akio Takisaki
privacy.block.xyz
Australia
Square AU PTY, Ltd.
Lv. 8, 376-390 Collins Street,
Melbourne, VIC 3000, Australia
privacy.block.xyz
If you are dissatisfied with our response to your complaint, you may be entitled to make a written submission to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner, whose contact details are as follows:
Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (OAIC)
Phone: 1300 363 992
Email: enquiries@oaic.gov.au
Address: GPO Box 5218 Sydney NSW 2001
General
Privacy Notice
Generative AI Terms
Terms of Service
Government
Additional Point of Sale Terms
Declaration of Conformity
Developer Terms of Service
Fee Schedule
Hardware Policies and Limited Warranty
Payment Terms
E-sign Consent
Square Buyer Account Terms of Use
Intellectual Property Policy
Choose your region and language
Australia (English)
Canada (English)
Canada (Français)
France (Français)
Ireland (English)
日本 (日本語)
España (Español)
Espanya (Català)
United Kingdom (English)
United States (English)
Estados Unidos (Español)
Australia (English)
Canada (English)
Canada (Français)
France (Français)
Ireland (English)
日本 (日本語)
España (Español)
Espanya (Català)
United Kingdom (English)
United States (English)
Estados Unidos (Español)
Sub-policy 3
http://www.learningservicesus.com/home/ls2/page_2/privacy_policy.html:
Toggle navigation
Menu
Log In
Search
0
Cart
Software & Curriculum
Applications
Art & Creativity
Business Education
Character Education
Classroom Management
Critical Thinking
Distance Learning
Early Learning
ELL
Homeschool Resources
Keyboarding / Typing Instruction
Language Arts / Reading
Math
Music Education
Online Curriculum
Science
Social Studies
Special Education
STEM/STEAM
EZ-Robot
Teacher Tools
World Languages
Hardware & Accessories
Charging Carts
Document Cameras
Headphones & Listening Centers
Interactive Whiteboards
Keyboards & Mice
Video Capture
Manufacturers
Software MacKiev
Communication Boards
SmartyEars
3Doodler
AbleNet Inc
Adobe
Attainment Company
Crick Software
EdAlive Central
fischertechnik education
Great Source
HearBuilder
Houghton Mifflin Harcourt
Learning Sciences
MUZZY Club
Pro-Ed Inc
Rigby
Saxon Math
Steck-Vaughn
Super Duper Publications
Typing Pal Online
Acoustica Inc
Andrea Electronics
AVID Education
CW Publications
EdAlive
Educational Insights
FableVision
Faronics
GoGuardian
Hand2Mind
Harmonic Vision
Help Me 2 Learn
Ingenuity Works
IPEVO
Learning Resources
Magix
Makey Makey
Marblesoft Simtech
Microspot
Modular Robotics
NetOp
NewPath Learning
Readorium
Rising Software
Spectrum
Speedskin
Sunburst
TechSmith
Track Technology Systems
Typing Agent
VIDBOX
Wanderful Interactive Storybooks
Wonder Workshop
Search
Privacy Policy
At Learning Services, we are committed to protecting your privacy. We use the information we collect to assist us in processing orders. Please read on for more details about our privacy policy.
The Information We Collect:
Learning Services collects from you the necessary information, such as name, email address, address and payment information, to process orders.
We Do Not Share Your Personal Information:
Learning Services does not sell, trade, or rent your personal information to others. This information is for our private records only. We restrict access to your orders to those employees who need to know that information to provide products or services to you. Personal information is not available to any third party via our website or through other means.
Spam Email and Use of Email Addresses:
We make every effort to minimize the amount of email correspondence you receive from us. We do not share or sell your email address to any third parties.
Use of Cookies:
Learning Services uses cookies to enhance your shopping and browsing experience and keep track of your order information. The cookies we use DO NOT store any personal information such as your e-mail address, street address or phone number.
Do you still have questions?
If you have additional questions or wish to further discuss details of our privacy policy, please feel free to
Contact Us
.
🍪 Accept Cookies & Privacy Policy?
We use cookies for analytics, advertising and to improve our site. You agree to our use of cookies by closing this message box or continuing to use our site.
More information
Select cookies to accept
Necessary
Site Preferences
Analytics
Marketing
Accept Cookies
Customise Cookies
Sub-policy 4
https://www.acutrack.com/privacy-policy:
Privacy Policy
Overview
Acutrack welcomes you to its website community.  The words (“Company”,” we”, “us”, and “our” refers to Acutrack Inc. If you have any question regards this privacy policy, kindly feel free to contact us at
t1support@acutrack.com
Acutrack is a service platform that offers software services in book production with a user content provision. You are urged to discontinue the use of this service if, at any point, you find us not keeping to our privacy policy. We hold your privacy dearest to us, that is why we have taken this medium to explain things to you in a more detailed manner for better understanding. Your continuation on this site indicates that you consent to the following agreement stated in this privacy policy.
TABLE OF CONTENTS
WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT?
HOW DO WE USE YOUR INFORMATION?
WILL YOUR INFORMATION BE SHARED WITH ANYONE?
DO WE USE COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES?
HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION?
HOW DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION SAFE?
DO WE COLLECT INFORMATION FROM MINORS?
WHAT ARE YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS?
CONTROLS FOR DO-NOT-TRACK FEATURES
DO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS HAVE SPECIFIC PRIVACY RIGHTS?
DO WE MAKE UPDATES TO THIS NOTICE?
ADDITIONAL FEES
THIRD-PARTY CARRIER CENTER
ANCILLARY, BROKERAGE, FUEL, AND BEYOND CHARGES.
HOW CAN YOU CONTACT US ABOUT THIS NOTICE?
WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT?
We generally collect the information you divulge to us. Though this information is personal, we hold it dearly to us not to release or trade your data to any third-party body. This information is gotten when you register on the site and also when you fill up a contact form when you reach out to us.
The personal information we get is in form of e-mail addresses, phone numbers, passwords, contact, etc. all information must unique and very correct. This is necessary because when our support staff is trying to work on your database, any error information you provide will result in Acutrack not processing further details anymore.
HOW DO WE USE YOUR INFORMATION?
You will be informed of what we do with your information. When we get your information, we process your information for business reasons and make sure it is in line with our compliance policy.
The information we get covers our processing stage of account creation and log-in processes. When you log into our website, you will see testimonials of people that have had a successful user experience with the site. Permission is always gotten before such things are being done. If we are going to do the same for you, your permission to post up your information will be gotten from you before uploading data such as your name, address, testimonial, and contact information.
Another reason to use your information is to send you administrative messages such as web updates, newsletters, and information about what you might need to know. So, we make use of the information that has been processed through us.
We also gather information from you so we can enforce our terms and conditions and legal issues that might arise as a result of things like a breach of contract. Also to fulfill orders which areas to be processed.
Accepting this means that you consent to us making use of your information to carry out these activities. For more information on what is being done to protect your privacy, kindly contact us by email at
t1support@acutrack.com
WILL YOUR INFORMATION BE SHARED WITH ANYONE?
We do not share your information with anyone. The only reason why we would share your information would have to be approved by you. We hold your data dearly to protect and secure your account with us.
Some major reasons might allow us to share your information. These reasons are noted in the following legal description below;
By Consent
: we will share your information only after you give us the consent to do so, and it will be given.
Legitimate interest
: for our legitimate benefit for our business, we may process your data only when it seems worthy enough to do that.
The basis of Contract:
for the sole benefit of fulfilling our obligation on our contract, we might be obliged to process your information.
Legal rights
: we may disclose your information only when it is legally okay to do that, and it applies to the laws guiding this agreement.
Concrete interest
: when policies are violated, it is our sole responsibility to process your information to prevent and protect accounts from getting into the hands of fraudulent suspects.
DO WE USE COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES?
One of our ways of tracking is by using cookies. The essence of using the cookie is to gather and save data (information) from tracking devices.
HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION?
There is no limit to how long we keep your information. It could be kept for as long as possible. It just has to comply with both laws that govern the agreement. There is no reason for your private information other than using it for accounting purposes and legal reasons.
We can delete or anonymize your data when we have no legitimate business binding us together. This will happen because, in our archives, we have your personal information stored up in our files. So, if for any reason there is a halt to the legal binding, it can be erased.
HOW DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION SAFE?
We aim to safeguard your data through an arrangement of hierarchical and specialized safety efforts. We have executed fitting, specialized, and hierarchical safety efforts intended to safeguard the security of any private data we process.
In any case, regardless of our means to safeguard your data and get access to your data, no electronic transmission over the Internet or data stockpiling innovation can be destined to be 100 percent secure, so we can’t assure that hackers, cyber-criminals, or other unapproved outsiders cannot guarantee our security, and inappropriately gather, access, take, or change your data.
We’ll do our best to protect your information, it is solely at your own risk to transmit personal information from our site. It is advised to secure your information when browsing using a protected channel.
DO WE COLLECT INFORMATION FROM MINORS?
We don’t purposely gather information from youngsters under 18 years old. We don’t intentionally request information from kids under 18 years old. By using the Website, you consent that you are above the age of 18 and you are the parent or watchman of such a minor and agree to such minor ward’s usage of the Website. Assuming we discover that individual data from a client under 18 years old has been gathered, we will deactivate the account and go to a reasonable length to erase such information from our records quickly.
WHAT ARE YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS?
It is important you understand your privacy rights appropriately depending on the country you are in. some countries especially in the European region allow you have more rights to your personal information. It is subjected to change, review, or termination at any time. Rights being exercised are in scenarios such as;
Access to obtaining a copy of your personal information.
Access to rectification.
Restriction on processing of your data.
Right to reject the processing of data from the site.
For more information on these things are being done, kindly contact us at
t1support@acutrack.com
with regards to the processing of information which seem to be a huge issue for most people, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time you wish to do so. On commencement, it will not affect the consent given to be acted upon by law regards consenting to the agreement.
For European Residents
You have every right to raise a complaint if you feel like we are unlawfully processing your information. If you want to raise a complaint, you should do so by contacting your local data protection supervisory authority. If you have questions or comments about your privacy rights, you may email us at
t1support@acutrack.com
for more information if you are a resident of the European countries where this might be an issue.
Review of Account Information
There are times you might need to review your account information for a change. You can always follow this process to update whatever information you want to update by following this process;
Log in to your account and click on settings
Update your user account or delete your account
On Account Termination
On account termination, once your request to terminate your account is received, your account will be terminated and deleted from all our databases. Note, that some files may still be within our system as a means of protection against fraud, system support, and investigations. This is done to enforce the agreement which bounds the Terms and conditions and legal agreement.
Cookies Policy
Most websites work with cookies to make the web experience have to either make customers continue using your website or quit. A lot of websites accept cookies by default. It is your choice if you want to accept cookies or reject the cookie. Choosing to remove cookies from your website affects the way your website works by affecting some common features.
Email Marketing
We know how you receive emails from various sources and how it can make you stay off your mailbox for some time. You can always choose to opt-out of receiving emails from us by clicking on the unsubscribe link in the emails we send to you. Once it is done, you will then be removed from the mailing list. To otherwise opt-out, you may “Contact us” using the contact information provided.
CONTROLS FOR DO-NOT-TRACK FEATURES
Users may use the Acutrack Privacy Setting tool to customize the amount of data that they will allow Acutrack to collect when the User is accessing Acutrack’s Site(s) or Services.
DO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS HAVE SPECIFIC PRIVACY RIGHTS?
California residents have consumer protection under the consumer protection law (CCPA). After 12 months, the residents have the right to request a summary of their personal data being collected. The personal data being requested usually include the account, security, sales, and data. There is a guarantee with Acutrack’s privacy policy which states that Acutrack will never for any reason sell your data to any third-party service provider.
You can always send in a verified request regards your personal data. Once the request is sent across to us, your personal data will be removed. To contact us on the removal of your personal information or summary of your data, please contact Acutrack at
t1support@acutrack.com
DO WE MAKE UPDATES TO THIS NOTICE?
Yes, Acutrack will provide every necessary update that is compliant with the laws governing this agreement. From time to time, this privacy notice will be updated. As soon as the updated version is accessible, it becomes effective. If any changes are made, you will be notified. Acutrack encourages you to always review the privacy policy from time to time for fresh updates as we guarantee to protect your information.
ADDITIONAL FEES.
When shipping items to your location, there are some additional fees that might be incurred such as; customs, transit fees, security fees, re-consignment fees, etc. when these fees arise, Acutrack hold all rights to add up all overhead cost to your billings to cover this cost. When these fees are going to be added, the administrative fees will also be added for all necessary adjustments.
THIRD-PARTY CARRIER CENTER
.
I urge you to read our third-party carrier policy carefully. When shipping items, Acutrack makes use of a third-party carrier to get these items from one place to another. You are solely responsible for any billings that arise from making use of these carriers to ship your items to your location. Acutrack. Inc will not be responsible to cover those billings. If during shipping activities, an invoice is being sent to us on your behalf for your billings, the billings will be added to your account with us at Acutrack. So, we forward it to you to make amends for the billings incurred. Any liability disclaims, or damages incurred by the third-party carrier due to your default will not affect Acutrack. We tend to make use of a quality third-party carrier to make these shipments.
ANCILLARY BROKERAGE, FUEL, AND BEYOND CHARGES.
This caters to deliveries going to areas in the rural settlement. When shipping to these areas, there are some additional charges that would be added. These additional charges are added to the billings because of surcharges such as fuel, delivery fees, etc. Acutrack will not be responsible to cover these costs. The additional fees are incurred because these areas are distant away from the commercial centers which will always cover a lot of costs to get items delivered. Most times, these fees come after the delivery is done because of the accrued surcharges that are always incurred after and before delivery is made.
HOW CAN YOU CONTACT US ABOUT THIS NOTICE?
If you have questions or comments about this notice, you may email us at
t1support@acutrack.com
or by mail to:
Acutrack Inc.
350 Sonic Avenue
Livermore, CA 94551
Scroll to top
Scroll to top
Scroll to top
error:
Content is protected !!
Sub-policy 5
https://www.sprocketexpress.com/privacy-policy:
This page isn’t working
www.sprocketexpress.com
redirected you too many times.
Try deleting your cookies
.
ERR_TOO_MANY_REDIRECTS
Reload
www.sprocketexpress.com
redirected you too many times.
Sub-policy 6
https://psidelivers.com/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
Home
PSI, Inc. Privacy Policy
This privacy policy will explain how our organization uses the personal data we collect from you when you use our website. We will collect and use information only in the ways disclosed in this statement. Please contact us if you have any questions related to this policy at sales@psidiscs.com.
Topics:
• What data do we collect?
• How do we collect your data?
• How will we use your data?
• How do we store your data?
• What are your data protection rights?
• What are cookies?
• How do we use cookies?
• What types of cookies do we use?
• How to manage your cookies
• Privacy policies of other websites
• Changes to our privacy policy
• How to contact us
• How to contact the appropriate authorities
What data do we collect?
Our Company collects the following data:
• Personal identification information (Name, email address and phone number)
• Information pertaining to statistics and page views
How do we collect your data?
You directly provide Our Company with most of the data we collect. We collect data and process data when you:
• Voluntarily complete our contact now survey and input your information.
• Use or view our website via your browser’s cookies.
PSI, Inc. only markets to adults over 18 years old and will never knowingly ask someone under this age to divulge personal information.
PSI, Inc. collects your data so that we can:
• Provide you with customized business proposal and services.
• Email you with special offers on other products and services we think you might like.
How do we store your data?
PSI, Inc. protects user information with the following security measures: All user information is SSL encrypted on secure servers. We employ firewalls on all internet access points. Employees with access to sensitive information do so with unique passwords that limit access only to data that is necessary to do their assignments and that leave an audit trail as to information accessed and actions performed. These logs are reviewed periodically for evidence of irregular activities.
What are your data protection rights?
Our Company would like to make sure you are fully aware of all of your data protection rights. Every user is entitled to the following:
The right to access – You have the right to request Our Company for copies of your personal data. We may charge you a small fee for this service.
The right to rectification – You have the right to request that Our Company correct any information you believe is inaccurate. You also have the right to request Our Company to complete information you believe is incomplete.
The right to erasure — You have the right to request that Our Company erase your personal data, under certain conditions.
The right to restrict processing – You have the right to request that Our Company restrict the processing of your personal data, under certain conditions.
The right to object to processing – You have the right to object to Our Company’s processing of your personal data, under certain conditions.
The right to data portability – You have the right to request that Our Company transfer the
data that we have collected to another organization, or directly to you, under certain conditions.
If you make a request, we have one month to respond to you. If you would like to exercise any of these rights, please contact us at 770-242-3774.
What are cookies?
Cookies are text files placed on your computer to collect standard Internet log information and visitor behavior information. When you visit our websites, we may collect information from you automatically through cookies or similar technology.
For further information, visit allaboutcookies.org.
How do we use cookies?
Our Company uses cookies in a range of ways to improve your experience on our website.
What types of cookies do we use?
There are a number of different types of cookies, however, our website uses:
• Functionality — Our Company uses these cookies so that we recognize you on our
website and remember your previously selected preferences. These could include what language you prefer and location you are in. A mix of first-party and third-party cookies are used.
• Advertising — Our Company uses these cookies to collect information about your visit to
our website, the content you viewed, the links you followed and information about your
browser, device, and your IP address. Our Company sometimes shares some limited
aspects of this data with third parties for advertising purposes. We may also share online
data collected through cookies with our advertising partners. This means that when you visit another website, you may be shown advertising based on your browsing patterns on our website.
How to manage cookies
You can set your browser not to accept cookies, and the above website tells you how to remove cookies from your browser. However, in a few cases, some of our website features may not
function as a result.
Privacy policies of other websites
Our Company website contains links to other websites. Our privacy policy applies only to our website, so if you click on a link to another website, you should read their privacy policy.
Changes to our privacy policy
Our Company keeps its privacy policy under regular review and places any updates on this web page. This privacy policy was last updated on May 19th, 2023 .
How to contact us
If you have any questions about Our Company’s privacy policy, the data we hold on you, or you would like to exercise one of your data protection rights, please do not hesitate to contact us.
Email us at: sales@psidiscs.com
Call us: 770-242-3774
Or write to us at: 1625 Oakbrook Dr. Norcross, GA 30093
Sub-policy 7
https://www.ladesk.com/security-privacy-policy/:
More than 17,000 customers trust
LiveAgent
with their data. Data security is of utmost importance for us. We combine multiple security features to ensure customer, employee and business data is always protected so our customers can rest easy knowing their data is safe, their communication is secure, and their businesses are protected.
Product security
Two-factor authentication
2-Step Verification
adds more security to your LiveAgent account. When you have 2-Factor Authentication enabled, any attempt to log into your account must be accompanied by the code that you generated in Google Authenticator app. 2-Step Verification can help keep unknown people out, even if they have your password.
HTTPS encryption
All LiveAgent hosted accounts run over a
secure connection using the HTTPS
protocol. Hyper Text Transfer Protocol Secure (HTTPS) is the secure version of HTTP, the protocol over which data is sent between your browser and the website that you are connected to. It means all communication between your browser and LiveAgent is encrypted, including your chat and email communication.
Secure credential storage
We follow latest best practices to store and protect user login credentials and passwords in the cloud.
IP & network restrictions
Your LiveAgent
Agent
panel can be configured to only allow access from specific IP address ranges.
API Security
LiveAgent REST API
is restricted to accredited users based on username and password or username and API tokens.
SPAM filtering
LiveAgent has an intelligent built in SPAM filter that learns and improves its filtering capabilities continuously.
On top of that, we have our
bug bounty program
, by which independent security researches can help us to protect our application.
Data center security
We ensure the confidentiality and integrity of your data with industry best practices. LiveAgent servers are hosted at Tier IV or III+, PCI DSS, SSAE-16, or ISO 27001 compliant facilities. Our Security Team constantly pushes security updates and actively responds to security alerts and events.
Physical security
Facilities
Server environment
LiveAgent servers are hosted at Tier III+ or IV or PCI DSS, SSAE-16, or ISO 27001 compliant facilities. Data center facilities are powered by redundant power, each with UPS and backup generators.
On-site Security
Security zones
Our data center facilities feature a secured perimeter with multi-level security zones, 24/7 manned security, CCTV video surveillance, multifactor identification with biometric access control, physical locks, and security breach alarms.
Monitoring
Server & Device monitoring
All Production Network systems, networked devices, and circuits are constantly monitored and logically administered by LiveAgent administrators. Physical security, power, and internet connectivity beyond co-location cage doors or Amazon/Linode services are monitored by the facilities providers.
Location
Datacenters in United States, Europe & Asia
LiveAgent hosts data in multiple data centers based on your preference or geographical location in the United States, Europe, and Asia. Customers can choose to locate their Service Data in the US-only or Europe-only.
Network security
Our network is protected by redundant firewalls, best-in-class router technology, secure HTTPS transport over public networks, and network Intrusion Detection and/or Prevention technologies (IDS/IPS) which monitor and/or block malicious traffic and network attacks.
Network security
Architecture
Security zones in our architecture
Our network security architecture consists of multiple security zones. More sensitive systems, like application servers and database servers, are protected in our most trusted zones. Other systems like loadbalancers are housed in zones commensurate with their sensitivity, depending on function, information classification, and risk.
3rd-party Penetration Tests
Third-Party Security Research
In addition to our extensive internal scanning and testing program, LiveAgent also works with third-party security experts and researchers to perform security checks and broad penetration tests.
Network Vulnerability Scanning
Vulnerability scanning
Network security scanning gives us deep insight for quick identification of out-of-compliance or potentially vulnerable systems.
DDoS Mitigation
DDoS Mitigation
Industry-leading infrastructure is in place to protect against and mitigate the impact of denial of service attacks.
Encryption
Communication Encryption
Communications between you and LiveAgent servers are encrypted via industry best-practices HTTPS and Transport Layer Security (TLS) over public networks.
Disaster recovery, backup & redundancy
We operate a multi-level backup and disaster recovery strategy. Backups and near real-time snapshots are taken at various intervals and multiple copies are securely stored on different servers. Our disaster recovery program ensures that our services remain available or are easily recoverable in the case of a disaster.
Our redundancy architecture eliminates a single point of failure. Combined with comprehensive backups, we ensure customer data is replicated and available across production systems.
EU GDPR
LiveAgent is fully compliant with the GDPR directive that became enforceable on May 25th, 2018. A team of security experts and developers was working on strengthening our security policies and raising awareness about data protection and what is required of our employees to comply with rules that GDPR puts in place. We also made sure that our customers were informed about the recent development in a timely manner.
Learn more about
LiveAgent and GDPR
.
Google OAuth and Google Data
What information do we collect?
We collect Email address of Google users.
How do we use the information?
We use it to access mailbox of Google users in order to process their emails into tickets.
How do we share the information?
We don’t share the information with any 3rd parties.
Use of information received from Google APIs will adhere to
Google API Services User Data Policy
, including the Limited Use requirements.
Related Articles
Privacy Policy
Learn how LiveAgent values your privacy with secure data handling, P3P compliance, data deletion options & cookie transparency. Contact us!"
About LiveAgent
Discover LiveAgent, the original help desk software since 2004. Trusted by 40,000+ businesses worldwide for seamless customer support solutions!
Provide excellent customer service.
Discover unparalleled customer support with LiveAgent's all-in-one software. Benefit from 24/7 service, a free trial without a credit card, and seamless integration across 130+ ticketing features. Enhance your business with fast setup, AI assistance, live chat, and more. Choose LiveAgent for exceptional service and satisfied customers.
Log in to your LiveAgent account
Log in to your LiveAgent account to access top-notch customer service solutions, including help desk, live chat, and call center software. Don't have an account? Start your free trial today—no credit card required. Enhance your customer service skills with our extensive guides and tips at LiveAgent Academy.
You will be
in Good Hands!
Join our community of happy clients and provide excellent customer support with LiveAgent.
Schedule a demo
Start 30-days free trial
Our website uses cookies. By continuing we assume your permission to deploy cookies as detailed in our
privacy and cookies policy
.
Decline
Accept
Start Free Trial
x
Contact Us
We are available for you 24/7.
Feel free to contact us.
Servers online
We are currently experiencing problems.
More details
Servers busy
Contact form
Messenger
Whatsapp
Chat
Sub-policy 8
https://www.ancestry.com/cs/legal/privacystatement:
Your privacy
We, and our partners (listed in our
Cookie Table
), use tracking technologies to provide and improve our Services, keep our platform safe, perform analytics, and serve relevant ads. You can accept all or manage your preferences individually. Note your preferences may impact your experience of our Services.
View our
Cookie Policy
for more information.
Accept all
Reject all
Manage Preferences
Skip Ancestry main menu
Main Menu
Home
Trees
Search
Memories
DNA
Explore
Subscribe
Cart
Sign In
Home
Memories
Loading
Loading
Support Center
Ancestry Academy
Community
Hire an Expert
Site Status
English
Legal
privacystatement
Ancestry
®
Privacy Statement
Ancestry Privacy Statement
Language
English
Česky
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
Español
Français
Hrvatski
Íslenska
Italiano
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polskie
Português
Português (Brasil)
Română
Shqip
Slovenčina
Slovensko
Suomi
Svenska
Türkçe
Ελληνικά
Български
Հայերեն
ქართული
한국어
Effective:
21 August 2024
Summary of Changes
This summary is intended to help you better understand recent changes to Ancestry’s Privacy Statement and how the changes may impact you. We encourage you to review the Privacy Statement in its entirety, along with the Terms and Conditions.
The most recent changes:
We updated references to renamed features.
We clarified that anything you enter into an interactive tool within our Services is Your Content.
We updated our Renewal and Cancellation Terms to reflect new trial and subscription offerings.
We added language to clarify the terms regarding your use of the Services.
At Ancestry, your privacy is a top priority. Ancestry is committed to being a good steward of your Personal Information (defined
below
), handling it in a responsible manner, and securing it with administrative, technical, organizational, and physical safeguards.
We believe in being honest, direct, and transparent when it comes to your data. In that regard, Ancestry follows three guiding principles:
Transparency
. We work hard to be transparent about the Personal Information we collect and process;
Simplicity
. We try to use easy-to-understand language to describe our privacy practices to help you make informed choices; and
Control
. We give you control over the Personal Information you provide to us, including your DNA Data (defined
below
), and how it is used, shared, and retained.
When You Use Our Services
You maintain control of your Biological Samples and DNA Data and you can manage, delete, or destroy them as described in this Privacy Statement. You may discover unexpected facts about yourself or your family when using our services. Once discoveries are made, we can’t undo them.
This Privacy Statement covers the Ancestry websites, services, and mobile apps that link to this Privacy Statement, including Ancestry
®
;
AncestryDNA
®
;
Fold3
®
;
Newspapers.com
™;
Archives
®
;
We Remember
®
;
Forces War Records
™; and
Find a Grave
®
. Within this Privacy Statement, we refer to these websites, services, and mobile apps as “Ancestry”.
U.S. Customers
. The
U.S. Resident Additional Privacy Statement
and the
Consumer Health Data Privacy Policy
contain additional details for U.S. residents in certain states, as further outlined below.
Non-U.S. Customers
. Ancestry Ireland Unlimited Company is the controller of your Personal Information, and
Section 8
contains information about your rights.
Table of Contents
1.
Introduction
2.
Account Creation and Your Engagement with the Services
3.
What Personal Information Does Ancestry Collect from You?
4.
What Information Does Ancestry Collect Through Your Use of the Services?
5.
Information We Collect from Other Sources
6.
How Does Ancestry Use Your Personal Information?
7.
What Information Do We Share, When Do We Share It, and Who Are the Recipients?
8.
Your Rights and Choices Regarding Your Personal Information
9.
What Are Our Retention Practices?
10.
How Can I Delete My Personal Information?
11.
Security
12.
International Data Transfers
13.
Changes to This Statement
14.
Legal Bases Under EU General Data Protection Regulation for Processing Personal Information of EU Residents
15.
Identity and Contact Details of the Data Controller
16.
U.S. Resident Additional Privacy Statement
17.
Australian Additional Privacy Statement
18.
Brazilian Additional Privacy Statement
1.  Introduction
To provide and improve the websites, mobile applications, and services (collectively the “
Services
”), we collect, store, and otherwise process “
Personal Information
”, which is information that can identify you, directly or indirectly, as further described in
Section 3
. Personal Information includes your name, address, email, and any information that could reasonably be linked back to you, including your
Genetic Information
. Information about deceased people is not Personal Information under this Privacy Statement. This Privacy Statement describes our practices for collecting, storing, and otherwise processing your Personal Information and the controls we provide you to manage it within our Services including the right to object to certain kinds of processing. This Privacy Statement includes our
Cookie Policy
, which describes our use of browser cookies and similar tracking technologies.
2.  Account Creation and Your Use of the Services
When you create an Ancestry account, we will collect, process, and share your Personal Information (including your Genetic Information if you have taken an AncestryDNA test or uploaded your DNA Data) as described in this Privacy Statement.
3.  What Personal Information Does Ancestry Collect From You?
The types of Personal Information we receive and collect from you depend on how you use the Services, and these categories of information are described below. We require certain Account Information to deliver the Services in accordance with our
Ancestry Terms and Conditions
and without this we will not be able to provide our Services to you.
Information Category
Description
Account Information
Your name (required);
An email address (required);
A password that you create (required);
Certain Ancestry brands support third-party sign-in services such as Facebook, Google, and Apple. These services may provide to Ancestry Personal Information such as your name, email address, and profile photo; and
You may provide a phone number so we can (i) notify you of AncestryDNA test result status; (ii) assist you when you contact
Ancestry Member Services
(“
Member Services
”), and/or (iii) allow you to enable multi-factor authentication. A phone number may be required for DNA test kit deliveries.
Credit Card/Payment Information
Payment and billing information, such as your credit card number and your billing and shipping address(es), when you sign up for a free trial or make a purchase, such as an Ancestry subscription or an AncestryDNA test kit.
AncestryDNA Registration Information
When you register an AncestryDNA test kit or upload your DNA Data, we collect:
The registration code associated with your AncestryDNA test kit (if applicable);
Your assigned sex at birth; and
Your birthdate.
Profile Information
We collect the information you provide when you create a user profile. This information includes a profile image, your name, username, biography, age, location, and linked account usernames. Your Ancestry user profile information is visible to other users (defined in our
Terms and Conditions
), so consider limiting this information and using a username that is different from your real name to protect your privacy.
Your Content
We collect information from content you voluntarily contribute to the Services, including (i) family trees; (ii) family memories such as photos, audio/video recordings, and stories; (iii) record annotations, comments, messages, and input to interactive tools; and (iv) feedback provided to Ancestry.
Genetic Information
When you take an AncestryDNA test, we extract DNA from your sample at our partner laboratories and convert it into machine-readable DNA data (“
DNA Data
”). Any file containing your DNA Data uploaded from another DNA testing service is also DNA Data under this Privacy Statement. We process your DNA Data to provide you with an ethnicity estimate (ancestral regions and ancestral journeys). We also process your DNA Data to provide you information about your degree of relatedness to other users in our DNA database and some genetic markers associated with certain biological, physiological, behavioral traits, other characteristics (such as hair thickness and eye color), or traits associated with preferences and wellness. As further described in
Section 7
you may choose to share some of this information with other Ancestry users.
Your DNA Data and any information derived from it, such as ethnicity estimates (ancestral regions and ancestral journeys), traits, genetic relative matches, inherited-DNA information, and related insights are Personal Information referred to as “
Genetic Information
”.
Your Sample and Extracted DNA
. Neither the sample you provide using an AncestryDNA test kit nor the DNA extracted from your sample (together referred to as “
Biological Samples
”) are Personal Information under this Privacy Statement. You can consent to have your Biological Samples stored in our biobank for future testing at your option. Future testing and research may be done if you agree to our
Informed Consent to Research
or if you consent to other tests of your Biological Samples. If you do not consent to the storage of your Biological Samples, we will destroy them.
Sections 8
and
10
describe how you can control your Biological Samples. You may request that Ancestry destroy your Biological Samples by contacting Member Services or by deleting your Ancestry account. We may destroy Biological Samples that do not meet our quality assurance requirements at our discretion.
DNA Surveys
If you agree to take DNA surveys, we will collect the information from the survey questions that you answer and use it for the continued development and improvement of AncestryDNA features, such as traits. If you agree to our
Informed Consent to Research
, your survey responses may also be used for research.
Health-Related Information
Ancestry is not a covered entity under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (“
HIPAA
”), and no data provided by you is subject to or protected by HIPAA.
Your Communications
We host and maintain your communications with other users through the communications features on our platform. We also collect your information when you communicate with Member Services and support teams for our other Services, including through audio and written communications (such as recordings of calls with Member Services, transcripts of live agent chat and emails with Member Services, or information voluntarily shared when participating in consumer insights research).
Contests and Promotions
We collect Personal Information when you voluntarily participate in contests and special promotions we run or sponsor, the details of which are provided upon entry.
Find a Grave Photos and Photo Volunteers
Through Find a Grave, we collect metadata associated with digital photographs uploaded to the Find a Grave service, including location, date, and time the photo was taken. If you choose to be a photo volunteer for Find a Grave, you provide your location to us which you can change or remove at any time.
Protected Classifications and Sensitive Data
Depending on how you use the Services, we collect information related to certain protected classifications such as gender or racial or ethnic origin. For example, if you use AncestryDNA services, we use your DNA Data to estimate ethnicity. Other sensitive information may be inferred by the content you voluntarily contribute to the Services.
For information on Personal Information processed by Ancestry relating to non-Ancestry users please click
here
.
4.  What Information Does Ancestry Collect Through Your Use of the Services?
Information Category
Description
Computer and Mobile Device Information
Ancestry collects information about how you access our Services, including the website you visited before and after Ancestry’s site.
We also collect the IP address where your computer, mobile device, or the proxy server you use accesses the Internet, in addition to other technical information, such as:
Your computer operating system;
Your web browser;
Your mobile-device identifier provided by your mobile-device operating system and your mobile operating system; and
The name of your internet service provider or mobile carrier.
Ancestry collects geolocation information from your device with your permission.
Information from Cookies and Similar Technologies
Ancestry uses cookies and similar technologies as well as technical integrations with marketing and advertising partners as described in our
Cookie Policy
, which forms a part of this Privacy Statement. Please refer to our Cookie Policy to learn about our practices and the controls we provide you.
Information Shared Through Social Media Features
If you interact with social media through the Services, for example “Share,” “Post,” “Pin,” or “Follow Us” links to sites such as Facebook, X, Pinterest, Instagram, and YouTube, Ancestry will collect these interactions and whatever account information these services make available to us depending on your privacy settings with that third party.
Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy statement of the applicable third-party.
You may have the option to sign-in to the Services using your social networking account, such as a Google or Apple account. When you give appropriate permissions, we will receive information about you from your social networking account that Ancestry will use to create your account and build your profile, such as your name, email address, and profile photo.
Information from Your Use of the Services
We collect information about your use of the Services, such as when you search or access records or public family trees, which pages you view, links you click, or when you add people to your tree, etc., which we use to infer details about you as a customer and your interests to provide a better experience through, for example, search suggestions.
5.  Information We Collect from Other Sources
Information Category
Use Description
Information from Public and Historical Records
Ancestry collects records from various sources, usually from official record sources, including newspapers, as well as birth, death, marriage, and census records, which may contain Personal Information relating to you. Public and historical records may also contain Personal Information relating to non-Ancestry users. These records are usually made available to users as part of the Ancestry subscription Services.
Information from Third Parties
We also receive information about you from third parties. For example, occasionally we supplement the data we collect with information licensed from third parties to personalize the Services and our offers to you.
If you purchase a gift subscription or AncestryDNA test kit as a gift, we will collect Personal Information, such as the recipient’s name, shipping address, email address, and the necessary purchase information to complete the gift and notify the recipient.
6.  How Does Ancestry Use Your Personal Information?
Information Category
Use Description
Personal Information Generally
We use your Personal Information to provide, personalize, improve, update, and expand our Services. This includes:
Authenticating your access to the Services and improving Ancestry information security;
Processing your payments;
Building new and improving existing Services, including the service we provide through Member Services;
Classifying, creating image models of, and indexing Your Content (which may include Personal Information) to organize your media, keep our platform safe, and identify your ancestors, places of interest, and other memories;
Combining Your Content with data in Ancestry’s databases to provide insights to help users build their family trees;
Issuing surveys and questionnaires for use in the Services, as well as facilitating product development and research initiatives;
Conducting scientific, statistical, and historical research;
Detecting and protecting against error, fraud, or other criminal or malicious activity; and
Enforcing our
Terms and Conditions
.
Communications
We use your Personal Information to communicate with you about the Services, such as when we:
Respond to your inquiries to Member Services;
Alert you to potential genetic relatives identified by DNA matching, or through our family history services (for example, “Ancestry Hints
®
” about potential ancestors in our database, or updates to your DNA test results, including your ancestral regions and ancestral journeys);
Alert you to records or “hints” in our database pertaining to people in your family tree or to whom you may be related;
Inform you of changes to Services or new Services;
Ask you to participate in Ancestry media productions, advertisements, consumer insights research, or testimonials; and
Provide you with information or request action in response to technical, security, and other operational issues.
Market Products and Offers from Us or Our Business Partners
We use some Personal Information (for example, demographic information available from third-party sources or from parts of Ancestry (profile, trees, etc.)) to market our products and offers from us or our business partners. This marketing includes advertising based on your interests.
Ancestry does not share your Genetic Information with third-party marketers, insurance companies, or employers, and we will not use your Genetic Information for marketing or personalized advertising without your separate, explicit consent.
For marketing that you may have consented to receive by email or SMS, you can control how we market to you by using the unsubscribe link in any marketing email you receive, by changing your
communication settings
, or by following the instructions in marketing communications you receive. Controls for Ancestry’s related brands are available through their settings and are listed
here
. For advertising on third-party platforms, we rely on our own legitimate interests as the legal basis (please see
Section 7
), and you should control your marketing preferences directly on those platforms.
Genetic Information
Ancestry uses your Genetic Information for the following purposes:
Delivering your ethnicity estimate (ancestral regions and ancestral journeys), DNA matches (e.g., close or extended family or others to whom you may be related) from our database, and providing other features to help you and other users learn more about yourself, each other, potential family members, and your genetic relatives and family groups;
Providing you with other insights into what your DNA Data may reveal about traits and wellness;
Providing relevant results to assist you in discovering common ancestors and other details about your family history, as well as helping you build your family tree or connect with friends and family;
Studying aggregated Genetic Information to better understand population and ethnicity-related health, wellness, aging, or physical conditions if you have agreed to participate through our
Informed Consent to Research
;
Conducting scientific, statistical, and historical research; and
Improving features and functionality in our existing DNA-related products, enhancing the customer experience across the Services, improving the quality of our laboratory processes and technology, and building new products and services.
7.  What Information Do We Share, When Do We Share It and Who Are the Recipients?
Ancestry does not share your individual Personal Information (including your Genetic Information) with third parties except as described in this Privacy Statement or with your additional consent. We do not voluntarily share your information with law enforcement. We also will not share your Genetic Information with insurance companies, employers, or third-party marketers without your express consent.
Ancestry’s U.S.-specific disclosures can be found
here
. The circumstances described below explain when sharing occurs.
Those with Whom Your Information May Be Shared / Circumstances in Which Sharing Occurs
Description
Ancestry Companies
We share your information within the Ancestry group of companies including Ancestry.com Operations Inc. and the companies listed
here
(the “
Ancestry Companies
”) to provide and improve our Services.
We transfer your Personal and Genetic Information between Ancestry’s Ireland-based company and Ancestry’s U.S.-based companies. For more information on this see
Section 12
.
Other Users or Others You May Choose to Share With
As part of your use of the Services, you have the option to add or share information with all users of the Services or, through sharing features, with particular Ancestry users and even non-Ancestry users. Additional sharing options may be available in some Services, for example AncestryDNA (see below).
Information in your public profile(s) will be seen by all other users, as will public family tree details. By default, profiles of living people in your tree are visible only to you and people with whom you share your tree as “editor” or whom you authorize to view your tree’s living people. Other information about living people may be visible if included in a public media gallery, or if you choose to publish the information outside your tree.
You may share your activity depending on how you interact with Ancestry records or another user’s content, for example, if you contribute to another user’s family tree, or comment on a record or another user’s content. If the Recent Viewers feature is turned on in your account settings, we may show tree owners you have visited their tree. If you opt-in to view and be seen by your DNA matches, you and your DNA matches can see certain Personal Information about each other, including:
Your usernames;
How you and your matches might be related including how you might fit within your respective family trees;
Whether you have linked a family tree to your DNA;
Either all or only in-common (at your option) ancestral regions and ancestral journeys; and
Your traits (unless you opt out of sharing traits).
Subject to your privacy choices described above, DNA matches include both users who have taken an AncestryDNA test and users who have uploaded DNA Data.
If you share details of your family history or DNA experience outside the Services, you do so at your own risk.
Service Providers
We work with other companies when providing and marketing the Services. As a result, these companies will have access to or otherwise process your data, including some of your Personal Information, in their systems. These companies are subject to contractual obligations governing privacy, data security, and confidentiality consistent with applicable laws. These companies and the Personal Information they may have access to include our:
Laboratory partners (such as your Biological Samples);
AncestryDNA test kit shipping providers (such as name, shipping address, and phone number);
Payment processors (such as Payment Information);
Cloud services infrastructure providers (Ancestry’s web and mobile services are cloud-based services; all your data resides with our cloud service vendors);
Vendors that assist us in marketing analytics and consumer research, fraud prevention, and security (such as email address);
Communications infrastructure providers (such as name and email address); and
Vendors that help us provide and improve our Member Services functions, including phone support, chat, or survey tools (such as Account Information, name, and/or email address).
Analytics and Advertising Partners
We work with third-party partners for analytics and advertising purposes. By collecting and sharing certain Personal Information, these vendors help us to better personalize ads to match your interests. They also help us to measure the effectiveness of ad campaigns and are used to serve you with advertising that is more relevant to you.
Research Partners and De-Identified Data
We share de-identified Genetic Information with research partners only when you provide us with your express consent to do so through our
Informed Consent to Research
. Unless you agree to the Informed Consent to Research, your data will not be included in the data shared with these researchers. Any such de-identified genetic information and phenotypic information we share with third parties for research purposes is done in accordance with Part 46 (beginning with Section 46.101) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.
Research partners include commercial or non-profit organizations that conduct or support scientific research, the development of therapeutics, medical devices or related material to treat, diagnose or predict health conditions. In some circumstances, a research partner or Ancestry may have a financial interest in the research arrangement. A list of our research partners can be found
here
.
Law Enforcement
Ancestry does not voluntarily provide data of any kind to governmental or judicial bodies or to law enforcement agencies. To provide our users with the greatest protection under the law, we require all government agencies seeking access to Ancestry customers’ data to follow a valid legal process. We do not allow law enforcement to use the Services to investigate crimes or to identify human remains.
If we are compelled to disclose your Personal Information to law enforcement, we will do our best to provide you with advance notice, unless we are prohibited under the law from doing so. Ancestry produces a
Transparency Report
where we list the number of valid law enforcement requests for user data across all our sites.
Other Legal or Regulatory Process
We may share your Personal Information if we believe it is reasonably necessary to:
Comply with valid legal processes (e.g., subpoenas, warrants);
Enforce or apply our
Terms and Conditions
;
Protect the security or integrity of the Services; or
Protect the rights, property, or safety of Ancestry, our employees, or users.
If Ancestry is Acquired
If Ancestry or its businesses are acquired or transferred (including in connection with bankruptcy or similar proceedings), we may share your Personal Information with the acquiring or receiving entity. The promises in this Privacy Statement will continue to apply to your Personal Information transferred to the new entity.
Aggregated Data
Ancestry discloses user information in an aggregated, de-identified form as part of the Services or our marketing, or in scientific publications published by us or our research partners. For example, we might note the percentage of immigrants in a State that are from a particular geographic region or country. Such disclosure will never include Personal Information, and we will not re-identify it.
8.  Your Rights and Choices Regarding Your Personal Information
All users (as defined in our
Terms and Conditions
) may use our online tools to 1) request a report of what Personal Information they have provided to us, 2) download a copy of their DNA Data or download a copy of their family trees, and 3) delete their family trees, DNA test results or account.
Additionally, some data privacy laws, such as the EU GDPR, the UK GDPR and Brazil’s LGPD, provide people with specific rights regarding their Personal Information. For example:
Right of Access/To Know
. You may have a right to request access to your Personal Information and to be provided with a copy of certain information including the categories of your Personal Information we collect and disclose. To request a copy, follow these
step-by-step instructions
. If you want a copy of your DNA Data, follow these
step-by-step instructions
. If you want a copy of your family trees, follow these
step-by-step instructions
.
Right of Rectification/Correction
. You may have the right to request that we rectify or correct inaccurate Personal Information about you.
Right of Erasure/Deletion
. You have the right, in certain cases, to request that we restrict (stop any active processing) or delete your Personal Information, provided there are valid grounds for doing so and subject to applicable law. See
Section 10
for information on how to delete your Personal Information.
Right to Object
. You may have the right to object to processing activities in our legitimate interests where such activities impact on your rights and freedoms as an individual. Also, when you consent to processing of your Personal Information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. We will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Right to Restriction
. You have the right to request a restriction on our processing of your Personal Information, for example, where you believe that the processing is based on inaccurate data or not processed in a lawful manner.
Right to Data Portability
. You may have the right to receive certain of your Personal Information in a format that can be transmitted to another data controller.
Right to Complain
. You have the right to make a complaint to the Irish Data Protection Commission (
Complaints handling, Investigations and Enforcement For Individuals | Data Protection Commissioner
) or any other competent supervisory authority in the country of residence.
You can exercise these rights by using the tools described below or by contacting
Ancestry
. Details and options for accessing this information are listed in
Section 15
.
Type
Choices
Ancestry
You can access and update the Personal Information (such as your email address, username, profile information, etc.) you provide to Ancestry at any time in the following sections of the privacy settings:
Public Profile
;
Account Settings
;
Communications Settings
; and
DNA Settings
.
To learn how to manage the privacy settings for any family trees you have created on Ancestry, you can visit your
Tree Settings
or click
here
.
Related Brands
Ancestry strives to make it simple for you to manage your privacy across the Services. You can manage privacy settings for our related brands
here
.
Mobile Apps
You can also control your information using the settings available in our mobile applications, such as the Ancestry and Find a Grave apps.
Advertising
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies and integrations with third party marketing and advertising partners to collect data about your interests or behaviors to serve you targeted ads. You may change your settings as described in our
Cookie Policy
. For information on “Do Not Track” please see our Cookie Policy.
Family Tree Information Download
Ancestry allows you to download your family tree information in the standard GEDCOM family tree file format in your
Tree Settings
. Learn how
here
.
DNA Data Download
You can download a file with your DNA Data. If you download your DNA Data, you do so at your own risk. To learn how, and for more information on what is included in your DNA Data download, go
here
.
9.  What Are Our Retention Practices?
The Services are fundamentally premised on the notion that the personal voyage of self-discovery is not a one-time event and continues over lengthy periods of time—possibly lifetimes. Additionally, and with particular regard to our subscribers and DNA customers who pay fees or purchase subscriptions, the ongoing enhancement of our collections of historical records and DNA features provide benefits and insights to our users over time. As a result, our retention practices reflect this ongoing value by retaining user accounts on our system until our users inform us of their desire to delete their data or close their accounts.
Information Category
Retention Period
Account and Profile
Ancestry will retain the Personal Information you provide while creating your account and your profile until such time as you delete your account.
Family Tree
Due to the multi-generational significance of family trees, Ancestry will retain your family tree data to provide you with continuous access, updated features, and the ability to enhance your family tree. Your family tree data is kept until you delete your family tree or your account.
DNA
Ancestry retains your DNA Data to provide you with the features and functionality you purchase (or are gifted), including continuously updated features, increasingly granular ethnicity estimates and improved ancestral regions and ancestral journeys, as well as other new features based on your DNA Data. Your DNA Data is kept until you delete your DNA test results or your account.
If you were a customer of AncestryHealth, our AncestryHealth laboratory partners are required to retain your DNA Data and test result for a period of at least seven years, or as required by state law and the Clinical Laboratory Improvements Act (CLIA) and the guidelines that apply to laboratories certified by the College of American Pathologists (CAP).
Related Brands
Some of our related brands (
Fold3
,
Forces War Records
,
Newspapers.com
™,
Archives
,
We Remember
, and
Find a Grave
) have their own account logins and will retain the Personal Information you provide while creating your account and your profile as needed to provide you with continuous and updated Services until such time as you ask us to delete it.
Usage Information
We retain usage information (e.g., visits to sites) in a depersonalized or aggregated form. Once aggregated, this information ceases to be Personal Information and will not be subject to user deletion requests.
10.  How Can I Delete My Personal Information?
You can delete, or request that we delete, your Personal Information from Ancestry at any time.
Information Category
How To Delete
Personal Information
You can delete your Personal Information from Ancestry by
following these instructions
.
If you have shared information with other users (for example, by making your family trees public or by sharing your DNA results directly with other users), Ancestry will not be able to remove any copies of information that other users may have retained, which can only be removed by your contacting the other user and asking them to delete it.
Please direct any request to remove information from linked archival records to the responsible archival entity.
We will consider requests for removal of Personal Information from the searchable indexes of the records we hold on a case-by-case basis in accordance with law.
For information on Personal Information processed by Ancestry relating to non-Ancestry users please click
here
.
Genetic
If you request that Ancestry delete your DNA Data, we will delete all Genetic Information from our production, development, analytics, and research systems within 30 days.
To request the destruction of your Biological Samples, you must contact
Member Services
. If you have agreed to our
Informed Consent to Research
, we will not be able to remove your de-identified Genetic Information from active or completed research projects, but we will not use it for any new research projects.
General
There may be some latency in deleting your Personal Information from our backup systems after it has been deleted from our production, development, analytics, and research systems. Our laboratory partners may also retain information they receive from us to comply with laws or regulations requiring retention of certain data, such as the Clinical Laboratory Improvements Amendments regulations administered by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. Ancestry also retains certain information as reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations (including law enforcement requests), resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse, as well as to comply with tax, payment industry, securities, and clinical regulatory compliance requirements.
Related Brands
To delete information from our related brands (
Fold3
,
Forces War Records
,
Newspapers.com
™,
Archives
,
We Remember
, and
Find a Grave
), you can contact us at the related brand and request that your Personal Information be deleted from that service. Some Services may also have an online request form accessible from the account settings menu and viewable
here
.
11.  Security
Ancestry maintains a comprehensive information security program designed to protect our customers’ Personal Information using administrative, physical, and technical safeguards.
The specific security measures used are based on the sensitivity of the Personal Information collected. We have measures in place to protect against inappropriate access, loss, misuse, or alteration of Personal Information (including Genetic Information) under our control.
The Ancestry security team regularly reviews our security and privacy practices and enhances them as necessary to help ensure the integrity of our systems and your Personal Information.
We use secure server software to encrypt Personal Information (including Genetic Information), and we only partner with security companies that meet and commit to our security standards. While we cannot guarantee that loss, misuse, or alteration of data will not occur, we use appropriate technical and organizational measures to prevent this.
It is also important for you to guard against unauthorized access to your Personal Information by maintaining strong passwords and protecting against the unauthorized use of your own computer or device.
12.  International Data Transfers
We are a global business and will transfer your Personal Information to countries other than your own country, including to the United States, Ireland, the United Kingdom, and France. These countries, which are outside the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom may not offer the same level of data protection as in your home country. When we transfer your Personal Information (including your Genetic Information) between Ancestry’s Ireland-based company and Ancestry’s U.S.-based companies for processing in the United States, we rely on established transfer mechanisms such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework. Ancestry remains responsible for any of your Personal Information that is shared with third parties for external processing on our behalf under the Accountability for Onward Transfer Principle of the Data Privacy Framework.
Ancestry and its subsidiaries (namely Ancestry.com Operations Inc., Ancestry.com Operations L.P., Ancestry.com DNA LLC, Ancestry International DNA LLC, FindAGrave Inc., and iArchives Inc.) comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Ancestry has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Ancestry has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Statement and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Ancestry commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your Personal Information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of Personal Information received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Ancestry at:
privacy@ancestry.com
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Ancestry commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
As set forth in Annex I of the DPF Principles, in certain circumstances, an individual has the right to invoke binding arbitration to resolve complaints not resolved by other means. The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Ancestry’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
13.  Changes to This Privacy Statement
We may modify this Privacy Statement at any time, but we will provide prominent advance notice of any material changes to this Privacy Statement, such as by posting a notice through the Services, on our websites, or sending you an email, to provide you the opportunity to review the changes and choose whether to continue using the Services.
We will also notify you of non-material changes to this Privacy Statement as of their effective date by posting a notice through the Services, on our websites, or sending you an email.
If you object to any changes, you may delete your account as described in
Section 10
.
14.  Legal Bases Under EU General Data Protection Regulation for Processing Personal Information of EU Residents
Under EU/EEA and UK law, we are required to specify the purposes for which we process your Personal Information and the legal bases which we rely on to do this. Ancestry relies on a number of legal bases to collect and process your Personal Information and Genetic Information. You can view the details of our legal bases
here
.
15.  Identity and Contact Details of the Data Controller
Customers in the United States
If you reside in the United States, Ancestry.com Operations, L.P., Ancestry.com Operations Inc., and Ancestry.com DNA, LLC, are responsible for the use of your data and for responding to any requests related to your Personal Information.
Email
Postal Address
For Users Located in the United States
privacy@ancestry.com
Ancestry.com Operations, L.P.
Attn: Privacy Office
153 Townsend Street, Suite 800
San Francisco, CA 94107
U.S. State Privacy Requests
usprivacyrequests@ancestry.com
N/A
Authorized Agent Support
thirdpartyauthorizationrequests@ancestry.com
N/A
Customers Outside the United States
If you reside outside the United States, Ancestry Ireland Unlimited Company is your data controller.
Users outside of the United States may contact the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local Data Protection Authority.
Email
Postal Address
For Users Located Outside of the United States
dpo@ancestry.com
Ancestry Ireland Unlimited Company
Attn: Privacy Office
10th floor, EXO Building
Point Square Plaza
East Wall Road
Dublin 1
Ireland
For Ancestry Customers
. For details on how to contact us, you can click
here
, or you can submit questions via chat.
Law Enforcement Requests
. Requests for information from law enforcement should follow
Ancestry’s Guide for Law Enforcement
.
16.  U.S. Resident Additional Privacy Statement
This U.S. Resident Additional Privacy Statement (“
U.S. Statement
”), supplements our Privacy Statement and provides additional information about the Personal Information we collect, process, and share. It also provides information on how residents of U.S. states that provide for the privacy rights outlined below may exercise those rights. This U.S. Statement covers all Ancestry websites, services, and mobile apps that link to this U.S. Statement, including Ancestry,
AncestryDNA
,
Fold3
,
Forces War Records
,
Newspapers.com
™,
Archives
,
We Remember
, and
Find a Grave
. It applies to the Personal Information we collect from your use of our Services and through any other means by which you engage with us. Please see our
Consumer Health Data Privacy Policy
for additional information about “Consumer Health Data” as defined under certain state consumer health privacy laws.
16.1  Categories of Personal Information
Ancestry collects the following categories of Personal Information:
Identifiers
, such as name, username, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, IP address, your mobile device identifier, email address, account name, driver’s license;
Personal information described in Section 1798.80(e) of the California Civil Code not covered by an existing category
, such as physical characteristics or descriptions;
Characteristics of protected classifications under applicable state or federal law
, such as self-reported assigned sex at birth and birthdate. This also includes Your Content (as defined in our
Terms and Conditions
) you choose to disclose with us that is considered a legally protected class under applicable state or federal law;
Commercial information
, such as products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies;
Internet usage information
, such as your browsing history, search history, and information regarding your interaction with our sites and advertisements;
Geolocation data
, such as location of your device or computer and any metadata associated with digital photographs uploaded to Find a Grave, including the location, date, and time the photo was taken;
Sensory data
, such as audio, electronic, and visual information (e.g., audio or video recordings you upload, recordings of calls with Ancestry Member Services or information you voluntarily disclose when doing consumer insights research with us);
Inferences
derived from Personal Information, such as to suggest familial relationships and to create consumer profiles for the purposes of research, product development and marketing; and
Sensitive Personal Information
, such as driver’s license, account login information, racial or ethnic origin, and genetic data, depending on how you use the Services. We do not use or disclose Sensitive Personal Information to infer characteristics about you, other than those inferences that are an inherent part of the Services, such as your ancestral regions, traits, and ancestral journeys.
Some categories of information are collected only if you use certain of our Services.
16.2  Business Purposes
Ancestry uses the categories of Personal Information described in
Section 16.1
for the following business purposes:
Providing, personalizing, improving, updating, and expanding Ancestry’s Services;
Communicating to you about the Services;
Helping to ensure security and integrity of the Services; and
Marketing new products and offers from us or our business partners based on your interests.
16.3  Categories of Sources of Personal Information
Ancestry collects the categories of Personal Information described in
Section 16.1
from the following categories of sources:
You, our user/visitor—this source of Personal Information depends on your use of the Services, including when you submit Your Content (as defined in our
Terms and Conditions
);
The Ancestry Companies (defined in
Section 7
);
Public records;
Historical records; and
Third parties.
16.4  Disclosure of Personal Information for Business Purposes
Ancestry discloses with the following categories of third parties the correlating categories of Personal Information for a business purpose:
Categories of Third Parties
The Categories of Personal Information We Disclose
Other Ancestry Users (if you disclosed your Personal Information on Ancestry)
Identifiers;
Categories of personal information described in Section 1798.80(e) of the California Civil Code; and
Characteristics of protected classes under applicable state or federal law.
Ancestry Companies
Identifiers;
Categories of personal information described in Section 1798.80(e) of the California Civil Code;
Characteristics of protected classes under applicable state or federal law;
Commercial information;
DNA Data (only between Ancestry and AncestryDNA);
Internet usage information;
Geolocation data;
Sensory data; and
Inferences.
Service Providers
Identifiers and categories of personal information described in Section 1798.80(e) of the California Civil Code such as email address and unique personal identifiers generated by Ancestry (tube code);
Biological Samples;
Characteristics of protected classes under applicable state or federal law (self-reported sex assigned at birth, birthdate) are disclosed to our partner laboratories;
Commercial information;
Internet usage information;
Geolocation data;
Sensory data; and
Inferences.
Research Partners
Refer to the
Informed Consent to Research
for information on what is disclosed to research partners, which includes:
Identifiers;
Categories of personal information described in Section 1798.80(e) of the California Civil Code;
Characteristics of protected classes under applicable state or federal law;
Commercial information;
De-identified DNA Data;
Internet usage information;
Sensory data; and
Inferences.
Law Enforcement
or
Other Regulatory Bodies
We do not voluntarily disclose your Personal Information to law enforcement or regulatory bodies. We require a valid legal process as described in
Section 7
before we would provide any data to law enforcement. For information on what data has been disclosed, see our bi-annual
Transparency Report
.
16.5  Disclosure and Advertising Preferences
Ancestry shares with the following categories of third parties the correlating categories of Personal Information for targeted advertising:
Categories of Third Parties
The Categories of Personal Information We Disclose
Marketing and Advertising Partners
Identifiers;
Commercial information;
Internet usage information;
Inferences.
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to disclose information with our service providers and third-party partners for a variety of reasons, including to measure, target, and serve advertisements as further described in this Privacy Statement.
Under the laws in some U.S. jurisdictions, you have the right to opt out of our sharing of your Personal Information for online targeted advertising. Ancestry does not sell or share your Personal Information for other purposes. You can learn more about our practices and the controls we provide you or opt out of certain types of such sharing by visiting our
Cookie Policy
. To change your preferences around targeted advertising, please visit our Do Not Sell or Share my Personal Information/Opt Out of Targeted Advertising page or the “
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
” link in the footer of some of our sites.
For logged-out users, these choices are browser and device-specific. If you use multiple devices such as your smartphone, laptop, or tablet when you engage with the Services, you will need to specify your choices for each device. If you clear cookies from the cache in your browser, your “Do Not Sell or Share” preference will be erased, and you’ll need to specify your choice again.
For logged-in users, Ancestry will store your choices both locally on the device and centrally within the Services via your account. We will update your local consent choice from the most recent centrally stored consent choice. If you are logged out and then log in later, the choice you made while logged out will be uploaded to the Ancestry service and will apply across your account. In the event of a conflict between choices, the most recent choice will prevail.
Some browsers or plug-ins use a Global Privacy Control (GPC), which you can learn more about at https://globalprivacycontrol.org. If our site detects a GPC signal from your device, we will interpret it as a request to opt out of selling or sharing your Personal Information and to opt out of targeted advertising. If you opt out of targeted advertising via the GPC or the opt-out preference on the Do Not Sell or Share my Personal Information/Opt Out of Targeted Advertising page, we may still deliver advertising to you that is not tailored based on your Personal Information.
Ancestry does not sell or share your Genetic Information with third-party marketers, insurance companies, or employers, and we will not use your Genetic Information for marketing or personalized advertising without your explicit consent.
16.6  Exercising Your Rights
16.6.1  Right to Know.
You may have the right to request that we disclose what Personal Information we collect, use, disclose, or share. This includes the right to request the categories of Personal Information we have collected about you, the categories of sources of Personal Information, the business purpose for collecting, disclosing, or sharing Personal Information, the categories of third parties with whom we disclose or share categories of Personal Information, and the specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected about you.
If you are submitting a request to know on your own behalf, you can make your request online or by email.
To submit your request to know for Ancestry online, follow these
step-by-step instructions
on how to download your account data. This report will not include a copy of your DNA Data or family trees. If you want a copy of your family trees, follow these
step-by-step instructions
. If you want a copy of your DNA Data, follow these
step-by-step instructions
. Please note that if you download your DNA Data, you do so at your own risk.
To submit your request to know for our related brands (
Fold3
,
Forces War Records
,
Newspapers.com
™,
Archives
,
We Remember
, and
Find a Grave
), contact us at the related brand. Some Services may also have an online request form accessible from the account settings menu (contact information and link to online request form, if available, are
here
).
To email your request to know, email us at
usprivacyrequests
@ancestry.com
. We are required to verify your identity before providing you with a copy of your data; you may be required to provide a copy of your government-issued ID, which will be used solely to verify your identity and address.
If you are an “Authorized Agent” and are submitting a request to know on behalf of one of our users, see
Section 16.6.3
.
16.6.2 Right to Delete.
You may have the right to request that we delete your Personal Information.
You may submit a request to delete your own information either online or by email. To delete your Personal Information, you must delete your account and, once an account deletion request is completed, this process is irreversible. Your information (including family trees, records, photos, and DNA Data) will be permanently deleted.
To submit your request for deletion from Ancestry online, follow these
step-by-step instructions
on how to delete your account. To submit your request for deletion from our related brands (
Fold3
,
Forces War Records
,
Newspapers.com
™,
Archives
,
We Remember
, and
Find a Grave
), contact us at the related brand. Some Services may also have an online request form accessible from the account settings menu (contact information and link to online request form, if available, are
here
).
To email your request to delete, email us at
usprivacyrequests
@ancestry.com
. We are required to verify your identity before we delete your data; you may be required to provide a copy of your government-issued ID, which will be used solely to verify your identity and address.
If you are an “Authorized Agent” and are submitting a request to delete on behalf of one of our users, see
Section 16.6.3
.
16.6.3  Authorized Agents.
In applicable jurisdictions, U.S. residents can use authorized agents to make requests to know and requests for deletion. Even if you choose to use an authorized agent for a request, you may still need to work directly with us to provide:
Signed permission allowing the authorized agent to act on your behalf.
Verification of your identity (e.g., a copy of your government-issued ID, which will be used solely to verify your identity and address).
For requests to know, the report will be delivered to you via your Ancestry account. The report does not include a copy of your DNA Data or family trees. If you want to download your family trees or DNA Data, see
Section 16.6.1
.
If you are an authorized agent, email us at
thirdpartyauthorizationrequests@ancestry.com
.
16.6.4 Right to Appeal.
Depending on where you live, if your request to know or delete your data is denied, you may have the right to appeal. You can do so by contacting us at
usprivacyrequests@ancestry.com
. Please incorporate the phrase “request for appeal” in the subject line and clearly state the specific reasons for your appeal. Your request will then be reviewed, and you will be informed of our decision.
16.6.5 Right to Correct.
You have the right to correct inaccurate Personal Information that we maintain about you. You can do so by visiting Account Settings or contacting us at
usprivacyrequests@ancestry.com
.
16.7  Selling.
To opt out of targeted advertising, please see
Section 16.5
.
16.8  Sensitive Personal Information.
We process sensitive personal information collected about you only to provide the Services, including to:
Maintain the quality and safety of the Services;
Improve the Services;
Detect security incidents;
Resist and prosecute malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal actions directed at Ancestry; and
Maintain or service accounts, provide customer service, process or fulfill orders and transactions, verify customer information, process payments, provide analytic services, and provide storage.
We may also process this sensitive personal information as needed to help ensure people’s physical safety and as required by applicable law.
16.9  Non-discrimination.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your rights under applicable U.S. privacy regulations.
16.10  California’s Shine the Light Law.
California Civil Code Section 1798.83, known as the “Shine the Light” law, permits users who are California residents to request and obtain from us a list of what Personal Information (if any) we disclosed to third parties for their direct marketing purposes in the preceding calendar year and the names and addresses of those third parties. Requests may be made only once a year and are free of charge. Under Section 1798.83, Ancestry currently does not share any Personal Information with third parties for their own direct marketing purposes.
16.11  Annual Reporting.
Click here
to see our annual, global Right to Know/Subject Access and Right to Delete requests.
16.12  Contact Us.
If you have questions about our U.S.-related privacy policies or practices, please contact us at
usprivacyrequests
@ancestry.com
.
16.13  Actions for Relief.
Various federal, state, and local laws may protect your Personal Information.
Alabama
residents who wish to allege a violation of the Alabama Genetic Data Privacy Act of 2024 may file a complaint with the
Alabama Attorney General
.
California
residents who wish to allege a violation of the California Genetic Information Privacy Act (GIPA)
may file a complaint with the California Attorney General
or their district attorney. Residents of cities with more than 750,000 residents may file a complaint with their city attorney, and residents of cities with full-time city prosecutors may file a complaint with their city prosecutor. If you wish to file a complaint with your district attorney, city attorney, or city prosecutor, contact their local office for more information. California residents who believe that their Personal Information was used improperly
may file a complaint with the California Attorney General
or
California Privacy Protection Agency (CPPA)
.
Minnesota
residents who wish to allege a violation of the Minnesota Genetic Information Privacy Act (GIPA)
may file a complaint with the Minnesota Department of Commerce
, pursuant to Minn. Stat. §45.027.
Virginia
residents who wish to allege a violation of Va. Code Ann. §59.1-593 through §59.1-602 of 2023 (relative to genetic data privacy) may file a complaint with the
Virginia Attorney General
.
Residents of other states
who believe that their Personal information was used improperly may file a complaint with their attorney general or applicable regulatory body.
17.  Australian Resident Additional Privacy Statement
If the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) (Privacy Act) applies to the handling of your Personal Information, the following clauses will also apply.
Genetic Information is considered “Sensitive Information” as set out under the Privacy Act. We will collect, use or disclose sensitive information about you only as permitted by law, for example where we have received your consent to do so or the collection is required or authorized by law.
In relation to
Section 8
(Your Rights and Choices Regarding Your Personal Information), you may have the right to make a complaint to the relevant privacy or data protection regulator in your jurisdiction. However, if you have any questions or concerns about our handling of your Personal Information, or if you believe we have not complied with this Privacy Statement or the relevant privacy law in your jurisdiction, we would appreciate it if you contact us in the first instance using the details in
Section 15
. We will investigate the complaint and determine what action, if any, to take.
18.  Brazilian Resident Additional Privacy Statement
This section addresses the rights and obligations established by Law 13.709/2018 – Brazilian General Data Protection Regulations ("
LGPD
") that apply when:
The operation of Personal Information processing occurs in Brazil;
You offer products and services in Brazil; or
Personal Information is collected in Brazil.
The law grants users certain rights, as described in
Section 8
. In addition to the rights provided in
Section 8
, the LGPD provides other rights:
Information of entities with which the controller has shared data.
You may ask Ancestry to provide information regarding sharing of Personal Information with third parties;
Anonymization, blocking or deleting unnecessary, excessive, or unlawfully processed data.
Due to the principles of adequacy and necessity, you may request that Ancestry anonymize, block or delete unnecessary, unreasonable, or unlawfully processed Personal Information;
Revocation of Consent.
You may request the revocation of the Consent given to Ancestry to process Personal Information at any time; and
Opposition to Treatment if Improper.
You may object to improper processing of Personal Information.
To exercise any of these rights, please see
Section 8
.
Sub-policy 9
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/:
Select your cookie preferences
We use essential cookies and similar tools that are necessary to provide our site and services. We use performance cookies to collect anonymous statistics, so we can understand how customers use our site and make improvements. Essential cookies cannot be deactivated, but you can choose “Customize” or “Decline” to decline performance cookies.
If you agree, AWS and approved third parties will also use cookies to provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content, including relevant advertising. To accept or decline all non-essential cookies, choose “Accept” or “Decline.” To make more detailed choices, choose “Customize.”
Accept
Decline
Customize
We use cookies and similar tools (collectively, "cookies") for the following purposes.
Essential
Essential cookies are necessary to provide our site and services and cannot be deactivated. They are usually set in response to your actions on the site, such as setting your privacy preferences, signing in, or filling in forms.
Performance
Performance cookies provide anonymous statistics about how customers navigate our site so we can improve site experience and performance. Approved third parties may perform analytics on our behalf, but they cannot use the data for their own purposes.
Allow performance category
Allowed
Functional
Functional cookies help us provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content. Approved third parties may set these cookies to provide certain site features. If you do not allow these cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Allow functional category
Allowed
Advertising
Advertising cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners and help us deliver relevant marketing content. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less relevant advertising.
Allow advertising category
Allowed
Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of our sites. You may review and change your choices at any time by selecting Cookie preferences in the footer of this site. We and selected third-parties use cookies or similar technologies as specified in the
AWS Cookie Notice
.
We display ads relevant to your interests on AWS sites and on other properties, including cross-context behavioral advertising. Cross-context behavioral advertising uses data from one site or app to advertise to you on a different company’s site or app.
To not allow AWS cross-context behavioral advertising based on cookies or similar technologies, select “Don't allow” and “Save privacy choices” below, or visit an AWS site with a legally-recognized decline signal enabled, such as the Global Privacy Control. If you delete your cookies or visit this site from a different browser or device, you will need to make your selection again. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
AWS Cookie Notice
.
Cross-context behavioral ads
Allow
Don't allow
To not allow all other AWS cross-context behavioral advertising,
complete this form by email
.
For more information about how AWS handles your information, please read the
AWS Privacy Notice
.
We will only store essential cookies at this time, because we were unable to save your cookie preferences.
If you want to change your cookie preferences, try again later using the link in the AWS console footer, or contact support if the problem persists.
Skip to main content
Privacy Notice
Last Updated: February 21, 2025
To see prior version, click
here
.
This Privacy Notice describes how we collect and use your personal information in relation to AWS websites, applications, products, services, events, and experiences that reference this Privacy Notice (together, “AWS Offerings”).
This Privacy Notice does not apply to the “content” processed, stored, or hosted by our customers using AWS Offerings in connection with an AWS account. See the agreement governing your access to your AWS account and the
AWS Data Privacy FAQ
for more information about how we handle content and how our customers can control their content through AWS Offerings. This Privacy Notice also does not apply to any products, services, websites, or content that are offered by third parties or have their own privacy notice.
Personal Information We Collect
How We Use Personal Information
Cookies
How We Share Personal Information
Location of Personal Information
How We Secure Information
Access and Choice
Children’s Personal Information
Third Party Sites and Services
Retention of Personal Information
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
Examples of Information Collected
Personal Information We Collect
We collect your personal information in the course of providing AWS Offerings to you.
Here are the types of information we gather:
Information You Give Us:
We collect any information you provide in relation to AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information you give us.
Automatic Information:
We automatically collect certain types of information when you interact with AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect automatically.
Information from Other Sources:
We might collect information about you from other sources, including service providers, partners, and publicly available sources. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect from other sources.
How We Use Personal Information
We use your personal information to operate, provide, and improve AWS Offerings. Our purposes for using personal information include:
Provide AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to provide and deliver AWS Offerings and process transactions related to AWS Offerings, including registrations, subscriptions, purchases, and payments.
Measure, Support, and Improve AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to measure use of, analyze performance of, fix errors in, provide support for, improve, and develop AWS Offerings.
Recommendations and Personalization:
We use your personal information to recommend AWS Offerings that might be of interest to you, identify your preferences, and personalize your experience with AWS Offerings.
Comply with Legal Obligations:
In certain cases, we have a legal obligation to collect, use, or retain your personal information. For example, we collect bank account information from AWS Marketplace sellers for identity verification.
Communicate with You:
We use your personal information to communicate with you in relation to AWS Offerings via different channels (e.g., by phone, email, chat) and to respond to your requests.
Marketing:
We use your personal information to market and promote AWS Offerings.
Fraud and Abuse Prevention and Credit Risks:
We use your personal information to prevent and detect fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, AWS, and others. We may also use scoring methods to assess and manage credit risks.
Purposes for Which We Seek Your Consent:
We may also ask for your consent to use your personal information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you.
Cookies
To enable our systems to recognize your browser or device and to provide, market, and improve AWS Offerings, we and approved third parties use cookies and other identifiers. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
Cookie Notice
.
How We Share Personal Information
Information about our customers is an important part of our business and we are not in the business of selling our customers’ personal information to others. We share personal information only as described below and with Amazon.com, Inc. and the affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls that are either subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice.
Transactions Involving Third Parties:
We make available to you services, software, and content provided by third parties for use on or through AWS Offerings. You can tell when a third party is involved in your transactions, and we share information related to those transactions with that third party. For example, you can order services, software, and content from sellers using the AWS Marketplace and we provide those sellers information to facilitate your subscription, purchases, or support.
Third-Party Service Providers:
We employ other companies and individuals to perform functions on our behalf. Examples include: delivering AWS hardware, sending communications, processing payments, assessing credit and compliance risks, analyzing data, providing marketing and sales assistance (including advertising and event management), conducting customer relationship management, and providing training. These third-party service providers have access to personal information needed to perform their functions, but may not use it for other purposes. Further, they must process that information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection law.
Business Transfers:
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or services. In such transactions, personal information generally is one of the transferred business assets but remains subject to the promises made in any pre-existing Privacy Notice (unless, of course, the individual consents otherwise). Also, in the unlikely event that AWS or substantially all of its assets are acquired, your information will of course be one of the transferred assets.
Protection of Us and Others:
We release account and other personal information when we believe release is appropriate to comply with the law, enforce or apply our terms and other agreements, or protect the rights, property, or security of AWS, our customers, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for fraud prevention and detection and credit risk reduction.
At Your Option:
Other than as set out above, you will receive notice when personal information about you might be shared with third parties, and you will have an opportunity to choose not to share the information.
Location of Personal Information
Amazon Web Services, Inc. is located in the United States, and our affiliated companies are located throughout the world. Depending on the scope of your interactions with AWS Offerings, your personal information may be stored in or accessed from multiple countries, including the United States. Whenever we transfer personal information to other jurisdictions, we will ensure that the information is transferred in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection laws.
How We Secure Information
At AWS, security is our highest priority. We design our systems with your security and privacy in mind.
We maintain a wide variety of compliance programs that validate our security controls. Click
here
to learn more about our compliance programs.
We protect the security of your information during transmission to or from AWS websites, applications, products, or services by using encryption protocols and software.
We follow the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) when handling credit card data.
We maintain physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards in connection with the collection, storage, and disclosure of personal information. Our security procedures mean that we may request proof of identity before we disclose personal information to you.
Access and Choice
You can view, update, and delete certain information about your account and your interactions with AWS Offerings. Click
here
for a list of examples of information that you can access. If you cannot access or update your information yourself, you can always contact us for assistance.
You have choices about the collection and use of your personal information. Many AWS Offerings include settings that provide you with options as to how your information is being used. You can choose not to provide certain information, but then you might not be able to take advantage of certain AWS Offerings.
Account Information:
If you want to add, update, or delete information related to your account, please go to the
AWS Management Console
. When you update or delete any information, we usually keep a copy of the prior version for our records.
Communications:
If you do not want to receive promotional messages from us, please unsubscribe or adjust your communication preferences in the
AWS Management Console
or the
AWS Email Preference Center
. If you do not want to receive in-app notifications from us, please adjust your notification settings in the app or your device.
Cookies Preferences:
You can change your cookie preferences on AWS sites at any time by clicking Cookie Preferences in the footer of the AWS site. You can also manage cookies through your browser settings.
The "Help" feature on most browsers and devices will tell you how to remove cookies from your device, how to prevent your browser or device from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to disable cookies altogether.
Sellers and Amazon Partners:
Sellers and Amazon Partner Network members can add, update, or delete information in the
AWS Marketplace
and
APN Partner Central
, respectively.
Children’s Personal Information
We don’t provide AWS Offerings for purchase by children. If you’re under 18, you may use AWS Offerings only with the involvement of a parent or guardian.
Third Party Sites and Services
AWS Offerings may embed content provided by others or include links to other websites and applications. These companies may collect information about you when you interact with their content or services. We are not responsible for the practices of these companies. Please consult their privacy policies to learn about their data practices.
Retention of Personal Information
We keep your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
If you have any concerns about privacy at AWS, please
contact us
with a thorough description, and we will try to resolve the issue for you.
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services, Inc., our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services, Inc., 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, ATTN: AWS Legal
Contact details for specific jurisdictions including the European Economic Area, the UK and Switzerland, can be found in “Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions” below.
If you interact with AWS Offerings on behalf of or through your organization, then your personal information may also be subject to your organization’s privacy practices, and you should direct privacy inquiries to your organization.
Our business changes constantly, and our Privacy Notice may also change. You should check our website frequently to see recent changes. You can see the date on which the latest version of this Privacy Notice was posted. Unless stated otherwise, our current Privacy Notice applies to all personal information we have about you and your account. We stand behind the promises we make, however, and will never materially change our policies and practices to make them less protective of personal information collected in the past without informing affected customers and giving them a choice.
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Amazon Web Services, Inc. participates in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Click
here
to learn more.
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
We provide additional information about our controllers and data protection officers (as applicable), the privacy, collection, and use of personal information of prospective and current customers of AWS Offerings located in certain jurisdictions.
Brazil
Controller of Personal Information
. When Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda., A. Presidente Juscelino Kubitschek, 2.041, Torre E - 18th and 19th Floors, Vila Nova Conceicao, Sao Paulo, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering. The data protection officer for Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. can be contacted at aws-brazil-privacy@amazon.com.
Processing
. We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (ANPD) through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Transfers outside of Brazil
. When we transfer your personal information outside Brazil, we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
Canada
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements; and
lodge a complaint with us regarding our practices related to your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or by mail at 120 Bremner Blvd, 26th Floor, Toronto, Ontario, M5J 0A8, Canada, ATTN: AWS Canada Legal. Further, the Amazon Web Services Canada, Inc. Privacy Officer can be contacted at
aws-canada-privacy@amazon.com
or by mail at the address noted above.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Costa Rica
Your Rights
. With respect to data collected and processed by Amazon Web Services Costa Rica (“AWS Costa Rica”), you have the rights of access, rectification, erasure, restriction, or complaint. When you consent to AWS Costa Rica processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and AWS Costa Rica will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us at Zona Franca America, Edificio C7. 600 norte de Plaza Real Cariari, sobre la paralela a la Autopista General Cañas. San Francisco de Heredia, Costa Rica.
European Economic Area, UK, and Switzerland
Controller of Personal Information.
When Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, 38 Avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855, Luxembourg, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is also the authorized representative of Amazon Web Services, Inc. in the EEA.
Processing.
We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Information We Retain After Your Account is Closed.
If you decide to terminate your agreement and close your AWS account, we will retain your content for a period of up to 90 days after account closure, during which you may still access part of the AWS Management Console in order to retrieve your billing documents and to contact customer support. During this period, you may also decide to reopen your AWS account. At the end of this period, we will delete any content remaining in your account.
After account closure, we may need to keep certain information for an additional period of time for legal and legitimate business purposes. For example, we may retain personal information such as your contact information (e.g., name, email address, physical address) and any invoices that AWS has sent to you (e.g., record of purchases, applicable discounts, and tax information) for tax and accounting purposes. If applicable, AWS may also retain records of communications with you, as well as relevant logs (e.g., a log of your account closure) for dispute resolution purposes. We further may keep records for preventing fraud and ensuring security, for example in case of misuse of our services or violation of our terms.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means.
Questions and Contacts.
If you wish to do any of these things or have a data-protection related question, and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
The data protection officer for Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL can be contacted at aws-EU-privacy@amazon.com.
You can also lodge a complaint with our principal supervisory authority, the
Commission Nationale pour la Protection des Données in Luxembourg
, or with a local authority.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Cookies.
Please refer to our
Cookie Notice
.
Transfers outside of the EEA.
When we transfer your personal information outside the EEA we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
India
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services India Private Limited (formerly known as Amazon Internet Services Private Limited), our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services India Private Limited, Block E, 14th Floor, Unit Nos. 1401 to 1421, International Trade Tower, Nehru Place, New Delhi, Delhi 110019, India, ATTN: AWS India Legal.
Japan
Controller of Personal Information
Any personal information provided to or gathered by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN.
Any personal information collected by Amazon Web Services, Inc. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services, Inc.
Use of Personal Information
We jointly use your personal information for such purposes as described in this Privacy Notice with domestic and foreign affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls, including Amazon Web Services, Inc., Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, and other global entities that either are subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice. Jointly used personal information includes personal information described under “Personal Information We Collect” and “Example of Information Collected” above. Amazon Web Services, Inc. is the business operator primarily responsible for managing jointly used personal information.
We share personal information with third parties only to the extent described under “How We Share Personal Information” above and in accordance with the Act on Protection of Personal Information.
When we share your personal information with third parties outside of Japan, such as sellers of products on AWS Marketplace and sponsors of AWS events, we require the recipients to adopt personal information security measures to protect your personal information.
Please see
here
for information on the countries where third parties may be located, and the applicable data privacy laws and data protection systems in these countries.
Your Rights
You may have the right to request access to or delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law. If you wish to submit a data subject access request, please
contact us
(for AWS customers) or contact us at our mailing address, Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN, ATTN: AWS Japan Legal (for current or prospective customers of Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. and non-customers in Japan).
Malaysia
A Bahasa Malaysia translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Nigeria
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Nigeria Limited, located at 3-5 Sinari Daranijo Street, Off Ajose Adeogun, Victoria Island, Lagos, Nigeria (“AWS Nigeria”), AWS Nigeria is the data controller.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Nigeria customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
You can also file a complaint with Nigeria’s National Information Technology Development Agency through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Peru
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Peru S.R.L., located at Av. Jorge Basadre 349 San Isidro, Lima (“AWS Peru”), AWS Peru is the data controller and the personal data bank holder of the following data banks: customers, prospective customers, and vendors.
Personal Information.
Depending on how you engage with AWS Peru, we may process one or more of the following kinds of personal information: name, identity card number, Tax ID, contact information (such as address, telephone, email address), profession, banking and credit card details, and physical or electronic signature. For more information about the personal information that we collect, click
here
.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
exercise any other rights afforded by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Peru customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint before the Peruvian National Data Protection Authority through its official channels.
Data Processors and Transfers to Third Parties.
We may share your personal information as described in this Privacy Notice and as permitted by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations, including to Amazon Web Services Inc., located at 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, United States of America, for the purposes of providing services and engaging in marketing, business development, and sales efforts with respect to cloud services that Amazon Web Services, Inc. sells globally; and enabling the provision of data hosting, storage, and processing by Amazon Web Services, Inc. as AWS Peru’s data processor.
Philippines
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Philippines, Inc. (“AWS Philippines”), you may contact the Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) and Data Compliance Officer for Privacy (“COP”)
here
if you are an AWS Philippines customer. If you are not an AWS customer, you may contact the DPO and COP at 21st floor Arthaland Century Pacific Tower, 5th Avenue 1634 Bonifacio Global City, Taguig, Philippines.
South Africa
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services South Africa Proprietary Limited, located at 29 Gogosoa Street, Observatory, Cape Town, South Africa, 7925 (“AWS South Africa”), AWS South Africa is the responsible party.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
object, at any time to the processing of your personal information for purposes of direct marketing other than direct marketing by means of unsolicited electronic communications from AWS which is prohibited unless you give consent to receive such direct marketing;
object, at any time (at which point we will cease processing of your personal information), to the processing of your personal information if you feel the processing of that personal information is not necessary for protection of your legitimate interest/s; proper performance of a public law duty by a public body; or pursuance of the legitimate interests of AWS or of a third party to whom the information is supplied; and
to submit a complaint to the Information Regulator of South Africa regarding interference with the protection of your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS South Africa customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
The Information Regulator Contact Details. The Information Regulator of South Africa is located at: JD House, 27 Stiemens Street, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2001. P.O. Box 31533, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2017. You may direct general enquiries by email to:
enquiries@inforegulator.org.za
. You may direct complaints by email to:
POPIAComplaints@inforegulator.org.za
.
South Korea
AWS does not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 14 without the consent of the child's parent or guardian.
How We Share Personal Information
AWS may share personal information as described in this Privacy Notice, including with affiliates of Amazon Web Services, Inc.
AWS has contracts in place with the following third party service provider(s) (delegatees) to perform functions on behalf of AWS in Korea, and they may have access to your personal information as needed to perform their functions described below:
The details of delegation for event management can be found on the relevant event page.
AWS may share your personal information with the following third party service provider(s) outside of Korea as described below:
If you do not agree with the above-stated overseas transfers, please stop using AWS Services and close your AWS Account.
Deletion of Personal Information
AWS will delete your personal information (including after closure of your AWS account) as described in this Privacy Notice. When deleting personal information, AWS will take standard commercially reasonable measures to make the personal information practically irrecoverable or irreproducible. The specific manner of deletion will depend on the information being deleted, how the information was collected and stored, and your interactions with us. Electronic documents or files containing personal information will be deleted using a technical method that makes recovery or retrieval of such information practically impossible or renders the data no longer personally identifiable. Non-electronic documents or files containing personal information will be shredded, incinerated, or both.
Retention of Personal Information
AWS Korea keeps your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes as may be required by the Framework Act on National Taxes of Republic of Korea or other laws), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
If you have any privacy questions or requests please contact:
AWS Korea Privacy
Email: aws-korea-privacy@amazon.com
Korean translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Turkey
Controller of Personal Information.
When AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi is the provider of an AWS Offering, AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi, located at Esentepe Mahallesi Bahar Sk. Özdilek/River Plaza/Wyndham Grand Hotel Apt. No: 13/52 Şişli/İstanbul, Turkey, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
United States
These additional disclosures are required by certain state privacy laws to the extent they apply to your use of AWS Offerings, and serve as a Notice at Collection under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Categories of personal information collected
. The personal information that we may collect, or may have collected from consumers in the preceding twelve months, fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, alias, address, phone numbers, or IP address, your AWS account log-in information, or a government-issued identifier (such as a state-issued ID number, which may be required to verify your identity when completing certain AWS certification courses, or an ID you provide for identity verification, which in some cases may reflect citizenship or immigration status);
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information;
characteristics of protected classifications under California or US federal law, such as age, race, or gender or gender identity, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis;
commercial information, such as purchase activity;
internet or other electronic network activity information, including content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details;
information used to prevent and detect fraud or other unauthorized activity, including informing customers if such activity were to affect them;
biometric information, such as your voice or appearance, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of a speech or image recognition service;
geolocation data, which may in some cases constitute precise geolocation information, such as the location of your device or computer, for example if you enable location services to enhance your experience through event applications we offer;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, including when you communicate with us by phone or otherwise;
professional or employment-related information, for example data you may provide about your business;
inference data, such as information about your preferences; and
education information, such as information about enrollment status, fields of study, or degrees, honors, and awards received.
We collect this information from you, automatically through your interaction with the AWS Offerings, or from third parties. For more information about the personal information we collect, click
here
. We collect this information for the business and commercial purposes described in the “How We Use Personal Information” section above.
Categories of personal information disclosed for a business purpose
. The personal information that we may have disclosed about consumers for a business purpose in the preceding twelve months fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, address, or phone numbers, for example if we use a third-party carrier to deliver AWS hardware, or government identifier or certain types of ID you provide for identity verification, which may in some cases reflect your citizenship or immigration status, for example if we use a third-party service to verify your identity;
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information, for example if we use a third-party payment processor;
information that may reveal your age, gender or gender identity, race, or other protected classifications under California or US federal law, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis using a third-party service provider;
commercial information, such as the details of a product or service you purchased if a third-party service provider assists in providing that product or service to you;
internet or other electronic network activity information, such as if we use a third-party service provider to help us gather reports for analyzing the health of our devices and services;
information relating to our prevention and detection of unauthorized activity, such as attempted fraud;
biometric information, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of certain AWS services facilitated by a third-party service provider;
geolocation data, which may constitute precise geolocation data, for example if we enable transportation services from a third party in connection with an AWS event;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, for example if a third-party service provider reviews recordings of customer support phone calls for quality assurance purposes;
professional or employment-related information, for example if we provide information to a third-party service provider for verification or registration as part of the AWS Offerings;
education information, for example if we facilitate employment or internship recruitment activities for participants in the AWS Educate program; and
inference data, for example if we use a third-party service provider to store information about your preferences.
For more information about the personal information we may disclose for a business purpose, click
here
.
Your Data Rights
. You may have certain data rights under state privacy laws, including to request information about the collection of your personal information by us, to access your personal information in a portable format, and to correct or delete your personal information. If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, or you are an authorized agent under applicable state law, please contact us
here
or at the address under
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
above. Additionally, you may have the right to appeal the denial of any of these rights by submitting a form that will be provided to you if we deny a data request. Depending on your data choices, certain services may be limited or unavailable.
To ensure the security of your AWS account, we will generally ask you to verify your request using the contact information you have already provided. If you are an authorized agent making a request on behalf of a consumer pursuant to applicable state law, we may ask you to provide information verifying you have proper authority to make the request on behalf of the consumer or we may ask the consumer to verify their identity with us directly.
No sale or sharing of personal information
. We do not sell or share any personal information of consumers, as those terms are defined under the California Privacy Rights Act.
De-identified Data Disclosure.
AWS may use de-identified data in some instances. AWS either maintains such data without attempting to re-identify it or treats such data as personal data subject to applicable law.
California Privacy Rights Act Sensitive Personal Information Disclosure
. The categories of data that we collect and disclose for a business purpose include “sensitive personal information” as defined under the California Privacy Rights Act. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for any purpose not expressly permitted by the California Privacy Rights Act.
California Privacy Rights Act Retention Disclosure
. To enable your continued use of AWS Services, we keep your personal information for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this AWS Privacy Notice, as permitted or as may be required by law, or as otherwise communicated to you.
California Privacy Rights Act Non-Discrimination Statement
. We will not discriminate against any consumer for exercising their rights under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Colorado Privacy Act and Oregon Privacy Act Profiling Disclosure
. We do not engage in profiling of consumers in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, as those terms are defined under the Colorado Privacy Act or the Oregon Privacy Act.
Examples of Information Collected
Information You Give Us
You provide information to us when you:
search for, subscribe to, or purchase AWS Offerings;
create or administer your AWS account (and you might have more than one account if you have used more than one email address when using AWS Offerings);
configure your settings for, provide data access permissions for, or otherwise interact with AWS Offerings;
register for or attend an AWS event;
purchase or use content, products, or services from third-party providers through the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
offer your content, products, or services on or through AWS Offerings or the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
communicate with us by phone, email, or otherwise;
complete a questionnaire, a support ticket, or other information request forms;
post on AWS websites or participate in community features; and
employ notification services.
Depending on your use of AWS Offerings, you might supply us with such information as:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
payment information, including credit card and bank account information;
information about your location;
information about your organization and your contacts, such as colleagues or people within your organization;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
content of feedback, testimonials, inquiries, support tickets, and any phone conversations, chat sessions and emails with or to us;
your image (still, video, and in some cases 3-D), voice, and other identifiers that are personal to you when you attend an AWS event or use certain AWS Offerings;
information regarding identity, including government-issued identification information;
corporate and financial information; and
VAT numbers and other tax identifiers.
Automatic Information
We collect information automatically when you:
visit, interact with, or use AWS Offerings (including when you use your computer or other device to interact with AWS Offerings);
download content from us;
open emails or click on links in emails from us; and
interact or communicate with us (such as when you attend an AWS event or when you request customer support).
Examples of the information we automatically collect include:
network and connection information, such as the Internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer or other device to the Internet and information about your Internet service provider;
computer and device information, such as device, application, or browser type and version, browser plug-in type and version, operating system, or time zone setting;
the location of your device or computer;
authentication and security credential information;
content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details, including duration and number of simultaneous streams and downloads;
AWS Offerings metrics, such as offering usage, occurrences of technical errors, diagnostic reports, your settings preferences, backup information, API calls, and other logs;
the full Uniform Resource Locators (URL) clickstream to, through, and from our website (including date and time) and AWS Offerings, content you viewed or searched for, page response times, download errors, and page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs);
email addresses and phone numbers used to contact us; and
identifiers and information contained in cookies (see our
Cookie Notice
).
Information from Other Sources
Examples of information we receive from other sources include:
marketing, sales generation, and recruitment information, including your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
subscription, purchase, support, or other information about your interactions with products and services offered by us, our affiliates (such as AWS training courses), or third parties (such as products offered through the AWS Marketplace) in relation to AWS Offerings;
search results and links, including paid listings (such as Sponsored Links); and
credit history information from credit bureaus.
Information You Can Access
Examples of information you can access through AWS Offerings include:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
your subscription, purchase, usage, billing, and payment history;
payment settings, such as payment instrument information and billing preferences;
tax information;
email communication and notification settings; and
if you participate in the AWS Marketplace or Amazon Partner Network (or other similar venues operated or provided by us), your account, your status, subscriptions, and other information.
Customers can access the information above through AWS Offerings, such as the
AWS Management Console
(including the
My Account
,
Billing Dashboard
,
Bills
,
Payment Methods
,
Payment History
,
Preferences
and
Tax Settings
pages), the
AWS Email Preference Center
,
AWS Marketplace
, and
APN Partner Central
.
AWS support for Internet Explorer ends on 07/31/2022. Supported browsers are Chrome, Firefox, Edge, and Safari.
Learn more »
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out